COMMUNICATIONS,  TAXATION,  AND  FEDERALISM 

S.  HRG.  110–1122 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  23,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–011 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 23, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Canning,  Esq.,  Annabelle,  Vice  President,  State  Tax  Policy,  Verizon  Commu-
nications  ................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Dircksen,  Jeff,  Director,  Congressional  Analysis,  National  Taxpayer  Union 
Foundation  ............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Duncan, Harley T., Executive Director, Federation of Tax Administrators  .......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Enzi, Hon. Michael B., U.S. Senator from Wyoming  ............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Eshoo, Hon. Anna G., U.S. Representative from California 
................................
Quam, David C., Director, Federal Relations, National Governors Association 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wyden, Hon. Ron, U.S. Senator from Oregon  .......................................................

White, Dr. James R., Director, Tax Issues and Strategic Issues, GAO 

APPENDIX 

nology Industry Association (CompTIA), prepared statement 

Coalition for Rational and Fair Taxation, prepared statement  ...........................
Cochetti,  Roger  J.,  Group  Director—U.S.  Public  Policy,  The  Computing  Tech-
.........................
Combined  response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Dr.  James  R.  White 
by  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan,  and  Hon.  Frank  R. 
Lautenberg  ............................................................................................................
Goodlatte, Hon. Bob, U.S. Representative from Virginia, prepared statement  ..
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Amy  Klobuchar  to  Dr. 
James R. White  ....................................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted Annabelle Canning, Esq. by: 

Hon. Byron L. Dorgan  ......................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg  ...............................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Harley T. Duncan by: 

Hon. Byron L. Dorgan  ......................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg  ...............................................................................
Hon. Amy Klobuchar  ........................................................................................
Thune, Hon. John, U.S. Senator from South Dakota, prepared statement  ........
Wagnon, Joan, Chair, Multistate Tax Commission, prepared statement  ...........

Page 
1 
2 
58 
1 
56 
49 
50 
4 

38 
40 

43 
45 
33 
34 
7 
9 
10 
27 
29 
12 
14 
5 

68 

66 

79 
63 

82 

89 
87 
91 

84 
82 
86 
86 
63 
64 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

COMMUNICATIONS,  TAXATION,  AND 

FEDERALISM 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  23,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:01  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Good morning. 
This  morning’s  hearing,  titled  ‘‘Communications,  Taxation,  and 
Federalism,’’  explores  the  sometimes  difficult  intersection  between 
our desire to encourage online commerce and our Constitutional re-
sponsibility to permit states and localities to manage their fiscal af-
fairs. 

The  most  prominent  issue  before  us  is  the  pending  expiration  of 
the  Internet  access  tax  moratorium.  Absent  Congressional  action, 
this law will sunset on November 1, 2007. However, as we consider 
legislation  to  extend  this  moratorium,  either  on  a  permanent  or 
temporary basis, it is essential that we carefully examine the ambi-
guities  existing  in  current  law,  in  the  hope  of  avoiding  unintended 
consequences. 

Indeed,  following  our  most  recent  extension,  in  2004,  a  report 
conducted  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office  reveals  that 
fundamental  differences  of  opinion  remain  as  to  the  interpretation 
of  key  terms  in  the  current  moratorium.  Failing  to  address  these 
ambiguities  will  only  fuel,  rather  than  resolve,  ongoing  confusion 
between industry and State and local governments as to the proper 
scope of services protected by the Internet access moratorium. 

The  significance  of  these  disputes  is  magnified  by  rapid  changes 
occurring  in  the  nature  of  Internet  access  services  and  the  ease 
with  which  providers  of  Internet  access  might  bundle  Internet  ac-
cess  with  goods  and  services  otherwise  available  for  purchase  on-
line. 

In  light  of  these  potential  developments,  Congress  should  clarify 
its intent before permanently codifying such ambiguities, and simi-
larly should ensure that any extension deals fairly with those State 
and local tax laws that have been expressly allowed since the adop-
tion of the initial moratorium in 1998. 

Finally,  our  actions  must  consider  the  substantial  interests  of 

states and localities in managing their fiscal affairs. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

As Americans increasingly turn to the Internet to conduct trans-
actions  online,  Main  Street  businesses  will  increasingly  be  placed 
at  a  competitive  disadvantage.  While  many  debate  the  size  of  the 
sales  tax  revenue  currently  lost  from  the  growth  in  Internet  com-
merce,  most  observers  agree  that  the  tax  loss  is  significant,  and 
will grow robustly over time. 

As pressures on State treasuries increase, the effects of such poli-
cies  will  increasingly  be  felt  by  teachers,  firefighters,  police,  and 
others  on  the  front  lines  of  providing  State  services.  As  a  result, 
it  is  important  that  we  encourage  ongoing  efforts  to  simplify  State 
tax  codes  in  the  hope  that  such  action  may  facilitate  further  Con-
gressional  action  that  would  permit  states  to  treat  online  and  off-
line sales transactions in a nondiscriminatory fashion. 

With  that,  let  me  welcome  the  panel  assembled  here  this  morn-

ing, and we look forward to your testimony. 

Do you wish to make a statement, sir? 
Senator CARPER. If it’s possible. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Carper? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator  CARPER.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman.  Let  me  just  add  to 

what you’ve said and to welcome our colleagues. 

This is, in a sense, a de´ja` vu, looking out at this panel. And wel-

come, Representative Eshoo, to the Senate. 

This is an unlikely issue to provoke strong passions, but it seems 
to,  on  both  sides.  And  I  want  to  just  take  a  moment  and  go  back 
to the 1990s. 

The Internet was young, and I think the rest of us were younger. 
With  the  introduction  and  growth  of  the  Internet,  a  number  of 
State  and  local  governments  saw  an  opportunity  to  raise  some  of 
the  revenues  that  they  needed  to  run  their  schools,  to  run  their 
hospitals,  to  help  meet  their  police  and  fire  service  needs.  Some  of 
them  passed  laws  to  place  a  tax  on  consumer  access  to  the  Inter-
net,  and  it  was  described  as  a  tax  on  the  time  on  people’s  AOL 
bills.  But,  as  the  number  of  states  and  cities  grew  doing  that,  so 
did  the  concerns  that  the  tax  burden  that  was  being  placed  would 
become so great that the potential of the Internet could be snuffed 
out,  or  at  the  very  least  would  be  impeded.  And,  as  a  result,  the 
Congress  passed  a  law  in  1998,  grandfathering  in  State  and  local 
governments  that  already  imposed  a  tax,  but  essentially  saying  to 
the rest, ‘‘Sorry, but you’ve missed your chance.’’ 

As it turns out, the growth of that infant, the Internet, continued 
unabated  in  all  the  states,  even  in  states  and  localities  that  had 
imposed  a  tax  on  Internet  access.  And  today  I  think  most  of  us 
would say that the Net is doing just fine, our earlier concerns not-
withstanding. 

Every  few  years  since  1998,  that  original  moratorium  has  been 
extended, as the Chairman mentioned, first in 2001, then again in 
2004,  after  lapsing  for  a  while  in  2003.  About  3  years  ago,  we  had 
a  donnybrook  here  in  the  Senate,  and  we  ended  up  extending  the 
moratorium through November of this year, although a majority of 
Congress  voted  to  broaden  the  definition  of  what  State  and  local 
governments  could  not  tax.  And,  while  states  and  local  govern-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

ments  didn’t  like  that  change  very  much,  they  won  at  least  a  par-
tial  victory  when  Congress  chose  not  to  prevent  them  from  raising 
revenues in conjunction with a new technology, called VoIP. At the 
time, it was being used, I think, by some 150,000 customers or sub-
scribers. 

Three years later, VoIP is being used I’m told, by 18 million sub-
scribers  to  deliver  largely  telephone  services,  services  which  State 
and  local  governments  have  traditionally  used  to  raise  significant 
portions  of  the  revenues  that  they  need  to  provide  further  services 
to their residents. 

This  year’s  VoIP  is  spelled  IPTV,  Internet  Protocol  Television, 
and dramatic IPTV growth is expected, so that by sometime in the 
next  decade,  I’m  told  that  subscribers  could  number  as  many  as 
100  million.  That’s  a  lot.  If  IPTV  is  bundled  by  voice  and  Internet 
and  other  services,  State  and  local  governments  that  rely  on  cable 
taxes  and  fees  could  face  what  they  describe  as  a  ‘‘financial  tsu-
nami.’’  That’s  why  as  more  and  more  products  and  services  move 
to  the  Internet,  I  just  think  we  need  to  be  very  careful  before  we 
extend  tax  exempt  status  at  all  levels  of  government  for  any  busi-
ness that bundles its services online. 

Let me just say, in closing, if I could, if you look at the Senators 
over  here  most  involved  in  this  issue  over  the  past  6  years  on  the 
side of the State and local governments, not surprisingly they used 
to  run  State  and  local  governments.  Senator  Enzi  was  Mayor  of 
Gillette. Dianne Feinstein was Mayor of San Francisco. Byron Dor-
gan  was  Commissioner  of  Revenues  for  North  Dakota.  George 
Voinovich  was  Mayor  of  Cleveland  and  Governor  of  Ohio.  Lamar 
Alexander  was  Governor  of  Tennessee.  I  was  privileged  to  be  Gov-
ernor of Delaware. None of us liked it very much when the Federal 
Government  would  come  in  and  tell  us  how  to  spend  money,  but 
not  give  us  the  money  to  spend.  A  good  example  of  that  is  ‘‘No 
Child Left Behind.’’ None of us liked very much the idea of the Fed-
eral  Government  coming  in  and  taking  away  our  ability  to  raise 
revenues, but not supplanting or replacing those revenues. 

We  complained  so  much,  in  fact,  that  Congress  passed  a  law, 
about a decade ago, called the Unfunded Mandates Law, that said, 
basically, ‘‘We’re not going to do that to the states. We’re not going 
to tell them how to spend their money without giving them money. 
We’re not going to tell them they can’t raise money in certain ways, 
without  replacing  that  money.’’  But  yet,  we  continue  to  try  to  nip 
at that, and chip away at that, through this matter. 

I’m  pleased  to  be  on  this  Committee,  pleased  to  serve  with  you. 
In  the  end,  I’m  not  interested  in  taxing  access  to  the  Internet  any 
more  than  any  of  my  colleagues  are,  and  our  friends  in  the  House 
are.  Today,  Senator  Alexander  and  I  have  introduced  along  with 
Senator Enzi and others, legislation that seeks to provide for a real 
clear definition of what we want to do. We don’t want to tax access 
to  the  Internet.  We  don’t  want  to  tax  people’s  access  to  e-mail,  to 
instant  messaging,  that  kind  of  thing.  At  the  same  time,  we  want 
to  try  to  be  fair  to  State  and  local  governments  as  they  face  the 
burden  of,  how  do  they  fund  their  schools?  How  do  they  pay  for 
their  hospitals?  How  do  they  provide  for  fire  service?  How  do  they 
provide  for  police  service?—that  we  don’t  tie  their  hands  for  them. 
It’s all well and good for us to say how we’re going to raise Federal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

revenues,  but  I  think  we’ve  got  to  be  real  careful  when  we  turn  to 
State  and  local  governments  and  say,  ‘‘This  is  how  you  can  raise 
yours, or how you cannot raise yours,’’ particularly at a time when 
we don’t have a sales tax in my State; and the states that do have 
State  and  local  sales  taxes,  that  money  is  going  away.  It  is  going 
away.  Because  what  people  are  doing,  is  buying  over  the  Internet. 
We  do  it.  And,  frankly,  I  guess  most  of  the  people  in  this  room  do 
that,  as  well.  As  that  source  of  revenue  is  undermined  for  State 
and  local  governments,  we’ve  just  got  to  be  real  careful  that  we 
don’t somehow further damage the situation by the actions that we 
take here today. 

Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
And  I  welcome  my  colleagues.  And,  having  been  in  that  position 
before,  it’s  never  a  lot  of  fun  to  have  to  listen  to  your  colleagues 
speak  before  you  get  to  offer  your  testimony,  so  I  apologize.  But  I 
don’t  know  how  much  I’m  going  to  help  you  in  that  regard.  I  do 
want to make a few comments before we begin. 

Let me begin by emphasizing why we have this idea of a morato-
rium,  or  a  ban,  on  Internet  access  taxes  in  the  first  place,  and 
that’s  because  we  view  the  Internet  in  general  as  an  interstate 
service.  It’s  a  national  service,  it’s  a  global  system.  We  do  have  a 
responsibility,  at  the  Federal  level,  to  try  to  reasonably  protect 
interstate  commercial  activity,  and  interstate  services,  like  this 
from  either  fragmented  regulations  or  burdensome  taxes.  That’s 
the idea here. The Internet has been an engine of economic growth, 
of  productivity  improvements  across  the  entire  country,  across  the 
entire world. And those, like Senator Wyden and like me, who sup-
port  a  prohibition  on  Internet  taxes,  are  recognizing  the  value  of 
this system as an engine of interstate national and global economic 
growth,  and  also  recognizing  a  very  basic  principle:  When  you  tax 
something, when you burden it with taxes, you’re going to get less 
of  it.  I  think  that  is  a  particularly  important  point  in  an  environ-
ment  where  we  hear  legislators  and  public  servants,  Senators, 
House  members,  Governors,  local  representatives,  talk  about 
broadband deployment all the time, ‘‘We need better broadband de-
ployment.  Went  need  better  penetration.  We  need  better  access  to 
the  Internet.  And  we  need  more  high-speed  access.’’  And  then,  at 
the  same  time,  they  turn  around  and  start  talking  about  ending 
this  ban  on  Internet  access  taxes,  raising  taxes  on  the  Internet, 
which  would  have  just  the  opposite  effect,  making  it  much  more 
difficult  to  improve  Internet  access  for  high-cost  areas,  for  rural 
areas. 

Senator Carper says, ‘‘Well, we don’t really have any—no interest 
in taxing Internet access.’’ But if you stand in the way of a prohibi-
tion,  then  you’re  going  to  allow  cities  and  towns  and  counties  and 
others to tax Internet access. You might say, ‘‘We have no interest 
in having taxes on e-mail,’’ but if we allow the prohibition on Inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

net taxes to expire, then you open the door for cities and town and 
states to tax e-mail or other aspects of Internet access. 

So,  I  think  we  need  to  be,  sort  of,  honest  about  what  we’re  en-
dorsing  and  what  we’re  opposing.  And  I  think  it  certainly  makes 
sense, given the national and global nature of the Internet, to say, 
‘‘In  this  particular  case,  and  with  good,  clear  definition,  that  those 
cities, towns, and states cannot tax Internet access.’’ 

Senator  Carper  points  out  that  we  clarified  the  definitions  with 
regard  to  voice  service  so  that  VoIP  is  treated  the  way  other  voice 
services are treated. And I think that was an appropriate approach 
that we took. But where access to the Internet, access to broadband 
is  concerned,  cities,  towns,  states  shouldn’t  be  imposing  taxes  that 
will  discourage  investment  in  innovation,  raise  prices  for  con-
sumers,  slow  down  the  pace  of  deployment  and  access  to  those 
high-cost rural areas. 

This  is  a  very  important  debate.  I  think,  unfortunately,  we’re 
going to be talking about sales taxes, as well, in this debate, which 
is  a  separate  issue,  one  that  I  think  is  very  problematic,  because 
it  certainly  penalizes  states  without  a  sales  tax,  because  it  creates 
an  approach  for  the  Federal  Government  to  force  small  businesses 
in  New  Hampshire  to  collect  taxes  for  other  states.  But  we’ll  ad-
dress those in the question and answer period. 

I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  the  hearing 
on  this  important  issue,  because  over  the  next  couple  of  months, 
consumers  are  going  to  wake  up  to  the  fact  that,  unless  we  make 
this  moratorium  on  Internet  taxes  permanent,  then  the  Internet 
taxes are going to be imposed and start expanding across the coun-
try, November of this year. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Now  it’s  my  privilege  to  call  upon  my  distin-

guished colleagues. 

May I first call on Senator Ron Wyden. 
Senator Wyden? 

STATEMENT OF HON. RON WYDEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

man. 

Senator  WYDEN.  Thank  you.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chair-

Having given a lot of orations in this room on this particular sub-
ject, I thought I’d spare you, this morning and—I’m just thrilled to 
be here with Senator Enzi, Representative Eshoo, Senator Sununu, 
all of you, to debate and just make a few comments. 

I’m  always  sad  when  I  walk  in  the  door,  because  I  miss  serving 
on  this  Committee  so  much,  and  being  part  of  these  debates.  This 
is one of the great committees. And I know we can tackle this issue 
once again. 

When  we  started  this  discussion  in  this  room,  Congressman  Cox 
and  myself  and  Senator  McCain,  we  tried  to  make  clear  that  this 
was  not  about  giving  the  Internet  a  free  ride.  Nobody  should  get 
a  free  ride.  This  has  always  been  a  question,  because  we  all  agree 
that  we  want  the  Internet,  as  an  engine  of  so  much  good  in  our 
society, to keep that engine discrimination-free. The bill has always 
been about preventing discrimination on the Net. 

And let me give you the example we used, Mr. Chairman and col-
leagues, 10 years ago. We found, 10 years ago, that there were cer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

tain  publications,  at  that  time,  that,  if  you  bought  the  online  edi-
tion,  you  paid  a  big  tax,  but  if  you  bought  the  snail-mail  edition, 
you  paid  no  tax.  We  said,  ‘‘That’s  discrimination  against  tech-
nology.  That’s  discrimination  against  the  Net.  We  shouldn’t  allow 
it.’’  And  that  has  remained  the  bedrock  principle  of  this  whole  de-
bate  for  the  last  decade,  that  we  should  not  allow  discrimination. 
So,  when  our  friend  from  Delaware—we’ve  had  this  discussion 
many times—talks about not letting people generate revenue at the 
State and local level, all that this law has said for the last 10 years 
is that what you do online cannot be more punitive than what you 
do  offline.  I  personally  think  we  ought  to  make  this  permanent 
now.  I’ll  come  back  here  as  long  as  the  good  people  of  Oregon  are 
willing to let me serve in the Senate and keep working on this. Our 
ancestors were told the Spanish-American War phone tax was tem-
porary,  and  I  think  it’s  time  to  take  this  out  of  temporary  status 
and  make  it  permanent,  embed  the  principle  that  we  don’t  want 
discrimination online. 

Now,  if  you  want  to  figure  out  how  much  discriminatory  taxes 
could  be,  the  best  reference  is  the  phone  bill,  because  taxes  and 
government fees already add as much as another 20 percent to peo-
ple’s phone bills. 

Here’s  the  kind  of  scenario  that  we  could  have  if  you  allow  the 
Net  to  be  opened  up  in  this  discriminatory  way.  Right  now,  if  you 
take  a  gallon  of  milk  to  the  checkout  counter  and  pay  tax  on  the 
purchase,  the  clerk  can’t  turn  around  and  charge  you  another  tax 
if  you’re  going  to  use  the  milk  in  your  cereal  and  another  tax  if 
you’re going to put milk in your coffee. But that’s what can happen 
if you open up the Net to multiple taxes, and discriminatory taxes, 
and still pay all the phone taxes on digital subscriber lines, and all 
the franchise fees on cable, but, on top of those, you could pay even 
more taxes for the very same service. 

Now, the other point I wanted to mention, Mr. Chairman, is, no-
body  has  been  able  to  show  harm  as  a  result  of  this  law.  Nobody 
has been able to show how the failure to allow discriminatory taxes 
on the Net has hurt them. My hope now is that we can get beyond 
a few of the myths about this discussion and make this law perma-
nent. 

The  first  myth  is  that  in  some  way  this  law  has  kept  State  and 
local  governments  from  taxing  online  sales.  I’ve  already  made  the 
point  that  the  State  and  localities  can  do  anything  they  want  on-
line, as long as the same thing happens offline. And the law specifi-
cally  states  that  any  sales  tax  that  can  be  collected  from  an  out- 
of-state  phone  or  catalog  order  today  can  be  collected  from  an 
Internet  sale.  The  Act  does  not  affect  those  abilities  of  states  and 
localities. 

The  second  myth  that  has  been  out  there  is  that  the  law  some-
how slows down a related project—not the same one, but a related 
project—called the State Streamlined Sales Tax Project. This is an 
effort  by  Senator  Enzi.  He’s  been  doing  good  work.  And  certainly, 
I and others are willing to look at that whole effort. 

What this has largely been about—and former Governor Cellucci 
testified—I believe it was in this room, when we wrote the original 
law—is  that  states  are  not  very  comfortable  forcing  their  citizens 
to  pay  taxes  they  owe  on  out-of-state  purchases.  And  former  Gov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

ernor Cellucci testified before Congress that he just wasn’t going to 
station State patrol officers at the New Hampshire border to search 
every  returning  Massachusetts  car  for  items  purchased  in  New 
Hampshire.  That  is  the  heart  of  the  problem.  And  I  don’t  under-
stand  why  we  should  allow  discriminatory  taxes  on  the  Net  in 
order  to  deal  with  what  is,  to  some  extent,  a  question  of  political 
will. 

The Streamlined Sales Tax Project is going to consider—at some 
point,  the  Congress  will  decide  whether  to  move  from  7,500  dif-
ferent  taxing  jurisdictions  to  43,000  five-digit  Zip  Codes  or  30  mil-
lion  nine-digit  Zip  Codes.  We’ll  see  if  the  Congress  considers  that 
simplification.  But  there  is  nothing  in  the  Internet  tax  law  that 
will in any way hinder the Streamlined Sales Tax Project. 

As  Senator  Carper  said,  and  you  touched  on,  Mr.  Chairman,  we 
all  want  broadband  to  be  as  available  and  widespread  as  we  pos-
sibly  can.  But  it  just  seems  to  me  that  to  allow  for  multiple  and 
discriminatory taxes online is going to make it harder for this Com-
mittee  to  go  forward  with  its  very  constructive  agenda  to  expand 
broadband into every nook and cranny of the country. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity,  and  see  a  num-
ber  of  colleagues  who  have  been  involved  in  this  debate  over  the 
years, and look forward to working with you on this. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, sir. 
And I’m now pleased to recognize Senator Michael Enzi. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL B. ENZI, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WYOMING 

Senator  ENZI.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  you  hold-
ing  this  hearing.  It  covers  some  extremely  critical  things,  particu-
larly to State and local governments. And I do intend to talk about 
both sales taxes and the moratorium on Internet access. 

I would ask that my whole statement be a part of the record. 
The CHAIRMAN. Without objection. 
Senator ENZI. Thank you. 
I’ve  been  working  on  the  Streamlined  Sales  Tax  Project  and  the 
sales  tax  fairness  issue  since  joining  the  U.S.  Senate  in  1997.  As 
a  former  small  business  man,  it’s  important  to  level  the  playing 
field for all retailers—in-store, catalog, and online—so an outdated 
rule  for  sales  tax  collection  does  not  adversely  impact  small  busi-
nesses and main-street retailers. 

Yesterday  afternoon,  I  introduced  the  Sales  Tax  Fairness  and 
Simplification  Act,  a  bill  that  will  treat  all  retailers  in  a  similar 
fashion, so each retailer has the same sales tax collection responsi-
bility. All businesses and their retail sales should be treated equal-
ly.  By  addressing  this  collection  inequity,  the  bill  will  also  help 
states  ensure  the  viability  of  the  sales  tax  as  a  major  revenue 
source for State budgets by closing a growing loophole that encour-
ages tax avoidance. 

My  bill  is  not  about  new  taxes.  In  fact,  it  is  likely  that  states’ 
dependency  on  Federal  dollars  could  be  offset  by  an  increased  col-
lection  at  the  State  level.  If  Congress  fails  to  authorize  states  to 
collect taxes on remote sales, and electronic commerce continues to 
grow  as  predicted,  are  we  implicitly  blessing  a  situation  where 
states  will  be  forced  to  raise  other  taxes,  such  as  income  or  prop-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

erty  taxes,  to  offset  the  growing  loss  of  sales  tax  revenue?  I  do 
want to avoid that. 

The  Sales  Tax  Fairness  and  Simplification  Act  accomplishes  tax 
simplification  in  an  unprecedented  manner.  It  goes  well  beyond 
what Senator Wyden has mentioned. I won’t go into all the details. 
The  bill  will  help  relieve  the  expensive  burden  by  requiring 
states to meet the simplification standards outlined in the Stream-
lined  Sales  and  Use  Tax  Agreement.  Working  with  the  business 
community, the states developed the Agreement to harmonize State 
sales  tax  rules,  bring  uniformity  to  definition  of  items  in  the  sales 
tax  base,  significantly  reduce  the  paperwork  burden  on  retailers, 
and  incorporate  new  technology  to  modernize  many  administrative 
procedures. This historic Agreement was approved by 34 states and 
the District of Columbia on November 12, 2002. 

Now, Senator Byron Dorgan of North Dakota, and I have worked 
tirelessly  to  assist  sellers  and  State  and  local  governments  to  find 
true  simplification  in  almost  every  aspect  of  sales  and  use  tax  col-
lection  and  administration.  For  the  past  2  years,  we  worked  with 
all interested parties to try to find a mutually agreeable legislative 
package to introduce. Many hours have been dedicated in trying to 
find the right solution to address all concerns, especially the small 
business  exception.  And  we’re  still  working  on  it.  That’s  what  we 
do. 

I’d  also  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  briefly  mention  my  sup-
port for Senators Carper and Alexander’s bill, that it would extend 
the  current  Internet  access  tax  moratorium.  This  legislation  rep-
resents  a  commonsense  approach  to  the  extension  of  the  Internet 
Tax Freedom Act, and recognizes that there may be changes in uni-
formity out there that we never anticipated. The first time that we 
discussed the—uniformity, we didn’t talk about Voice over Internet 
Protocol. We have now. 

As  the  former  Mayor  of  Gillette,  Wyoming,  and  a  former  State 
legislator,  I  want  to  talk  for  a  moment  about  the  impact  of  this 
moratorium  on  State  and  local  governments.  I  fully  recognize  the 
right  of  State  and  local  governments  to  tax  and  collect  revenue. 
State  and  local  governments  provide  essential  services  to  their 
communities, and they need to have revenue to pay for those serv-
ices. 

While  I  agree  that  Internet  access  must  remain  tax-free,  Con-
gress must make sure that this definition of what constitutes Inter-
net access is not expanded to unfairly limit the ability of State and 
local governments to provide essential services, such as police, fire-
fighters,  teachers,  and  road  construction  crews.  You  can’t  drink 
water from the Internet. You can’t flush your toilet on the Internet. 
You  can’t  drive  your  car  on  the  Internet.  Do  you  want  to  unfairly 
limit local government as they provide necessary services? I believe 
that  Senators  Carper  and  Alexander’s  legislation  finds  the  right 
balance  with  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access.’’  This  bill  makes 
sure  that  e-mail  and  instant  messaging  remains  tax-free,  while  al-
lowing states the ability to continue to collect revenue for essential 
services.  It  encourages  increased  use  of  the  Internet,  but  still  pro-
vides  that  future  uses,  if  they  have  conflicts,  can  be  resolved  with 
future legislation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

I  urge  my  colleagues  on  this  Committee  to  support  the  Internet 
Tax  Freedom  Extension  Act  of  2007.  And  I  appreciate  this  oppor-
tunity to testify. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Enzi follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL B. ENZI, U.S. SENATOR FROM WYOMING 
Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Ranking  Member  Stevens,  for  allowing  me  to 
testify  this  morning  about  the  importance  of  imposing  uniformity,  simplification, 
and fairness concerning the taxation of remote sales over the Internet. I also intend 
to briefly discuss the current moratorium on the Internet access tax. 

I  have  been  working  on  the  Streamlined  Sales  Tax  Project  and  sales  tax  fairness 
issue  since  joining  the  U.S.  Senate  in  1997.  As  a  former  small  business  man,  it  is 
important  to  level  the  playing  field  for  all  retailers—in-store,  catalog,  and  online— 
so  an  outdated  rule  for  sales  tax  collection  does  not  adversely  impact  small  busi-
nesses  and  Main  Street  retailers.  Yesterday  afternoon,  I  introduced  the  Sales  Tax 
Fairness and Simplification Act, a bill that will treat all retailers in a similar fash-
ion  so  each  retailer  has  the  same  sales  tax  collection  responsibility.  All  businesses 
and their retail sales should be treated equally. 

By addressing this collection inequity, the bill will also help states ensure the via-
bility of the sales tax as a major revenue source for state budgets by closing a grow-
ing  loophole  that  encourages  tax  avoidance.  It  will  help  both  consumers  and  states 
by  reducing  the  burden  on  consumers  and  providing  a  mechanism  that  will  allow 
states to systematically and fairly collect the taxes already owed to them. At a time 
when  states  are  increasingly  turning  to  the  Federal  Government  for  program  fund-
ing,  it  is  logical  that  Congress  would  instead  authorize  the  states  to  collect  their 
own  revenue  instead  of  raising  the  Federal  tax  burden  to  then  distribute  money 
back to the states. 

My  bill  is  not  about  new  taxes.  In  fact,  it  is  likely  that  the  states’  dependency 
on  Federal  dollars  could  be  offset  by  any  increased  collection  at  the  state  level.  If 
Congress fails to authorize states to collect tax on remote sales, and electronic com-
merce  continues  to  grow  as  predicted,  are  we  implicitly  blessing  a  situation  where 
states will be forced to raise other taxes —such as income or property taxes—to off-
set the growing loss of sales tax revenue? I want to avoid that. That is why we need 
to  implement  a  plan  that  will  allow  states  to  generate  revenue  using  mechanisms 
already approved by their local leaders. 

The  Sales  Tax  Fairness  and  Simplification  Act  accomplishes  tax  simplification  in 
an  unprecedented  manner.  As  the  Supreme  Court  identified  in  the  Quill  versus 
North  Dakota  decision  in  1992,  a  multitude  of  complicated  and  diverse  state  sales 
tax  rules  made  it  too  onerous  to  require  retailers  to  collect  sales  taxes  unless  they 
had  a  physical  presence  in  the  state  of  the  buyer.  Local  brick-and-mortar  retailers 
collect  sales  taxes,  while  many  online  and  catalog  retailers  are  exempt  from  col-
lecting  the  same  taxes  if  they  can  argue  that  they  do  not  have  physical  presence 
in  the  state.  This  is  not  only  fundamentally  unfair  to  Main  Street  retailers,  most 
of  whom  are  small  businesses,  but  it  is  costing  states  and  localities  billions  of  dol-
lars in lost revenue. 

The  bill  will  help  relieve  the  expensive  burden  by  requiring  states  to  meet  the 
simplification standards outlined in the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement. 
Working  with  the  business  community,  the  states  developed  the  Agreement  to  har-
monize state sales tax rules, bring uniformity to definitions of items in the sales tax 
base,  significantly  reduce  the  paperwork  burden  on  retailers,  and  incorporate  new 
technology  to  modernize  many  administrative  procedures.  This  historic  Agreement 
was approved by 34 states and the District of Columbia on November 12, 2002. 

The  states  have  made  tremendous  progress  in  changing  their  state  tax  laws  to 
become  compliant  with  the  Agreement.  Already,  19  states  have  enacted  legislation 
to  change  their  tax  laws  and  implement  the  requirements  of  the  Agreement  and 
over  350  businesses  have  voluntarily  signed  up  to  begin  collecting  sales  tax  under 
the simplified set of rules. 

While  the  states  have  made  great  progress,  the  Quill  decision  held  that  allowing 
states to require collection is an issue that, ‘‘Congress may be better qualified to re-
solve,  and  one  that  it  has  the  ultimate  power  to  resolve.’’  The  states  have  acted.  It 
is now time for Congress to provide states that enact the Streamlined Sales and Use 
Tax  Agreement  with  the  authority  to  require  remote  retailers  to  collect  sales  taxes 
just as Main Street retailers do today. 

Senator Byron Dorgan of North Dakota and I have worked tirelessly to assist sell-
ers  and  state  and  local  governments  to  find  true  simplification  in  almost  every  as-
pect  of  sales  and  use  tax  collection  and  administration.  For  the  past  2  years,  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

worked  with  all  interested  parties  to  try  to  find  a  mutually  agreeable  legislative 
package  to  introduce.  Many  hours  have  been  dedicated  in  trying  to  find  the  right 
solution  to  address  all  concerns,  especially  the  small  business  exception.  Although 
I  introduced  the  bill  yesterday,  I  will  continue  to  work  with  Senator  Dorgan,  my 
Congressional  colleagues,  and  all  interested  parties  to  attempt  to  find  compromise 
on  all  of  the  policy  issues  of  concern  to  the  stakeholders.  Some  of  the  outstanding 
policy  issues  we  will  attempt  to  address  include  modification  of  the  small  business 
exception,  telecommunications  services  provisions,  governance  and  judicial  review, 
and  the  definition  of  sourcing.  Bill  introduction  does  not  stop  us  from  negotiating 
and working together to improve the final product that should be enacted into pub-
lic law. It is how I always work. 

The Sales Tax Fairness and Simplification Act provides states that implement the 
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement with the authority to collect sales or use 
taxes  equally  from  all  retailers.  Adoption  of  the  Agreement  and  Congressional  au-
thorization will provide a level playing field for brick and mortar and remote retail-
ers. I strongly urge my colleagues on this Committee to support the Sales Tax Fair-
ness and Simplification Act. 

I  would  also  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  briefly  mention  my  support  for  Sen-
ators Carper and Alexander’s bill that would extend the current Internet access tax 
moratorium, also called the Internet Tax Freedom Extension Act of 2007. This legis-
lation  represents  a  common  sense  approach  to  the  extension  of  the  Internet  Tax 
Freedom  Act.  Internet  access  provides  countless  opportunities  for  schools  and  busi-
nesses  throughout  our  Nation,  and  I  want  to  ensure  that  this  access  remains  free 
from  unfair  and  burdensome  taxation.  That  is  why  I  support  this  legislation  to  ex-
tend the moratorium on taxation for an additional 4 years. 

As  the  former  Mayor  of  Gillette,  Wyoming  and  a  former  state  legislator,  I  want 
to talk for a moment about the impact of this moratorium on local and state govern-
ments.  I  fully  recognize  the  right  of  state  and  local  governments  to  tax  and  collect 
revenue.  State  and  local  governments  provide  essential  services  to  their  commu-
nities and they need to have revenue to pay for these services. 

While  I  agree  that  Internet  access  must  remain  tax  free,  Congress  must  make 
sure  that  this  definition  of  what  constitutes  Internet  access  is  not  expanded  to  un-
fairly  limit  the  ability  of  state  and  local  governments  to  provide  essential  services, 
such as police, firefighters, teachers, and road construction crews. You cannot drink 
water  from  the  Internet.  You  cannot  flush  your  toilet  on  the  Internet.  You  cannot 
drive your car on the Internet. Do not unfairly limit local governments as they pro-
vide  necessary  services.  I  believe  that  Senators  Carper  and  Alexander’s  legislation 
finds  the  right  balance  with  its  definition  of  Internet  access.  This  bill  makes  sure 
that e-mail and instant messaging remains tax free while allowing states the ability 
to  continue  to  collect  revenue  for  essential  services.  I  urge  my  colleagues  on  this 
Committee to support the Internet Tax Freedom Extension Act of 2007. 

Thank you again, Chairman Inouye and Ranking Member Stevens, for the oppor-
tunity  to  outline  the  importance  of  my  bill,  the  Sales  Tax  Fairness  and  Simplifica-
tion  Act,  and  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Extension  Act  of  2007.  I  look  forward  to 
working with you, your staff, and the rest of the Commerce Committee on these two 
policy  initiatives  in  the  future  to  ensure  swift  passage  of  both  bills  later  this  year. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
And  now  it’s  my  pleasure  to  welcome  our  next  witness  to  the 
Senate,  the  Honorable  Anna  Eshoo,  Representative  from  the  State 
of California. 

STATEMENT OF HON. ANNA G. ESHOO, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM CALIFORNIA 

Representative  ESHOO.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  mem-
bers of the Committee. Thank you for having me here to testify on 
legislation  that  I’ve  introduced  in  the  House,  with  Congressman 
Bob  Goodlatte.  And  I  hope  he’ll  be  able  to  join  us  this  morning. 
He’s been a great advocate for this. 

The  bill  is  H.R.  743,  the  Permanent  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act 
of  2007.  It  has  a  strong  bipartisan  support  in  the  House,  with  70 
cosponsors to date. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

When  this  issue  first  came  to  prominence  in  the  late  1990s,  my 
Congressional  district,  which  is  home  to  Silicon  Valley,  was  bus-
tling with activity in the burgeoning Internet sector. From the end 
of 1997 to the end of 1998, in 1 short year, the number of Internet 
users  more  than  doubled,  from  70  million  to  147  million,  and  the 
2  millionth  domain  name  was  registered  in  May  1998.  In  Sep-
tember  1998,  a  small  startup  company  was  also  incorporated  in  a 
garage in Menlo Park: Google, Inc. 

Congress  and  President  Clinton  recognized  the  promise  of  the 
Internet  and  the  need  to  foster  its  growth  and  development  by 
maintaining  an  open  architecture,  with  limited  barriers  to  entry 
and  minimal  regulatory  and  administrative  burdens.  Of  particular 
concern  was  the  potential  for  Internet  access  and  services  to  be-
come  a  target  for  government  taxing  authorities  seeking  new 
sources  of  revenue.  We  recognized,  at  that  time,  that  it  would  not 
serve our country well to interfere with the growth of this exciting 
and  invaluable  tool  for  information,  communications,  and  com-
merce,  and  we  prohibited  new  and  discriminatory  taxes  on  the 
Internet. 

I  think  the  moratorium  has  served  our  country  well.  The  Inter-
net  is  now  an  integral  part  of  everyday  life  in  our  Nation.  Ameri-
cans  utilize  the  Internet  for  communication,  commerce,  business, 
education,  and  research.  So,  I  don’t  think  now  is  the  time  to  re-
verse this course and kill, essentially, ‘‘GoldenGoose.com.’’ It’s more 
critical now than at any time since the moratorium was established 
to protect the Internet from new taxes and fees. 

The country that invented the Internet no longer leads the world 
in  Internet  access  and  use.  According  to  the  most  recent  data,  our 
country  now  ranks  15th  in  broadband  penetration  amongst  all  in-
dustrialized  countries.  I  believe  Congress  should  make  a  commit-
ment to provide universal broadband access to all Americans. Uni-
versal  broadband  isn’t  just  something  we  should  do,  it’s  something 
we  must  do  if  we’re  to  remain  competitive  in  the  21st  century  and 
the  global  economy.  Broadband  services  are  expanding,  and  more 
American  consumers  are  subscribing  to  it,  but  we  still  lag  behind 
most  of  our  global  competitors,  particularly  regarding  true  high- 
speed  broadband  service  that  will  allow  our  country  to  remain  a 
leader in communications strategies. 

Access  to  these  high-speed  services  and  applications  will  revolu-
tionize  business,  healthcare,  entertainment,  and  education  in  our 
country,  but  only  if  all  Americans  have  access  to  advanced 
broadband service that’s affordable. I can’t think of a faster way to 
retreat from this important goal than to permit new taxes on Inter-
net access and services. I think it will widen the breach of the dig-
ital divide. 

Some have argued that we should enact another temporary mor-
atorium rather than establish the certainty that a permanent mor-
atorium  would  provide.  I  think  the  basis  for  these  arguments 
seems to be that State and local taxing authorities should be given 
time to streamline and simplify the various sales taxes assessed by 
the 7,500 taxing jurisdictions throughout the country. I don’t think 
these arguments really hold water. 

First,  nothing  in  this  bill  prohibits  State  and  local  governments 
from  collecting  use  taxes  from  their  residents  on  purchases  made 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

on  the  Internet,  over  the  phone,  or  by  mail  order.  It  simply  leaves 
in place the status quo, that distant businesses cannot be forced to 
calculate and collect these taxes for them. 

The  promise  of  streamlining—and  I  thought  there  was  promise 
for streamlining and simplification, but I think, today, it’s illusory, 
most  frankly—the  discussions  that  have  been  underway—and  I 
know  Senator  Enzi  has  done  a  great  deal  of  work  on  it,  but  when 
you look at where we are now, the discussions have been underway 
for  over  a  decade,  and  little  or  no  progress  is  evident.  In  fact,  the 
multi-state discussions on a simplified nationwide sales tax system 
have dwindled to 15 states, and they don’t even include any of the 
Nation’s  six  most  populous  states—my  State  of  California,  Texas, 
New  York,  Florida,  Illinois,  and  Pennsylvania.  So,  it’s  hard  to  see 
how  these  discussions  will  bear  fruit,  and  it’s  difficult,  I  think,  to 
justify tying the enactment of a permanent moratorium on new and 
discriminatory Internet taxes to this debate. 

So,  I  think  it’s  important  for  Congress—I  think  it’s  critical  for 
Congress—to  do  three  things:  reflect  our  commitment  to  universal 
broadband in America; two, provide certainty to the entire Internet 
community that access to the Net will remain tax free; and, three, 
to  ensure  that  e-commerce  in  our  country  will  remain  free  of  dis-
criminatory taxes. 

Thank  you,  again,  for  having  me  here  today.  It’s  an  honor  to 
share  the  podium  with  my  colleagues  and  to  be  with  you,  this  dis-
tinguished Committee. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Do you have any questions? 
[No response.] 
The CHAIRMAN. If not, I thank the panel very much. Thank you. 
Our next panel consists of Dr. James White, Director of Tax Pol-
icy  and  Administration  of  the  GAO;  Mr.  David  Quam,  Director  of 
Federal  Relations,  National  Governors  Association;  Mr.  Harley 
Duncan, Executive Director, Federation of Tax Administrators; Ms. 
Annabelle  Canning,  Vice  President,  State  Tax  Policy,  of  Verizon; 
and Mr. Jeff Dircksen, Director of Congressional Analysis, National 
Taxpayers Union Foundation. Welcome to the Committee. 

May I first recognize Dr. White. 

STATEMENT OF DR. JAMES R. WHITE, DIRECTOR, TAX ISSUES 

AND STRATEGIC ISSUES, GAO 

Dr.  WHITE.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  and  members  of 
the  Committee,  I’m  pleased  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing,  and 
will  focus  on  two  issues:  the  scope  of  the  moratorium  on  taxing 
Internet access and the impact of the moratorium, if any, on State 
and  local  revenues.  These  issues  are  of  concern  because  of  con-
troversy  over  exactly  what  taxes  are  covered  by  the  moratorium 
passed as part of the 1998 Internet Tax Freedom Act. 

First,  regarding  the  scope  of  the  moratorium  as  it  applies  to 
Internet  access,  what  I  say  here  is  based  on  our  reading  of  the 
plain  language  of  the  statute.  The  moratorium  bars  taxes  on  the 
service of providing Internet access to users, including whatever is 
reasonably bundled in the access package. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

My first graphic, which is also on page 19 of my statement, illus-
trates  what  can  reasonably  be  bundled  into  an  Internet  access 
package. The graphic shows an Internet access provider, such as an 
American  Online  or  Comcast,  at  the  top,  on  the  right,  and  a  wire 
or  a  cable  connecting  the  Internet  service  provider  to  a  user  in  a 
home  or  a  business.  The  pie  chart  is  a  cross-section  slice  of  the 
wire,  showing  the  various  services  that  a  provider  sells  to  users. 
One  of  those  services  is  Internet  access,  defined  in  the  law  as  a 
service that enables users to access content, information, electronic 
mail,  or  other  services  offered  over  the  Internet.  Such  an  Internet 
access package is subject to the moratorium, making it tax exempt. 
Internet  service  providers  may  sell  other  services.  These  include 
video  and  POTS,  perhaps  my  favorite  acronym,  Plain  Old  Tele-
phone  Service.  These  are  not  covered  by  the  moratorium,  they  are 
taxable. 

My  second  graphic,  which  is  on  page  20  of  my  statement,  is  an-
other  way  of  showing  what  is  subject  to  the  moratorium  on  taxing 
Internet  access.  At  the  right  is  the  end-user,  a  home,  business,  or 
school,  just  as  in  the  first  graphic.  In  the  middle  is  the  Internet 
service  provider.  As  I  have  described,  the  sale  of  Internet  access— 
the sale of an Internet access package by a provider to an end-user 
is  covered  by  the  moratorium  and  not  subject  to  tax.  On  the  left 
is  a  seller  of  various  services  to  an  Internet  service  provider.  The 
services  acquired  by  the  Internet  service  provider  could  include 
leases of high-speed communications capacity to carry traffic to the 
Internet backbone. Purchases of such acquired services may be sub-
ject  to  taxation,  depending  on  State  law,  because  the  moratorium 
only  applies  to  taxes  on  Internet  access.  In  other  words,  it  is  the 
service of providing Internet access to end-users, the transaction on 
the right, that is subject to the tax moratorium. Acquiring services 
from  suppliers,  the  transaction  on  the  left,  is  not  subject  to  the 
moratorium. 

Some  providers  and  State  officials  have  construed  the  morato-
rium as barring taxation of acquired services, reading 2004 amend-
ments  to  the  1998  Act  as  making  acquired  services  tax  exempt. 
However,  as  indicated  by  the  language  of  the  statute,  the  2004 
amendments  did  not  expand  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’; 
rather,  they  amended  the  exception  from  the  definition  of  Internet 
access  to  allow  certain  telecommunications  services  to  qualify  for 
the moratorium if they are part of the service of providing Internet 
access to users. 

A  tax  on  acquired  services,  the  transaction  on  the  left  in  the 
graphic,  is  not  a  tax  on  the  service  of  providing  Internet  access  to 
users, that transaction shown on the right. 

Now,  I  want  to  discuss  the  revenue  impact  of  the  moratorium. 
The  moratorium’s  impact  on  State  and  local  revenues  is  unclear. 
Some taxes have been collected under a grandfather clause, but the 
amounts are small. One estimate is that states with grandfathered 
Internet access taxes collected something on the order of .1 percent 
of  their  total  tax  revenue  from  such  taxes.  This  is  consistent  with 
information  we,  at  GAO,  obtained  in  case  studies  of  eight  states 
and interviews with Internet service providers. While we know that 
the  amount  actually  collected  from  grandfathered  Internet  access 
taxes is small, it is difficult to predict what states would have done 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

in the absence of the moratorium passed in 1998. As states and lo-
calities saw increased Internet use, they might have taxed Internet 
access if no moratorium had been in place. 

Any future impact of the moratorium will vary by state and also 
depend on whether grandfathering is continued. Some states might 
choose not to tax Internet access, even in the absence of a morato-
rium,  but  types  of  taxes  states  might  impose  would  also  vary.  In 
our case studies, some states taxed only services delivered to retail 
customers,  some  taxed  acquired  services,  some  taxed  both,  some 
taxed neither, and some provided exemptions—for example, to resi-
dential consumers. 

Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman, this completes my statement, 

and I’d be happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. White follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JAMES R. WHITE, DIRECTOR, TAX ISSUES AND 

STRATEGIC ISSUES, GAO 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and members of the Committee: 
I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  discuss  the  moratorium  on  taxing  access  to  the 
Internet.  According  to  one  study,  at  the  end  of  2006  about  92  million  U.S.  adults 
used the Internet on a typical day.1 As Internet usage grew from the mid-1990s on-
ward,  state  and  local  governments  imposed  some  taxes  on  it  and  considered  more. 
Concerned  about  the  impact  of  such  taxes,  Congress  extensively  debated  whether 
state  and  local  governments  should  be  allowed  to  tax  Internet  access.  The  debate 
resulted  in  legislation  setting  national  policy  on  state  and  local  taxation  of  access. 
In 1998, Congress enacted the Internet Tax Freedom Act,2 which imposed a mora-
torium  temporarily  preventing  state  and  local  governments  from  imposing  new 
taxes on Internet access or multiple or discriminatory taxes on electronic commerce. 
Existing  state  and  local  taxes  were  ‘‘grandfathered,’’  allowing  them  to  continue  to 
be collected. Since its enactment, the moratorium has been amended twice, most re-
cently  in  2004,  when  Congress  included  language  requiring  that  we  study  the  im-
pact  of  the  moratorium  on  state  and  local  government  revenues  and  on  the  deploy-
ment  and  adoption  of  broadband  technologies.3 Such  technologies  permit  commu-
nications  over  high-speed,  high-capacity  media,  such  as  that  provided  by  cable 
modem service or by a telephone technology known as digital subscriber line (DSL).4 
This year, bills have been introduced in both Houses of Congress to make the mora-
torium permanent. 

My  remarks  today  are  based  on  the  first  of  two  reports  we  issued  responding  to 
the  mandate  that  we  study  the  impact  of  the  moratorium.  Issued  in  January  2006, 
that report focused on the moratorium’s impact on state and local government reve-
nues.5 Its  objectives  were  to  determine  (1)  the  scope  of  the  moratorium  and  (2)  the 
impact  of  the  moratorium,  if  any,  on  state  and  local  revenues.  In  determining  any 
impact on revenues, the report explored what would happen if grandfathering of ac-
cess taxes on dial-up and DSL services were eliminated, what might have happened 
in the absence of the moratorium, and how the impact of the moratorium might dif-
fer  from  state  to  state.  The  report  did  not  focus  on  taxing  the  sale  of  items  over 
the  Internet.  A  second  report  discussed  the  impact  that  various  factors,  including 
taxes, have on broadband deployment and adoption.6 

To prepare the first report, we reviewed the language of the moratorium, its legis-
lative history, and associated legal issues; examined studies of revenue impact done 

2007). 

1 Pew  Internet  &  American  Life  Project,  Daily  Internet  Activities  (Washington,  D.C.:  Jan.  11, 

2 Pub. L. 105–277, 112 Stat. 2681–719 (1998), 47 U.S.C. § 151 Note. 
3 Internet Tax Nondiscrimination Act, Pub. L. 108–435, § 7, 118 Stat. 2615, 2618 (2004). 
4 DSL is a high-speed way of accessing the Internet using traditional telephone lines that have 

been ‘‘conditioned’’ to handle DSL technology. 

5 GAO,  Internet  Access  Tax  Moratorium:  Revenue  Impacts  Will  Vary  by  State,  GAO–06–273 
(Washington, D.C.: Jan. 23, 2006). See the report for more details than this testimony provides 
about  revenue  impacts  and  for  more  appendixes,  including  one  showing  comments  from  tele-
communications industry officials. 

6 GAO,  Telecommunications:  Broadband  Deployment  Is  Extensive  throughout  the  United 
States, but It Is Difficult to Assess the Extent of Deployment Gaps in Rural Areas, GAO–06–426 
(Washington, D.C.: May 5, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

by  the  Congressional  Budget  Office  (CBO)  and  others;  interviewed  representatives 
of  companies  and  associations  involved  with  Internet  access  services;  and  collected 
information  through  case  studies  of  eight  states.  We  chose  the  states  to  get  a  mix-
ture of those that did or did not have taxes grandfathered for different forms of ac-
cess  services,  did  or  did  not  have  local  jurisdictions  that  taxed  access  services,  had 
high  and  low  state  tax  revenue  dollars  per  household  and  business  entity  with 
Internet  presence,  had  high  and  low  percentages  of  households  online,  and  covered 
different  urban  and  rural  parts  of  the  country.  We  did  not  intend  the  eight  states 
to  represent  any  other  states.  In  the  course  of  our  case  studies,  state  officials  told 
us  how  they  made  the  estimates  they  gave  us  of  tax  revenues  collected  related  to 
Internet  access  and  how  firm  these  estimates  were.  We  could  not  verify  the  esti-
mates,  and,  in  doing  its  study,  CBO  supplemented  estimates  that  it  received  from 
states  with  CBO-generated  information.  Nevertheless,  based  on  other  information 
we  obtained,  the  state  estimates  we  received  appeared  to  provide  a  sense  of  the 
order of magnitude of the dollars involved. We did our work from February through 
December  2005  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted  government  auditing  stand-
ards.  A  later  section  of  this  testimony  contains  a  complete  discussion  of  our  objec-
tives, scope, and methodology. 

Let me begin by summarizing the major points of the report: 
The Internet tax moratorium bars taxes on Internet access, meaning taxes on the 
service  of  providing  Internet  access.  In  this  way,  it  prevents  services  that  are  rea-
sonably  bundled  as  part  of  an  Internet  access  package,  such  as  electronic  mail  and 
instant  messaging,  from  being  subject  to  taxes  when  sold  to  end-users.  These  tax- 
exempt  services  also  include  DSL  services  bundled  as  part  of  an  Internet  access 
package. Some states and providers have construed the moratorium as also barring 
taxation  of  what  we  call  acquired  services,  such  as  high-speed  communications  ca-
pacity over fiber, acquired by Internet service providers and used by them to deliver 
access  to  the  Internet  to  their  customers.  Because  they  believed  that  taxes  on  ac-
quired services are prohibited by the 2004 amendments, some state officials told us 
when  we  were  preparing  our  report  that  their  states  would  stop  collecting  them  as 
early  as  November  1,  2005,  the  date  they  assumed  that  taxes  on  acquired  services 
would lose their grandfathered protection. However, according to our reading of the 
law,  the  moratorium  does  not  apply  to  acquired  services  since,  among  other  things, 
a  tax  on  acquired  services  is  not  a  tax  on  ‘‘Internet  access.’’  Nontaxable  ‘‘Internet 
access’’  is  defined  in  the  law  as  the  service  of  providing  Internet  access  to  an  end- 
user;  it  does  not  extend  to  a  provider’s  acquisition  of  capacity  to  provide  such  serv-
ice.  Purchases  of  acquired  services  are  subject  to  taxation,  depending  on  state  law. 
The revenue impact of eliminating grandfathering in states studied by CBO would 
be  small,  but  the  moratorium’s  total  revenue  impact  has  been  unclear  and  any  fu-
ture  impact  would  vary  by  state.  In  2003,  CBO  reported  that  states  and  localities 
would lose from more than $160 million to more than $200 million annually by 2008 
if  all  grandfathered  taxes  on  dial-up  and  DSL  services  were  eliminated,  although 
part of this loss reflected acquired services. It also identified other potential revenue 
losses,  although  unquantified,  that  could  have  grown  in  the  future  but  that  now 
seem to pose less of a threat. CBO’s estimated annual losses by 2007 for states that 
had  grandfathered  taxes  in  1998  were  about  0.1  percent  of  the  total  2004  tax  reve-
nues  for  those  states.  Because  it  is  difficult  to  know  what  states  would  have  done 
to tax Internet access services if no moratorium had existed, the total revenue impli-
cations of the moratorium are unclear. The 1998 moratorium was considered before 
connections  to  the  Internet  were  as  widespread  as  they  later  became,  limiting  the 
window  of  opportunity  for  states  to  adopt  new  taxes  on  access  services.  Although 
some states had already chosen not to tax access services and others stopped taxing 
them, other states might have been inclined to tax access services if no moratorium 
were  in  place.  In  general,  any  future  impact  related  to  the  moratorium  will  differ 
from state to state. The details of state tax law as well as applicable tax rates varied 
from one state to another. For instance, North Dakota taxed access service delivered 
to  retail  consumers.  Kansas  taxed  communications  services  acquired  by  Internet 
service providers to support their customers. Rhode Island taxed both access service 
offerings  and  the  acquisition  of  communications  services.  California  officials  said 
their state did not tax these areas at all. 

In oral comments on a draft of our January 2006 report, CBO staff members said 
we fairly characterized CBO information and suggested clarifications that we made 
as appropriate. Federation of Tax Administrators (FTA) officials said that our legal 
conclusion  was  clearly  stated  and,  if  adopted,  would  be  helpful  in  clarifying  which 
Internet  access-related  services  are  taxable  and  which  are  not.  However,  they  ex-
pressed  concern  that  the  statute  could  be  interpreted  differently  regarding  what 
might  be  reasonably  bundled  in  providing  Internet  access  to  consumers.  A  broader 
view of what could be included in Internet access bundles would result in potential 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

revenue  losses  much  greater  than  we  indicated.  However,  as  explained  in  the  Ap-
pendix, we believe that what is bundled must be reasonably related to accessing and 
using  the  Internet.  In  written  comments,  company  representatives  disagreed  with 
GAO  by  commenting  that  the  2004  amendments  make  acquired  services  subject  to 
the moratorium and therefore not taxable, and that the language of the statute and 
the  legislative  history  support  this  position.  While  we  acknowledge  that  there  are 
different  views  about  the  scope  of  the  moratorium,  our  view  is  based  on  the  lan-
guage and structure of the statute. 

We  made  no  recommendations  in  the  report,  and  we  are  not  making  any  rec-

ommendations in this testimony. 
Background 

As  shown  in  figure  1,  residential  and  small  business  users  often  connect  to  an 
Internet  service  provider  (ISP)  to  access  the  Internet.  Well-known  ISPs  include 
America  Online  (AOL)  and  Comcast.  Typically,  ISPs  market  a  package  of  services 
that  provide  homes  and  businesses  with  a  pathway,  or  ‘‘on-ramp,’’  to  the  Internet 
along with services such as e-mail and instant messaging. The ISP sends the user’s 
Internet  traffic  forward  to  a  backbone  network  where  the  traffic  can  be  connected 
to other backbone networks and carried over long distances. By contrast, large busi-
nesses  often  maintain  their  own  internal  networks  and  may  buy  capacity  from  ac-
cess providers that connect their networks directly to an Internet backbone network. 
We  are  using  the  term  access  providers  to  include  ISPs  as  well  as  providers  who 
sell access to large businesses and other users. Nonlocal traffic from both large busi-
nesses and ISPs connects to a backbone provider’s network at a ‘‘point of presence’’ 
(POP). Figure 1 depicts two hypothetical and simplified Internet backbone networks 
that  link  at  interconnection  points  and  take  traffic  to  and  from  residential  units 
through ISPs and directly from large business users. 

As  public  use  of  the  Internet  grew  from  the  mid-1990s  onward,  Internet  access 
and electronic commerce became potential targets for state and local taxation. Ideas 
for taxation ranged from those that merely extended existing sales or gross receipts 
taxes  to  so-called  ‘‘bit  taxes,’’  which  would  measure  Internet  usage  and  tax  in  pro-
portion to use. Some state and local governments raised additional tax revenues and 
applied  existing  taxes  to  Internet  transactions.  Owing  to  the  Internet’s  inherently 
interstate  nature  and  to  issues  related  to  taxing  Internet-related  activities,  concern 
arose  in  Congress  as  to  what  impact  state  and  local  taxation  might  have  on  the 
Internet’s  growth,  and  thus,  on  electronic  commerce.  Congress  addressed  this  con-
cern when, in 1998, it adopted the Internet Tax Freedom Act, which bars state and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
o
a
g
3
2
5

17 

local  taxes  on  Internet  access,  as  well  as  multiple  or  discriminatory  taxes  on  elec-
tronic commerce.7 

Internet usage grew rapidly in the years following 1998, and the technology to ac-
cess  the  Internet  changed  markedly.  Today  a  significant  portion  of  users,  including 
home  users,  access  the  Internet  over  broadband  communications  services  using 
cable  modem,  DSL,  or  wireless  technologies.  Fewer  and  fewer  users  rely  on  dial-up 
connections through which they connect to their ISP by dialing a telephone number. 
By 2004, some state tax authorities were taxing DSL service, which they considered 
to be a telecommunications service, creating a distinction between DSL and services 
offered through other technologies, such as cable modem, that were not taxed. 

Originally designed to postpone the addition of any new taxes while the Advisory 
Commission  on  Electronic  Commerce  studied  the  tax  issue  and  reported  to  Con-
gress,  the  moratorium  was  extended  in  2001  for  2  years 8 and  again  in  2004,  retro-
actively,  to  remain  in  force  until  November  1,  2007.9 The  2001  extension  made  no 
other changes to the original Act, but the 2004 Act included clarifying amendments. 
The  2004  act  amended  language  that  had  exempted  telecommunications  services 
from the moratorium. Recognizing state and local concerns about their ability to tax 
voice  services  provided  over  the  Internet,  it  also  contained  language  allowing  tax-
ation  of  telephone  service  using  Voice  over  Internet  Protocol  (VoIP).  Although  the 
2004  amendments  extended  grandfathered  protection  generally  to  November  2007, 
grandfathering extended only to November 2005 for taxes subject to the new mora-
torium but not to the original moratorium. 
Objectives, Scope, and Methodology 

To determine the scope of the Internet tax moratorium, we reviewed the language 
of  the  moratorium,  the  legislative  history  of  the  1998  Act  and  the  2004  amend-
ments, and associated legal issues. 

To  determine  the  impact  of  the  moratorium  on  state  and  local  revenues,  we 
worked in stages. First, we reviewed studies of revenue impact done by CBO, FTA, 
and  the  staff  of  the  Multistate  Tax  Commission  and  discussed  relevant  issues  with 
Federal  representatives,  state  and  local  government  and  industry  associations,  and 
companies  providing  Internet  access  services.  Then,  we  used  structured  interviews 
to do case studies in eight states that we chose as described earlier. We did not in-
tend the eight states to represent any other states. 

For  each  selected  state,  we  focused  on  specific  aspects  of  its  tax  system  by  using 
our structured interview and collecting relevant documentation. For instance, we re-
viewed  the  types  and  structures  of  Internet  access  service  taxes,  the  revenues  col-
lected from those taxes, officials’ views of the significance of the moratorium to their 
government’s  financial  situation,  and  their  opinions  of  any  implications  to  their 
states  of  the  new  definition  of  Internet  access.  We  also  learned  whether  localities 
within the states were taxing access services. When issues arose, we contacted other 
states and localities to increase our understanding of these issues. 

We  discussed  with  state  officials  how  they  derived  the  estimates  they  gave  us  of 
tax dollars collected and how firm these numbers were. We could not verify the esti-
mates, and CBO supplemented estimates that it received from states. Nevertheless, 
based  on  other  information  we  obtained,  the  state  estimates  appeared  to  provide  a 
sense of the order of magnitude of the numbers compared to state tax revenues. 

We  did  our  work  from  February  through  December  2005  in  accordance  with  gen-

erally accepted government auditing standards. 

7 A  tax  is  a  multiple  tax  if  credit  is  not  given  for  comparable  taxes  paid  to  other  states  on 
the  same  transaction;  a  tax  is  a  discriminatory  tax  if  e-commerce  transactions  are  taxed  at  a 
higher  rate  than  comparable  nonelectronic  transactions  would  be  taxed,  or  are  required  to  be 
collected  by  different  parties  or  under  other  terms  that  are  more  disadvantageous  than  those 
that  are  applied  in  taxing  other  types  of  comparable  transactions.  Generally,  states  and  local-
ities  that  tax  e-commerce  impose  comparable  taxes  on  nonelectronic  transactions.  States  that 
have sought at one time to require that access providers collect taxes due—a process that might 
have  been  thought  to  have  been  discriminatory—have  backed  away  from  that  position.  More-
over,  although  interstate  commerce  may  bear  its  fair  share  of  state  taxes,  the  interstate  com-
merce  clause  of  the  Constitution  requires  there  to  be  a  substantial  nexus,  fair  apportionment, 
nondiscrimination,  and  a  relationship  between  a  tax  and  state-provided  services  that  largely 
constrains  the  states  in  imposing  such  taxes.  Quill  Corp.  v.  North  Dakota,  504  U.S.  298,  313 
(1992). In any case, our report did not focus on taxing the sale of items over the Internet. 

8 Internet Tax Nondiscrimination Act, 2001, Pub. L. 107–75, § 2, 115 Stat. 703. 
9 Internet  Tax  Nondiscrimination  Act,  2004,  Pub.  L.  108–435,  §§ 2  to  6A,  118  Stat.  2615  to 

2618. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Internet  Access  Services,  Including  Bundled  Access  Services,  May  Not  Be 

Taxed, but Acquired Services May Be 

The  moratorium  bars  taxes  on  the  service  of  providing  access,  which  includes 
whatever an access provider reasonably bundles in its access offering to consumers. 
On the other hand, the moratorium does not prohibit taxes on acquired services, re-
ferring to goods and services that an access provider acquires to enable it to bundle 
and provide its access package to its customers. However, some providers and state 
officials have expressed a different view, believing the moratorium barred taxing ac-
quired services in addition to bundled access services. 
Internet Access Services, Including Bundled Broadband Services, May Not Be Taxed 
Since its 1998 origin, the moratorium has always prohibited taxing the service of 
providing Internet access, including component services that an access provider rea-
sonably  bundles  in  its  access  offering  to  consumers.  However,  as  amended  in  2004, 
the  definition  of  Internet  access  contains  additional  words.  With  words  added  in 
2004 in italics, it now defines the scope of nontaxable Internet access as: 

‘‘a  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  information,  electronic  mail,  or 
other  services  offered  over  the  Internet,  and  may  also  include  access  to  propri-
etary  content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of  a  package  of  services 
offered to users. The term ‘Internet access’ does not include telecommunications 
services, except to the extent such services are purchased, used, or sold by a pro-
vider of Internet access to provide Internet access.’’ 10 (italics provided): 

As  shown  in  the  simplified  illustration  in  figure  2,  the  items  reasonably  bundled 
in a tax-exempt Internet access package may include e-mail, instant messaging, and 
Internet access itself. Internet access, in turn, includes broadband services, such as 
cable  modem  and  DSL  services,  which  provide  continuous,  high-speed  access  with-
out  tying  up  wireline  telephone  service.  As  figure  2  also  illustrates,  a  tax-exempt 
bundle  does  not  include  video,  traditional  wireline  telephone  service  referred  to  as 
‘‘plain old telephone service’’ (POTS), or VoIP. These services are subject to tax. For 
simplicity,  the  figure  shows  a  number  of  services  transmitted  over  one  communica-
tions  line.  In  reality,  a  line  to  a  consumer  may  support  just  one  service  at  a  time, 
as is typically the case for POTS, or it may simultaneously support a variety of serv-
ices, such as television, Internet access, and VoIP. 

10 47 U.S.C. § 151 Note § 1105(5). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Our  reading  of  the  1998  law  and  the  relevant  legislative  history  indicates  that 
Congress had intended to bar taxes on services bundled with access. However, there 
were  different  interpretations  about  whether  DSL  service  could  be  taxed  under  ex-
isting law, and some states taxed DSL. The 2004 amendment was aimed at making 
sure that DSL service bundled with access could not be taxed. See the Appendix for 
further explanation. 
Acquired Services May Be Taxed 

Figure 3 shows how the nature and tax status of the Internet access services just 
described differ from the nature and tax status of services that an ISP acquires and 
uses  to  deliver  access  to  its  customers.  An  ISP  in  the  middle  of  figure  3  acquires 
communications  and  other  services  and  incidental  supplies  (shown  on  the  left  side 
of  the  figure)  in  order  to  deliver  access  services  to  customers  (shown  on  the  right 
side of the figure). We refer to the acquisitions on the left side as purchases of ‘‘ac-
quired  services.’’ 11 For  example,  acquired  services  include  ISP  leases  of  high-speed 
communications  capacity  over  wire,  cable,  or  fiber  to  carry  traffic  from  customers 
to the Internet backbone. 

11 Some  have  also  used  the  term  wholesale  to  describe  acquired  services.  For  example,  the 
New  Millennium  Research  Council  in  Taxing  High-Speed  Services  (Washington,  D.C.:  Apr.  26, 
2004) said that ‘‘wholesale services that telecommunications firms provide ISPs can include local 
connections  to  the  customer’s  premise,  high-capacity  transport  between  network  points  and 
backbone  services.’’  We  avoid  using  the  term,  however,  because  it  suggests  a  particular  sales 
relationship (between wholesaler and retailer) that may be limiting and misleading. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
o
a
g
3
2
5

20 

Purchases of acquired services are subject to taxation, depending on state law, be-
cause the moratorium does not apply to acquired services. As noted above, the mora-
torium  applies  only  to  taxes  imposed  on  ‘‘Internet  access,’’  which  is  defined  in  the 
law  as  ‘‘a  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  information,  electronic  mail, 
or  other  services  offered  over  the  Internet.  . . .’’  In  other  words,  it  is  the  service 
of  providing  Internet  access  to  the  end-user—not  the  acquisition  of  capacity  to  do 
so—that constitutes ‘‘Internet access’’ subject to the moratorium. 

Some providers and state officials have construed the moratorium as barring tax-
ation  of  acquired  services,  reading  the  2004  amendments  as  making  acquired  serv-
ices  tax  exempt.  However,  as  indicated  by  the  language  of  the  statute,  the  2004 
amendments did not expand the definition of ‘‘Internet access,’’ but rather amended 
the  exception  from  the  definition  to  allow  certain  ‘‘telecommunication  services’’  to 
qualify  for  the  moratorium  if  they  are  part  of  the  service  of  providing  Internet  ac-
cess.  A  tax  on  acquired  services  is  not  a  tax  directly  imposed  on  the  service  of  pro-
viding Internet access. 

Our  view  that  acquired  services  are  not  subject  to  the  moratorium  on  taxing 
Internet  access  is  based  on  the  language  and  structure  of  the  statute,  as  described 
further in the Appendix. We acknowledge that others have different views about the 
scope  of  the  moratorium.  Congress  could,  of  course,  deal  with  this  issue  by  amend-
ing the statute to explicitly address the tax status of acquired services. 
Some States Have Applied the Moratorium to Acquired Services 

As noted above, some providers and state officials have construed the moratorium 
as barring taxation of acquired services. Some provider representatives said that ac-
quired services were not taxable at the time we contacted them and had never been 
taxable.  Others  said  that  acquired  services  were  taxable  when  we  contacted  them 
but  would  become  tax  exempt  in  November  2005  under  the  2004  amendments,  the 
date  they  assumed  that  taxes  on  acquired  services  would  no  longer  be  grand-
fathered. 

As  shown  in  table  1,  officials  from  four  out  of  the  eight  states  we  studied—Kan-
sas, Mississippi, Ohio, and Rhode Island—also said their states would stop collecting 
taxes on acquired services, as of November 1, 2005, in the case of Kansas and Ohio 
whose  collections  have  actually  stopped,  and  later  for  the  others.  These  states 
roughly  estimated  the  cost  of  this  change  to  them  to  be  a  little  more  than  $40  mil-
lion in revenues that were collected in 2004. An Ohio official indicated that two com-
ponents comprised most of the dollar amounts of taxes collected from these services 
in 2004: $20.5 million from taxes on telecommunications services and property pro-
vided to ISPs and Internet backbone providers, and $9.1 million from taxes for pri-
vate line services (such as high-capacity T–1 and T–3 lines) and 800/wide-area tele-
communications  services  that  the  official  said  would  be  exempt  due  to  the  morato-
rium.  The  rough  estimates  in  table  1  are  subject  to  the  same  limitations  described 
in  the  next  section  for  the  state  estimates  of  all  taxes  collected  related  to  Internet 
access. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
o
a
g
3
2
5

21 

Table 1: Summary of Case Study State Rough Estimates of 2004 Tax Revenue from Acquired Services 

State 

California 

Kansas 

Mississippi 

North Dakota 

Ohio 

Rhode Island 

Texas 

Virginia 

Collected taxes paid on 
acquired services 

2004 revenue from taxes paid on acquired services 
(dollars in millions) 

x 

x 

x 

x 

$0 

9–10 

At most, 1 

0 

32.3 

Insignificant compared to total telecommunications tax revenues 

0 

0 

Source:  State  officials. 
Note:  The  next  section  contains  a  discussion  of  general  limitations  of  the  state  estimates  of  revenue  from  taxes. 

While the Revenue Impact of Eliminating Grandfathering Would Be Small, 
the  Moratorium’s  Total  Revenue  Impact  Has  Been  Unclear  and  Any 
Future Impact Would Vary by State 

According  to  CBO  data,  grandfathered  taxes  in  the  states  CBO  studied  were  a 
small  percentage  of  those  states’  tax  revenues.  However,  because  it  is  difficult  to 
know  which  states,  if  any,  might  have  chosen  to  tax  Internet  access  services  and 
what  taxes  they  might  have  chosen  to  use  if  no  moratorium  had  ever  existed,  the 
total revenue implications of the moratorium are unclear. In general, any future im-
pact related to the moratorium will differ from state to state. 
According  to  Information  in  CBO  Reports,  States  Would  Lose  a  Small  Fraction  of 
Their  Tax  Revenues  if  Grandfathered  Taxes  on  Dial-up  and  DSL  Services  Were 
Eliminated 

In  2003,  CBO  reported  how  much  state  and  local  governments  that  had  grand-
fathered  taxes  on  dial-up  and  DSL  services  would  lose  in  revenues  if  the 
grandfathering  were  eliminated.  The  fact  that  these  estimates  represented  a  small 
fraction  of  state  tax  revenues  is  consistent  with  other  information  we  obtained.  In 
addition,  the  enacted  legislation  was  narrower  than  what  CBO  reviewed,  meaning 
that  CBO’s  stated  concerns  about  VoIP  and  taxing  providers’  income  and  assets 
would have dissipated. 

CBO  provided  two  estimates  in  2003  that,  when  totaled,  showed  that  no  longer 
allowing  grandfathered  dial-up  and  DSL  service  taxes  would  cause  state  and  local 
governments  to  lose  from  more  than  $160  million  to  more  than  $200  million  annu-
ally  by  2008.  According  to  a  CBO  staff  member,  this  estimate  included  some 
amounts for what we are calling acquired services that, as discussed in the previous 
section, would not have to be lost. CBO provided no estimates of revenues involved 
for  governments  not  already  assessing  the  taxes  and  said  it  could  not  estimate  the 
size of any additional impacts on state and local revenues of the change in the defi-
nition  of  Internet  access.  Further,  according  to  a  CBO  staff  member,  CBO’s  esti-
mates did not include any lost revenues from taxes on cable modem services. In Oc-
tober 2003, around the time of CBO’s estimates, the number of cable home Internet 
connections  was  12.6  million,  compared  to  9.3  million  home  DSL  connections  and 
38.6 million home dial-up connections. 

CBO  first  estimated  that  as  many  as  10  states  and  several  local  governments 
would  lose  $80  million  to  $120  million  annually,  beginning  in  2007,  if  the  1998 
grandfather  clause  were  repealed.  Its  second  estimate  showed  that,  by  2008,  state 
and local governments would likely lose more than $80 million per year from taxes 
on DSL service.12 

The  CBO  numbers  are  a  small  fraction  of  total  state  tax  revenue  amounts.  For 
example,  the  $80  million  to  $120  million  estimate  for  the  states  with  originally 

12 The more than $80 million per year is the amount of revenue that CBO expected state and 
local governments to collect on DSL service and some acquired services by 2008. If the jurisdic-
tions  had  recognized  that  the  reason  for  the  2004  amendments  was  largely  moot,  and  if  they 
had  not  been  collecting  taxes  on  DSL  service  in  the  first  place,  they  would  not  have  had  part 
of the $80 million to lose. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

grandfathered  taxes  for  2007  was  about  0.1  percent  of  tax  revenues  in  those  states 
for 2004—3 years earlier. 

The  fact  that  CBO  estimates  are  a  small  part  of  state  tax  revenues  is  consistent 
with  information  we  obtained  from  our  state  case  studies  and  interviews  with  pro-
viders. For instance, after telling us whether various access-related services, includ-
ing  cable  modem  service,  were  subject  to  taxation  in  their  jurisdictions,  the  states 
collecting taxes gave us rough estimates of how much access-service related tax rev-
enues  they  collected  for  2004  for  themselves  and  their  localities,  if  applicable.  (See 
table 2). All except two collected $10 million or less. 

Table 2: Case Study State Officials’ Rough Estimates of Taxes Collected for 2004 Related to Internet Access 

State 

California 

Kansas 

Mississippi 

North Dakota 

Ohio 

Estimated taxes collected (dollars in millions) 

N/A 

$9–10 

At most, 1 a 

2.4 

52.1 

Rhode Island 

Less than 4.5 b 

Texas 

Virginia 

50 c 

N/A 

Source:  State  officials. 
Note:  The  accompanying  text  contains  a  discussion  of  general  limitations  of  the  state  estimates  of  revenue  from  taxes. 
a According  to  a  Mississippi  official,  although  estimating  a  dollar  amount  would  be  extremely  hard,  the  state  believes  the  amount 

collected  was  at  most  $1  million. 

b Rhode  Island  officials  told  us  that  taxes  collected  on  access  were  taxes  paid  on  services  to  retail  consumers,  and  Rhode  Island 

did  not  have  an  estimate  for  taxes  collected  on  acquired  services. 

c Texas  officials  did  not  provide  us  with  an  estimate  of  taxes  collected  for  Texas  localities. 
The  states  made  their  estimates  by  assuming,  for  instance,  that  access  service- 
related  tax  revenues  were  a  certain  percentage  of  state  telecommunications  sales 
tax  revenues,  by  reviewing  providers’  returns,  or  by  making  various  calculations 
starting with census data. Most estimates provided us were more ballpark approxi-
mations  than  precise  computations,  and  CBO  staff  expressed  a  healthy  skepticism 
toward  some  state  estimates  they  received.  They  said  that  the  supplemental  state- 
by-state  information  they  developed  sometimes  produced  lower  estimates  than  the 
states  provided.  According  to  others  knowledgeable  in  the  area,  estimates  provided 
us were imprecise because when companies filed sales or gross receipts tax returns 
with  states,  they  did  not  have  to  specifically  identify  the  amount  of  taxes  they  re-
ceived from providing Internet access-related services to retail consumers or to other 
providers.  As  discussed  earlier,  sales  to  other  providers  remain  subject  to  taxation, 
depending  on  state  law.  Some  providers  told  us  they  did  not  keep  records  in  such 
a way as to be able to readily provide that kind of information. Also, although states 
reviewed  tax  compliance  by  auditing  taxpayers,  they  could  not  audit  all  providers. 
The dollar amounts in table 2 include amounts, where provided, for local govern-
ments  within  the  states.  For  instance,  Kansas’s  total  includes  about  $2  million  for 
localities.  In  this  state  as  well  as  in  others  we  studied,  local  jurisdictions  were 
piggybacking  on  the  state  taxes,  although  the  local  tax  rates  could  differ  from  each 
other. 

State tax officials from our case study states who commented to us on the impacts 
of  the  revenue  amounts  did  not  consider  them  significant.  Similarly,  state  officials 
voiced concerns but did not cite nondollar specifics when describing any possible im-
pact  on  their  state  finances  arising  from  no  longer  taxing  Internet  access  services. 
However,  one  noted  that  taking  away  Internet  access  as  a  source  of  revenue  was 
another  step  in  the  erosion  of  the  state’s  tax  base.13 Other  state  and  local  officials 
observed  that  if  taxation  of  Internet  access  were  eliminated,  the  state  or  locality 
would  have  to  act  somehow  to  continue  meeting  its  requirement  for  a  balanced 
budget. At the local level, officials told us that a revenue decrease would reduce the 
amount  of  road  maintenance  that  could  be  done  or  could  adversely  affect  the  num-
ber of employees available for providing government services. 

13 In the debate leading to the 2004 amendments’ passage, critics had expressed concern that 

the Federal Government was interfering with state and local revenue-raising ability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Timing of Moratorium Might Have Precluded Many States From Taxing Access Serv-

ices, with Unclear Revenue Implications 

23 

Because  it  is  difficult  to  predict  what  states  would  have  done  to  tax  Internet  ac-
cess  services  had  Congress  not  intervened  when  it  did,  it  is  hard  to  estimate  the 
amount of revenue that was not raised because of the moratorium. For instance, at 
the  time  the  first  moratorium  was  being  considered  in  1998,  the  Department  of 
Commerce  reported  Internet  connections  for  less  than  a  fifth  of  U.S.  households, 
much less than the half of U.S. households reported 6 years later. Access was typi-
cally  dial-up.  As  states  and  localities  saw  the  level  of  Internet  connections  rising 
and other technologies becoming available, they might have taxed access services if 
no  moratorium  had  been  in  place.  Taxes  could  have  taken  different  forms.  For  ex-
ample,  jurisdictions  might  have  even  adopted  bit  taxes  based  on  the  volume  of  dig-
ital information transmitted. 

The  number  of  states  collecting  taxes  on  access  services  when  the  first  morato-
rium  was  being  considered  in  early  1998  was  relatively  small,  with  13  states  and 
the  District  of  Columbia  collecting  these  taxes,  according  to  the  Congressional  Re-
search  Service.  Five  of  those  jurisdictions  later  eliminated  or  chose  not  to  enforce 
their  tax.  In  addition,  not  all  37  other  states  would  have  taxed  access  services  re-
lated  to  the  Internet  even  if  they  could  have.  For  example,  California  had  already 
passed its own Internet tax moratorium in August 1998. 

Given  that  some  states  never  taxed  access  services  while  relatively  few  Internet 
connections existed, that some stopped taxing access services, and that others taxed 
DSL service, it is unclear what jurisdictions would have done if no moratorium had 
existed. However, the relatively early initiation of a moratorium reduced the oppor-
tunity  for  states  inclined  to  tax  access  services  to  do  so  before  Internet  connections 
became more widespread. 
Any Future Impact of the Moratorium Will Vary by State 

Although  as  previously  noted  the  impact  of  eliminating  grandfathering  would  be 
small  in  states  studied  by  CBO  or  by  us,  any  future  impact  related  to  the  morato-
rium  will  vary  on  a  state-by-state  basis  for  many  reasons.  State  tax  laws  differed 
significantly from each other, and states and providers disagreed on how state laws 
applied to the providers. 

As  shown  in  table  3,  states  taxed  Internet  access  using  different  tax  vehicles  im-
posed on diverse tax bases at various rates. The tax used might be generally appli-
cable to a variety of goods and services, as in Kansas, which did not impose a sepa-
rate  tax  on  communications  services.  There,  the  state’s  general  sales  tax  applied  to 
the  purchase  of  communications  services  by  access  providers  at  an  average  rate  of 
6.6 percent, combining state and average local tax rates. As another example, North 
Dakota imposed a sales tax on retail consumers’ communications services, including 
Internet  access  services,  at  an  average  state  and  local  combined  rate  of  6  percent. 

Table 3: Characteristics Showing Variations among Case Study States 

State 

Type of tax a 

California 

N/A 

Kansas 

Sales 

Mississippi 

Gross income 

North Dakota  Sales 

Ohio 

Sales 

Rhode Island  Gross receipts 

and sales 

Texas 

Sales 

Virginia 

N/A 

Taxing retail 
consumer Internet 
access services 

Taxing acquired 
services 

State tax rate 
(percentage) 

Local tax rate 
(percentage) 

Exemptions of 
customer types 
or payment 
amounts 

x 

x 

x 

x 

x 

x 

x b 

x 

N/A 

5.3 

7.0 

5.0 

5.5 

N/A 

1.3 on average 

N/A 

1.0–2.0 

1.0 on average 

Residential 
consumers 

5.0, 6.0 

N/A 

6.25 

N/A 

2.0 limit 

N/A 

First $25 of 
services 

Source: State officials and laws. 
a For  purposes  of  this  testimony,  a  reference  to  a  sales  tax  includes  any  ancillary  use  tax.  Also  for  our  purposes,  the  difference  be-
tween a sales and a gross receipts tax is largely a distinction without a difference since the moratorium does not differentiate between 
them. 

b Rhode Island retail consumers did not pay this tax directly, but rather through the gross receipts tax paid by their providers. 
Our  case  study  states  showed  little  consistency  in  the  base  they  taxed  in  taxing 
services  related  to  Internet  access.  States  imposed  taxes  on  different  transactions 
and populations. North Dakota and Texas taxed only services delivered to retail con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

sumers. In a type of transaction which, as discussed earlier, we do not view as sub-
ject  to  the  moratorium,  Kansas  and  Mississippi  taxed  acquired  communications 
services purchased by access providers. Ohio and Rhode Island taxed both the provi-
sion  of  access  services  and  acquired  services,  and  California  and  Virginia  officials 
told  us  their  states  taxed  neither.  States  also  provided  various  exemptions  from 
their  taxes.  Ohio  exempted  residential  consumers,  but  not  businesses,  from  its  tax 
on  access  services,  and  Texas  exempted  the  first  $25  of  monthly  Internet  access 
service charges from taxation. 

Some state and local officials and company representatives held different opinions 
about whether certain taxes were grandfathered and about whether the moratorium 
applied  in  various  circumstances.  For  example,  some  providers’  officials  questioned 
whether  taxes  in  North  Dakota,  Wisconsin,  and  certain  cities  in  Colorado  were 
grandfathered,  and  whether  those  jurisdictions  were  permitted  to  continue  taxing. 
Providers  disagreed  among  themselves  about  how  to  comply  with  the  tax  law  of 
states  whose  taxes  may  or  may  not  have  been  grandfathered.  Some  providers  told 
us  they  collected  and  remitted  taxes  to  the  states  even  when  they  were  uncertain 
whether  these  actions  were  necessary;  however,  they  told  us  of  others  that  did  not 
make  payments  to  the  taxing  states  in  similarly  uncertain  situations.  In  its  2003 
work,  CBO  had  said  that  some  companies  challenged  the  applicability  of  Internet 
access  taxes  to  the  service  they  provided  and  thus  might  not  have  been  collecting 
or remitting them even though the states believed they should. 

Because of all these state-by-state differences and uncertainties, the impact of fu-
ture  changes  related  to  the  moratorium  would  vary  by  state.  Whether  the  morato-
rium  were  lifted  or  made  permanent  and  whether  grandfathering  were  continued 
or eliminated, states would be affected differently from each other. 
External Comments 

We  showed  staff  members  of  CBO,  officials  of  FTA,  and  representatives  of  tele-
communications  companies  assembled  by  the  United  States  Telecom  Association  a 
draft of our January 2006 report and asked for oral comments. On January 5, 2006, 
CBO  staff  members,  including  the  Chief  of  the  State  and  Local  Government  Unit, 
Cost  Estimates  Unit,  said  we  fairly  characterized  CBO  information  and  suggested 
clarifications that we made as appropriate. In one case, we noted more clearly that 
CBO  supplemented  its  dollar  estimates  of  revenue  impact  with  a  statement  that 
other potential revenue losses could potentially grow by an unquantified amount. 

On January 6, 2006, FTA officials, including the Executive Director, said that our 
legal  conclusion  was  clearly  stated  and,  if  adopted,  would  be  helpful  in  clarifying 
which Internet access-related services are taxable and which are not. However, they 
expressed  concern  that  the  statute  could  be  interpreted  differently  regarding  what 
might  be  reasonably  bundled  in  providing  Internet  access  to  consumers.  A  broader 
view of what could be included in Internet access bundles would result in potential 
revenue losses much greater than we indicated. However, as explained in the appen-
dix,  we  believe  that  what  is  bundled  must  be  reasonably  related  to  accessing  and 
using  the  Internet.  FTA  officials  were  also  concerned  that  our  reading  of  the  1998 
law  regarding  the  taxation  of  DSL  services  is  debatable  and  suggests  that  states 
overreached  by  taxing  them.  We  recognize  that  Congress  acted  in  2004  to  address 
different  interpretations  of  the  statute,  and  we  made  some  changes  to  clarify  our 
presentation. We acknowledge there were different views on this matter, and we are 
not attributing any improper intent to the states’ actions. 

When  meeting  with  us,  representatives  of  telecommunications  companies  said 
they would like to submit comments in writing. Their comments argue that the 2004 
amendments  make  acquired  services  subject  to  the  moratorium  and  therefore  not 
taxable, and that the language of the statute and the legislative history support this 
position. In response, we made some changes to simplify the appendix. That appen-
dix, along with the section of the testimony on bundled access services and acquired 
services, contains an explanation of our view that the language and structure of the 
statute support our interpretation. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  this  con-
cludes  my  testimony.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  may  have  at 
this time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

APPENDIX I: BUNDLED ACCESS SERVICES MAY NOT BE TAXED, BUT ACQUIRED 

SERVICES ARE TAXABLE 

The  moratorium  bars  taxes  on  the  service  of  providing  access,  which  includes 
whatever an access provider reasonably bundles in its access offering to consumers.1 
On the other hand, the moratorium does not bar taxes on acquired services. 
Bundled Services, Including Broadband Services, May Not Be Taxed 

As  noted  earlier,  the  2004  amendments  followed  a  period  of  significant  growth 
and technological development related to the Internet. By 2004, broadband commu-
nications  technologies  were  becoming  more  widely  available.  They  could  provide 
greatly  enhanced  access  compared  to  the  dial-up  access  technologies  widely  used  in 
1998.  These  broadband  technologies,  which  include  cable  modem  service  built  upon 
digital cable television infrastructure as well as digital subscriber line (DSL) service, 
provide  continuous,  high-speed  Internet  access  without  tying  up  wireline  telephone 
service. Indeed, cable and DSL facilities could support multiple services—television, 
Internet  access,  and  telephone  services—over  common  coaxial  cable,  fiber,  and  cop-
per wire media. 

The Internet Tax Freedom Act bars ‘‘taxes on Internet access’’ and defines ‘‘Inter-
net access’’ as a service that enables ‘‘users to access content, information, electronic 
mail,  or  other  services  offered  over  the  Internet.’’  The  term  Internet  access  as  used 
in  this  context  includes  ‘‘access  to  proprietary  content,  information,  and  other  serv-
ices  as  part  of  a  package  of  services  offered  to  users.’’  The  original  Act  expressly 
excluded ‘‘telecommunications services’’ from the definition.2 As will be seen, the act 
barred jurisdictions from taxing services such as e-mail and instant messaging bun-
dled  by  providers  as  part  of  their  Internet  access  package;  however,  it  permitted 
dial-up telephone service, which was usually provided separately, to be taxed. 

The  original  definition  of  Internet  access,  exempting  ‘‘telecommunications  serv-
ices,’’ was changed by the 2004 amendment. Parties seeking to carve out exceptions 
that could be taxed had sought to break out and treat DSL services as telecommuni-
cations  services,  claiming  the  services  were  exempt  from  the  moratorium  even 
though  they  were  bundled  as  part  of  an  Internet  access  package.  State  and  local 
tax  authorities  began  taxing  DSL  service,  creating  a  distinction  between  DSL  and 
services offered using other technologies, such as cable modem service, a competing 
method of providing Internet access that was not to be taxed. The 2004 amendment 
was aimed at making sure that DSL service bundled with access could not be taxed. 
The  amendment  excluded  from  the  telecommunications  services  exemption  tele-
communications services that were ‘‘purchased, used, or sold by a provider of Inter-
net access to provide Internet access.’’ 

The  fact  that  the  original  1998  Act  exempted  telecommunications  services  shows 
that  other  reasonably  bundled  services  remained  a  part  of  Internet  access  service 
and,  therefore,  subject  to  the  moratorium.  Thus,  communications  services  such  as 
cable  modem  services  that  are  not  classified  as  telecommunications  services  are  in-
cluded under the moratorium. 
Acquired Services May Be Taxed 

As  emphasized  by  numerous  judicial  decisions,  we  begin  the  task  of  construing 
a statute with the language of the statute itself, applying the canon of statutory con-
struction  known  as  the  plain  meaning  rule.  E.g.,  Hartford  Underwriter  Insurance 
Co.  v.  Union  Planers  Bank,  N.A.,  530  U.S.  1  (2000);  Robinson  v.  Shell  Oil  Co.,  519 
U.S. 337 (1997). Singer, 2A, Sutherland Statutory Construction, §§ 46:1, 48A:11, 15– 
16. Thus, under the plain meaning rule, the primary means for Congress to express 
its  intent  is  the  words  it  enacts  into  law  and  interpretations  of  the  statute  should 
rely upon and flow from the language of the statute. 

As  noted  above,  the  moratorium  applies  to  the  ‘‘taxation  of  Internet  access.’’  Ac-
cording to the statute, ‘‘Internet access’’ means a service that enables users to access 
content,  information,  or  other  services  over  the  Internet.  The  definition  excludes 
‘‘telecommunications services’’ and, as amended in 2004, limits that exclusion by ex-

1 Notwithstanding fears expressed by some during consideration of the 2004 amendments, this 
does  not  mean  that  anything  may  be  bundled  and  thus  become  tax  exempt.  Clearly,  what  is 
bundled  must  be  reasonably  related  to  accessing  and  using  the  Internet,  including  electronic 
services  that  are  customarily  furnished  by  providers.  In  this  regard,  it  is  fundamental  that  a 
construction  of  a  statute  cannot  be  sustained  that  would  otherwise  result  in  unreasonable  or 
absurd consequences. Singer, 2A, Sutherland Statutory Construction, § 45:12 (6th ed., 2005). 

2 The 1998 Act defined Internet access as ‘‘a service that enables users to access content, infor-
mation, electronic mail, or other services offered over the Internet, and may also include access 
to  proprietary  content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of  a  package  of  services  offered 
to users. Such term [Internet access] does not include telecommunications services.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

empting  services  ‘‘purchased,  used,  or  sold’’  by  a  provider  of  Internet  access.  As 
amended in 2004, the statute now reads as follows: 

‘‘The term ‘Internet access’ means a service that enables users to access content, 
information, electronic mail, or other services offered over the Internet. . . . The 
term  ‘Internet  access’  does  not  include  telecommunications  services,  except  to 
the  extent  such  services  are  purchased,  used,  or  sold  by  a  provider  of  Internet 
access to provide Internet access.’’ Section 1105(5).’’ 

The  language  added  in  2004—exempting  from  ‘‘telecommunications  services’’ 
those  services  that  are  ‘‘purchased,  used,  or  sold’’  by  a  provider  in  offering  Internet 
access—has been read by some as expanding the ‘‘Internet access’’ to which the tax 
moratorium applies, by barring taxes on ‘‘acquired services.’’ Those who would read 
the  moratorium  expansively  take  the  view  that  everything  acquired  by  Internet 
service providers (ISP) (everything on the left side of figure 3) as well as everything 
furnished by them (everything in the middle of figure 3) is exempt from tax. 

In  our  view,  the  language  and  structure  of  the  statute  do  not  permit  the  expan-
sive  reading  noted  above.  ‘‘Internet  access’’  was  originally  defined  and  continues  to 
be defined for purposes of the moratorium as the service of providing Internet access 
to a user. Section 1105(5). It is this transaction, between the Internet provider and 
the end-user, which is nontaxable under the terms of the moratorium.  3 The portion 
of the definition that was amended in 2004 was the exception: that is, telecommuni-
cation services are excluded from nontaxable ‘‘Internet access,’’ except to the extent 
such  services  are  ‘‘purchased,  used,  or  sold  by  a  provider  of  Internet  access  to  pro-
vide Internet access.’’ Thus, we conclude that the fact that services are ‘‘purchased, 
used,  or  sold’’  by  an  Internet  provider  has  meaning  only  in  determining  whether 
these  services  can  still  qualify  for  the  moratorium  notwithstanding  that  they  are 
‘‘telecommunications  services;’’  it  does  not  mean  that  such  services  are  independ-
ently  nontaxable  irrespective  of  whether  they  are  part  of  the  service  an  Internet 
provider  offers  to  an  end-user.  Rather,  a  service  that  is  ‘‘purchased,  used,  or  sold’’ 
to  provide  Internet  access  is  not  taxable  only  if  it  is  part  of  providing  the  service 
of  Internet  access  to  the  end-user.  Such  services  can  be  part  of  the  provision  of 
Internet  access  by  a  provider  who,  for  example,  ‘‘purchases’’  a  service  for  the  pur-
pose  of  bundling  it  as  part  of  an  Internet  access  offering;  ‘‘uses’’  a  service  it  owns 
or  has  acquired  for  that  purpose;  or  simply  ‘‘sells’’  owned  or  acquired  services  as 
part of its Internet access bundle. 

In  addition,  we  read  the  amended  exception  as  applying  only  to  services  that  are 
classified  as  telecommunications  services  under  the  1998  Act  as  amended.  In  fact, 
the moratorium defines the term ‘‘telecommunications services’’ with reference to its 
definition in the Communications Act of 1934,4 under which DSL and cable modem 
service  are  no  longer  classified  as  telecommunications  services.5 Moreover,  under 
the Communications Act, the term telecommunications services applies to the deliv-
ery  of  services  to  the  end-user  who  determines  the  content  to  be  communicated;  it 
does  not  apply  to  communications  services  delivered  to  access  service  providers  by 
others in the chain of facilities through which Internet traffic may pass. Thus, since 
broadband  services  are  not  telecommunications  services,  the  exception  in  the  1998 
Act does not apply to them, and they are not affected by the exception.6 

The best evidence of statutory intent is the text of the statute itself. While legisla-
tive history can be useful in shedding light on the intent of the statute or to resolve 
ambiguities,  it  is  not  to  be  used  to  inject  ambiguity  into  the  statutory  language  or 
to  rewrite  the  statute.  E.g.,  Shannon  v.  United  States  512  U.S.  573,  583  (1994).  In 

3 As noted previously, the moratorium applies to ‘‘taxes on Internet access.’’ Related provisions 
defining  a  ‘‘tax  on  Internet  access’’  for  purposes  of  the  moratorium  focus  on  the  transaction  of 
providing  the  service  of  Internet  access:  such  a  tax  is  covered  ‘‘regardless  of  whether  such  tax 
is imposed on a provider of Internet access or a buyer of Internet access.’’ Section 1105(10). 

4 47 U.S.C. § 153(46). 
5 DSL  and  cable  modem  services  are  now  referred  to  as  ‘‘information  services  with  a  tele-
communications  component,’’  under  the  Communications  Act  of  1934.  See  In  the  Matter  of  Ap-
propriate Framework for Broadband Access to the Internet over Wireline Facilities, FCC 05–150, 
(2005),  and  related  documents,  including  In  the  Matter  of  Communications  Assistance  for  Law 
Enforcement  Act  and  Broadband  Access  and  Services,  FCC  05–153,  2995  WL  2347773  (F.C.C.) 
(2005). Although FCC announced its intention as early as February 15, 2002, to revisit its initial 
classification of DSL service as a telecommunications service under the Communications Act (In 
the Matter of Appropriate Framework for Broadband Access to the Internet over Wireline Facili-
ties,  FCC  02–42,  17  F.C.C.R.  3019,  17  FCC  Rcd.  3019),  it  was  not  until  after  the  Supreme 
Court’s  decision  in  National  Cable  &  Telecommunications  Ass’n  v.  Brand  X  Internet  Services, 
125 S.Ct. 2688 (2005), that it actually did so. 

6 There  was  some  awareness  during  the  debate  that  the  then  pending  Brand  X  litigation 
(‘‘Ninth  Circuit  Court  opinion  affecting  DSL  and  cable’’)  could  affect  the  law  in  this  area.  See 
comments by Senator Feinstein, 150 Cong. Rec. S4666. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

our  view,  the  definition  of  Internet  access  is  unambiguous,  and,  therefore,  it  is  un-
necessary to look beyond the statute to discern its meaning from legislative history. 
We  note,  however,  that  consistent  with  our  interpretation  of  the  statute,  the  over-
arching thrust of changes made by the 2004 amendments to the definition of Inter-
net  access  was  to  take  remedial  correction  to  assure  that  broadband  services  such 
as DSL were not taxable when bundled with an ISP’s offering. While there are some 
references  in  the  legislative  history  to 
‘‘wholesale’’  services,  backbone,  and 
broadband,  many  of  these  pertained  to  earlier  versions  of  the  bill  containing  lan-
guage  different  from  that  which  was  ultimately  enacted.7 The  language  that  was 
enacted, using the phrase ‘‘purchased, used, or sold by a provider of Internet access’’ 
was  added  through  the  adoption  of  a  substitute  offered  by  Senator  McCain,  150 
Cong.  Rec.  S4402,  which  was  adopted  following  cloture  and  agreement  to  several 
amendments  designed  to  narrow  differences  between  proponents  and  opponents  of 
the bill. Changes to legislative language during the consideration of a bill may sup-
port  an  inference  that  in  enacting  the  final  language,  Congress  intended  to  reject 
or  work  a  compromise  with  respect  to  earlier  versions  of  the  bill.  Statements  made 
about  earlier  versions  carry  little  weight.  Landgraf  v.  USI  Film  Products,  511  U.S. 
244,  255–56  (1994).  Singer,  2A,  Sutherland  Statutory  Construction,  §48:4.  In  any 
event, the plain language of the statute remains controlling where, as we have con-
cluded, the language and the structure of the statute are clear on their face. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Dr. White. 
May I recognize Mr. Quam? 

STATEMENT OF DAVID C. QUAM, DIRECTOR, FEDERAL 

RELATIONS, NATIONAL GOVERNORS ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  QUAM.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens, 

members of the Subcommittee. 

My  name  is  David  Quam,  and  I’m  the  Director  of  Federal  Rela-
tions for the National Governors Association. I’m pleased to be here 
on  behalf  of  the  Nation’s  Governors  to  talk  about  two  very  impor-
tant  issues:  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  and  the  Streamlined 
Sales and Use Tax Agreement. 

The  bottom  line  regarding  the  Internet  access  moratorium  is 
this:  Although  Governors  generally  oppose  Federal  interference 
with  State  authority  to  develop  and  manage  their  revenue  sys-
tems—they  see  that  as  a  core  element  of  our  federalist  system— 
NGA supports a temporary extension of Internet Tax Freedom Act 
that  clarifies  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’  and  does  not  fur-
ther limit State authority or revenues. 

As  this  Committee  and  Congress  looks  to  extend  the  Internet 
Tax  Freedom  Act,  Governors  recommend  that  they  follow  three 
principles.  First,  be  clear;  definitions  matter.  Second,  be  flexible;  a 
temporary solution is better than permanent confusion. And, third, 
do  no  harm;  continue  grandfather  protections  to  preserve  existing 
State authority and revenues. 

7 For example, proponents of giving the statute a broader interpretation cite S. Rep. 108–155, 

108th Cong., 1st Sess. (2003), which includes the following statement. 

‘‘The Committee intends for the tax exemption for telecommunications services to apply when-
ever  the  ultimate  use  of  those  telecommunications  services  is  to  provide  Internet  access.  Thus, 
if a telecommunications carrier sells wholesale telecommunications services to an Internet serv-
ice  provider  that  intends  to  use  those  telecommunications  services  to  provide  Internet  access, 
then the exemption would apply.’’ 

At the time the 2003 report was drafted, the sentence of concern in the draft legislation read, 
‘‘Such  term  [referring  to  Internet  access]  does  not  include  telecommunications  services,  except 
to  the  extent  such  services  are  used  to  provide  Internet  access.’’  As  adopted,  the  wording  be-
came,  ‘‘The  term  ‘Internet  access’  does  not  include  telecommunications  services,  except  to  the 
extent  such  services  are  purchased,  used,  or  sold  by  a  provider  of  Internet  access  to  provide 
Internet  access.’’  The  amended  language  thus  focuses  on  the  package  of  services  offered  by  the 
access provider, not on the act of providing access alone. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

I’m  going  to  focus  my  testimony  on  the  ITFA  on  the  first  prin-

ciple, that is of being clear. 

The  core  concern  for  states  is  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access.’’ 
It  reads,  ‘‘ ’Internet  access’  means  a  service  that  enables  users  to 
access  content,  information,  electronic  mail,  or  other  services  of-
fered over the Internet’’—it then goes on, ‘‘and may also include ac-
cess to proprietary content, information, and other services as part 
of  a  package  of  services  offered  to  users.’’  This  sentence  has  not 
changed since 1998, but the Internet certainly has. 

NGA believes that the unlimited ability of providers to bundle to-
gether  other  services  with  access  to  form  a  single  tax-free  offering 
represents  a  loophole  that  could  exempt  otherwise  taxable  goods 
and  services  merely  because  they  are  delivered  over  the  Internet. 
The  threat  that  this  loophole  represents  to  State  and  local  govern-
ment  is  exacerbated  by  the  Internet’s  success—more  broadband, 
more services, more people using the Internet. 

During  2004,  this  debate  became  crystal  clear  when  we  consid-
ered Voice over Internet Protocol, the threat that telephone service 
could  move  over  the  Internet  and  be  bundled  to  be  tax-free.  Con-
gress  solved  that  issue,  at  that  time,  by  exempting  VoIP  from  the 
moratorium.  That  was  a  single  instance  taking  care  of  VoIP,  but 
there are more VoIPs out there. The next one is likely to be IPTV, 
Internet  Protocol  Television,  probably  the  fastest-growing  service 
worldwide, that’s going to move a traditional service onto the Inter-
net. Rather than exempt yet another service, Congress should close 
the  loophole  by  specifying  that  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’ 
applies  only  to  those  services  really  necessary  to  connect  a  user  to 
the Internet. 

I’d  like  to  add  that  the  bill  introduced  today  by  Senators  Carper 
and  Alexander  reflects  many  of  the  principles  that  the  Governors 
have  put  out  there:  temporary,  extend  the  grandfather  clause,  and 
fix the definition of ‘‘Internet access.’’ 

I’d also like to take a minute to talk about the Streamlined Sales 
and Use Tax Agreement. The Quill decision, which everybody talks 
about,  did  two  things.  First,  it  created  a  nearly  $20  billion  State 
and  local  tax  gap  from  uncollected  taxes.  Second,  it  provided  a 
roadmap  for  states  to  solve  the  problem  by  simplifying  the  collec-
tion process for these taxes. The Court also said that Congress has 
the  power  to  grant  equitable  collection  authority  to  the  states  for 
sales and use taxes on remote sales. 

The  Streamline  Agreement  is  an  agreement  between  states  to 
meet the challenge of Quill. It simplifies the sales and use tax sys-
tems to provide greater uniformity and certainty for businesses and 
consumers.  Triggered  on  October  1,  2005,  currently  15  states  are 
full  members,  six  states  are  associate  members,  and  19  states  and 
the  District  of  Columbia  serve  as  advisor  states  to  the  Agreement. 
And  contrary  to  what  the  Congresswoman  said,  this  is  a  remark-
able  achievement.  Getting  that  many  states  to  come  together  on  a 
voluntary  basis  to  streamline  sales  taxes  together  is  states  oper-
ating in their capacity to solve a national problem using State sov-
ereign  authority.  More  than  1,000  businesses  have  taken  advan-
tage  of  these  simplifications  offered  by  the  Agreement  by  volun-
teering to comply and collect sales taxes on their remote sales. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

Now  it  is  Congress’s  turn.  Congress  should  partner  with  states 
by  prioritizing  consideration  of  Federal  legislation  to  recognize  the 
efforts of states and the business community to simplify State sales 
and use tax systems and close the tax gap. 

In conclusion, Governors remain steadfast in their insistence that 
decisions  regarding  State  and  local  taxation  should  remain  with 
State  and  local  officials.  The  independent  and  sovereign  authority 
of  states  to  develop  their  own  revenue  systems  is  a  basic  tenet  of 
self-government  in  our  Federal  system.  State  efforts  under  the 
Streamline  process  exemplify  how  states,  the  business  community, 
and Congress can work together to solve national issues with State 
and local consequences. 

As to the moratorium, NGA, again, urges Congress to work with 
State  and  local  government  by  addressing  the  uncertainties  inher-
ent in the overly broad definition of Internet access and preserving 
the  original  grandfather  clause  as  part  of  a  temporary  extension. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Quam follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID C. QUAM, DIRECTOR, FEDERAL RELATIONS, 

NATIONAL GOVERNORS ASSOCIATION 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee: 
thank  you  for  inviting  the  National  Governors  Association  (NGA)  to  testify  today. 
My  name  is  David  Quam,  and  I  am  the  Director  of  Federal  Relations  for  NGA. 
I am pleased to be here on behalf of the Nation’s Governors to discuss the organiza-
tion’s perspective on communications and taxation. 

Today  most  of  my  testimony  will  focus  on  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  (the 
‘‘ITFA’’), although I will also discuss the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement 
(SSUTA). The bottom line regarding the ITFA is this: although Governors generally 
oppose  Federal  interference  with  state  authority  to  develop  and  manage  their  rev-
enue  systems,  NGA  supports  a  temporary  extension  of  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom 
Act  that  clarifies  the  definition  of  Internet  access  and  does  not  further  limit  state 
authority or revenues. 
Background 

Although the U.S. Constitution grants Congress broad authority to regulate inter-
state  commerce,  the  Federal  Government,  historically,  has  been  reluctant  to  inter-
fere  with  states’  ability  to  raise  and  regulate  their  own  revenues.  State  tax  sov-
ereignty is a basic tenet of our federalist system and is fundamental to the inherent 
political  independence  and  viability  of  states.  For  this  reason  Governors  generally 
oppose  any  Federal  legislation  that  would  interfere  with  states’  sovereign  ability  to 
craft and manage their own revenue systems. 

The  1998  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act,  which  imposed  a  moratorium  on  state  or 
local taxation of Internet access, is one exception to longstanding Congressional for-
bearance  when  it  comes  to  state  tax  issues.  Designed  to  help  stimulate  this  new 
technology by making access to the Internet tax free, the moratorium included three 
important restrictions to protect states: 

1. The moratorium applied only to new taxes—existing taxes on Internet access 
were grandfathered; 
2. The definition of ‘‘Internet access,’’ while broad, excluded telecommunications 
services; and 
3. The moratorium expired after 2 years to allow Congress, states and industry 
the  opportunity  to  make  adjustments  for  rapidly  developing  technologies  and 
markets. 

In 2000 the original moratorium expired, but was extended through November 1, 
2003,  with  its  protections  for  states  still  in  place.  In  2003,  and  2004,  Congress  de-
bated bills that targeted state protections by proposing to eliminate the grandfather 
provision,  modify  the  telecommunications  exclusion  to  address  tax  disparities  be-
tween  telecommunications  broadband  services  and  those  of  the  cable  industry,  and 
make the moratorium permanent. Fortunately, the final bill retained several of the 
original  state  protections  including  the  grandfather  clause,  an  exception  for  taxes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

on Voice-over Internet Protocol (VoIP) services, and an expiration date of November 
1, 2007. 

As  Congress  begins  to  consider  changes  to  the  ITFA,  Governors  recommend  that 
members  examine  the  scope  of  the  moratorium  in  light  of  technological  advance-
ments; update the ITFA’s definitions to ensure they reflect Congressional intent and 
do  not  unnecessarily  interfere  with  state  taxing  authority;  extend  the  moratorium 
on  a  temporary  basis  to  respect  state  sovereignty  and  the  ever-changing  nature  of 
the  Internet;  and  retain  the  original  grandfather  clause  to  preserve  existing  state 
and local tax revenues. 
Congress Should Clarify the Definition of ‘‘Internet Access’’ 

A core concern for states is the potential breadth of the ITFA’s definition of ‘‘Inter-

net access.’’ The current definition of Internet access states: 

‘‘Internet  access  means  a  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  informa-
tion,  electronic  mail,  or  other  services  offered  over  the  Internet,  and  may  also 
include  access  to  proprietary  content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of 
a package of services offered to users. Such term does not include telecommuni-
cations services, except to the extent such services are purchased, used, or sold 
by  a  provider  of  Internet  access  to  provide  Internet  access.’’  (Emphasis  added) 
The  first  sentence  of  the  definition  has  not  changed  since  1998  and  allows  a  pro-
vider of Internet access to bundle ‘‘proprietary content, information, and other serv-
ices’’  together  with  access  to  make  the  entire  offering  tax  free.  NGA  believes  that 
the  unlimited  ability  of  providers  to  bundle  together  content  and  ‘‘other  services’’ 
into a single, tax-free offering represents a loophole that could have the unintended 
effect of exempting content, information or services from otherwise applicable taxes 
merely because they are delivered over the Internet. 

The  risk  of  states  losing  significant  revenues  from  this  provision  has  grown  sig-
nificantly as broadband connections have become more common and companies have 
altered  business  plans  to  deliver  more  services  over  the  Internet.  Since  2001,  the 
number of high-speed lines in the United States has risen from more than 9 million 
to  nearly  65  million  with  high-speed  connections  in  the  United  States  growing  by 
52 percent in 2006 alone.1 Governors support the deployment of broadband services 
because they increase the ability of citizens to utilize the vast array of services and 
information  available  online  and  are  critical  to  our  Nation’s  economic  growth  and 
competitiveness. 

As more consumers move online, Internet protocol technology is also making more 
services available over the Internet. For example, a key issue of the 2004 ITFA de-
bate  centered  on  whether  VoIP  would  become  a  viable  alternative  to  traditional 
phone  service.  Unlike  traditional  telecommunications  services,  VoIP  uses  the  Inter-
net to transmit voice communications between computers, phones and other commu-
nications devices. Today, analysts project that VoIP subscriptions will top 18 million 
in  2009,  a  dramatic  rise  from  VoIP’s  150,000  customers  in  2003.2 The  concern  in 
2004  was  what  would  happen  to  the  $23  billion  state  and  local  tax  base  for  tele-
communications  services  if  VoIP  replaces  telecommunications  services  and  were  al-
lowed to be bundled with Internet access into a tax-free offering. Congress’ solution 
during  the  last  ITFA  extension  was  to  specifically  exempt  VoIP  from  the  morato-
rium. This solution, however, did not solve the problem of the underlying definition. 
The  next  major  service  moving  to  the  Internet  is  video  programming.  Known  as 
Internet  Protocol  Television  (IPTV),  this  service  represents  another  technological 
leap  for  industry  and  challenge  for  the  ITFA.  Worldwide,  the  annual  growth  rate 
of IPTV is projected to exceed 92 percent, rising from 3.9 million subscribers in 2006 
to  103  million  in  2011.  The  service  brings  together  voice,  Internet  and  entertain-
ment  services  in  a  bundle  marketed  by  some  as  a  triple-play.3 Much  like  VoIP  in 
2004,  if  a  service  like  IPTV  is  packaged  with  Internet  access  and  exempted  from 
applicable taxes, it would create tax disparities for competitors offering similar serv-
ices and undermine existing state and local revenues. 

The  emergence  of  services  such  as  VoIP  and  IPTV  underscore  the  need  to  clarify 
the  definition  of  what  constitutes  ‘‘Internet  access’’  so  that  the  taxability  of  a  good 
or service is not determined by whether it can be bundled with Internet access and 
delivered  over  the  Internet.  Although  NGA  supports  having  the  moratorium  apply 

1 Response  of  Kevin  J.  Martin,  Chairman,  Federal  Communications  Commission,  to  pre-hear-

ing questions asked by the House Committee on Energy and Commerce, February 7, 2007. 

2 Telecommunications  Industry  Association’s  2006  Telecommunications  Market  Review  and 

Forecast, February 27, 2006. 

News, April 10, 2007. 

3 Harris,  Jan,  ‘‘IPTV  subscription  to  grow  92  percent  year  on  year,’’  Platinax  Small  Business 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

to  services  related  to  providing  access  to  the  Internet  such  as  email,  Congress 
should  close  the  bundling  loophole  by  specifying  that  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  ac-
cess’’ applies only to those services necessary to connect a user to the Internet. 
Any Extension Should be Temporary 

When  the  ITFA  became  law  in  1998,  it  was  passed  as  a  temporary  measure  to 
assist  and  nurture  the  Internet  in  its  commercial  infancy.  The  Internet  of  2007  is 
far different. It is a mainstream medium that has spawned innovation, created new 
industries and improved services. What started as primarily a dial-up service avail-
able  through  a  handful  of  providers,  today  is  available  through  thousands  of  Inter-
net  service  providers  using  technologies  ranging  from  high-speed  broadband  cable 
or  Digital  Subscriber  Line  services,  to  wireless,  satellite  and  even  broadband  Inter-
net access over power lines. 

Commercial  transactions  over  the  Internet  have  also  exploded.  A  recent  study  by 
the National Retail Federation concluded that Internet sales grew from $176 billion 
in  2005  to  $220  billion  in  2006,  a  25  percent  jump  that  outpaced  projections.4 The 
survey projects online sales for 2007 will jump 18 percent to $259 billion. According 
to  one  of  the  survey’s  senior  analysts,  ‘‘[t]his  strong  growth  is  an  indicator  that  on-
line retail is years away from reaching a point of saturation.’’ 5 

The  rapid  pace  of  innovation  in  the  Internet  and  telecommunications  industries 
makes  it  difficult  to  define  accurately  these  complex  and  ever-changing  services. 
Congress  made  the  original  moratorium  temporary  in  part  for  this  reason:  to  pro-
vide  Congress,  industry  and  state  and  local  governments  with  the  ability  to  revisit 
the issue and make adjustments where necessary to accommodate new technologies 
and  market  realities.  With  continued  questions  as  to  the  scope  of  the  moratorium, 
the  ongoing  evolution  of  the  Internet  and  its  developing  role  in  commerce,  a  tem-
porary extension of the moratorium remains the best way for Congress to avoid any 
unintended consequences that may arise from a permanent moratorium. 

Another reason to support a temporary extension is that making the moratorium 
permanent would establish a troubling precedent that distorts the state-Federal re-
lationship.  As  mentioned  previously,  Governors  generally  oppose  Federal  efforts  to 
interfere with state revenue systems because such interference undermines a states 
sovereign authority to provide government services. A more immediate consequence 
of a permanent ban on state taxes is the increased pressure Congress would receive 
from  other  industries  seeking  similar  preemptions  of  state  laws.  Legislation  to  im-
pose  a  moratorium  on  state  and  local  cell  phone  taxes  and  efforts  to  dictate  state 
nexus standards for business activity taxes are recent examples of the types of pre-
emptions  strongly  opposed  by  state  and  local  governments  that  would  be  bolstered 
by passage of a permanent moratorium. 
Congress Should Maintain the Moratorium’s ‘‘Grandfather’’ Clause 

NGA  recommends  that  any  extension  of  the  moratorium  preserve  existing  state 
and local revenues by continuing the so-called grandfather clause for taxes imposed 
prior to 1998. The grandfather clause serves two purposes; first, as a protection for 
existing state and local tax revenue; and second, as a means to preserve other state 
and local taxes not specifically mentioned by the ITFA. 

Today  only  nine  states  have  direct  taxes  on  Internet  access  that  qualify  for  the 
protection of the 1998 grandfather clause. Those states include Hawaii, New Hamp-
shire, New Mexico, North Dakota, Ohio, South Dakota, Texas, Washington and Wis-
consin. According to Congressional Budget Office estimates from the 2004 ITFA ex-
tension,  eliminating  the  grandfather  clause  will  cost  those  states  between  $80  mil-
lion  and  $120  million  annually.  While  these  amounts  may  seem  insignificant  in 
terms  of  Federal  dollars,  balanced  budget  requirements  at  the  state  level  require 
that any unanticipated loss of revenues must be made up by either cutting services 
or  raising  revenues.  These  losses  also  are  high  enough  to  make  the  elimination  of 
the grandfather clause an unfunded Federal mandate under the Unfunded Mandate 
Reform  Act.  Any  extension  of  the  moratorium  should  therefore  preserve  the  grand-
father clause so as not to reduce existing state and local tax revenues. 

The  grandfather  clause  also  serves  as  an  important  protection  for  all  state  and 
local taxes that indirectly affect providers of Internet access. Under the ITFA, a ‘‘tax 
on Internet access’’ means: 

[A]  tax  on  Internet  access,  regardless  of  whether  such  tax  is  imposed  on  a  pro-
vider of Internet access or a buyer of Internet access and regardless of the ter-
minology used to describe the tax. 

4 The State of Retailing Online 2007, Shop.com/Forrester Research Study, May 14, 2007. 
5 Online  Clothing  Sales  Surpass  Computers,  According  to  Shop.org/Forrester  Research  Study, 

viewed at www.nrf.com (May 17, 2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Because a tax on Internet access includes both taxes on users and Internet access 
service providers, some experts interpret the moratorium as applying to both direct 
taxes  on  Internet  access  and  indirect  taxes  such  as  business  taxes  on  a  provider  of 
Internet access. In fact, the pre-1998 versions of the moratorium expressly excluded 
certain indirect taxes such as income and property taxes from the moratorium. That 
language  was  later  dropped  because  the  grandfather  clause  applies  to  all  taxes  on 
Internet  access  in  force  before  October  1,  1998.6 Although  the  2004  extension  does 
preserve  the  ability  of  states  to  impose  a  tax  ‘‘levied  upon  or  measured  by  net  in-
come, capitol stock, net worth, or property value,’’ this list is not exhaustive. Preser-
vation  of  the  grandfather  clause  is  important  because  it  allows  Congress  to  avoid 
having  to  define  those  direct  taxes  subject  to  the  moratorium  and  any  other  taxes 
that lie outside the scope of the moratorium. 
Congress Should Support the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement 

The  National  Governors  Association  has  long  supported  state’s  efforts  to  pursue 
Federal legislation provisions that would require remote, out-of-state vendors to col-
lect  sales  and  use  taxes  from  their  customers.  Such  action  is  necessary  to  restore 
fairness  between  local  retail  store  purchases  and  remote  sellers  and  to  provide  a 
means  for  the  states  to  collect  taxes  that  are  owed  under  existing  law.  The  rapid 
growth of the Internet and electronic commerce underscores the importance of main-
taining equitable treatment among all sellers. 

In the Quill decision, the U.S. Supreme Court stated that, to secure a level play-
ing  field  in  the  collection  of  sales  and  use  taxes,  states  needed  to  eliminate  undue 
administrative burdens on interstate commerce by simplifying the collection process 
for these taxes. The Court also clarified that Congress has the power to grant equi-
table collection authority to the states for sales and use taxes on remote sales. Gov-
ernors  support  the  development  of  a  21st  century  sales  tax  system  that  simplifies 
compliance requirements and streamlines sales taxes to ensure that states are pre-
pared for the global electronic marketplace. 

Several  states  are  working  to  eliminate  undue  administrative  burdens  on  inter-
state commerce associated with sales and use taxes by participating in the Stream-
lined Sales and Use Tax Agreement (SSUTA). The SSUTA is designed as an agree-
ment  between  states  to  simplify  their  sales  and  use  tax  systems  to  provide  greater 
uniformity  and  certainty  for  businesses  and  consumers.  Simplification  would  be  ac-
complished  through  several  key  features,  including  uniform  definitions  within  tax 
laws,  rate  simplification,  state  level  tax  administration  of  all  state  and  local  sales 
and use taxes, uniform sourcing rules, simplified exemption administration, uniform 
audit procedures, and state funding of the system. 

SSUTA was triggered on October 1, 2005, when 13 states representing more than 
20  percent  of  the  population  were  certified  as  having  met  the  requirements  of  the 
Agreement.  Currently,  15  states  are  full  members;  6  states  are  associate  members; 
and 19 states and the District of Columbia serve as advisor states to the Agreement. 
Since  the  agreement  was  triggered,  more  than  1,000  businesses  have  taken  advan-
tage  of  the  simplifications  offered  by  the  agreement  by  volunteering  to  comply  and 
collect sales taxes from their remote sales. 

As  Congress  examines  issues  related  to  the  Internet  and  state  and  local  taxes,  it 
should partner with states by prioritizing consideration of Federal legislation to rec-
ognize  the  efforts  of  states  and  the  business  community  to  simplify  state  sales  and 
use tax systems. 
Conclusion 

Governors remain steadfast in their insistence that decisions regarding state and 
local taxation should remain with state and local officials. The independent and sov-
ereign  authority  of  states  to  develop  their  own  revenue  systems  is  a  basic  tenet  of 
self  government  and  our  Federal  system.  State  efforts  under  the  SSUTA  exemplify 
how  states,  the  business  community  and  Congress  can  work  together  to  solve  na-
tional  issues  with  state  and  local  consequences.  As  to  the  ITFA,  NGA  urges  Con-
gress  to  work  with  state  and  local  governments  by  addressing  the  uncertainties  in-
herent  in  the  overly  broad  definition  of  Internet  access  and  preserving  the  original 
grandfather clause as part of a temporary extension. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Quam. 
And now may I recognize Mr. Duncan. 

6 Mazerov,  Michael,  ‘‘Making  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  permanent  in  the  form  currently 
proposed  would  lead  to  a  substantial  revenue  loss  for  states  and  localities,’’  Center  on  Budget 
and Policy Priorities, October 20, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

STATEMENT OF HARLEY T. DUNCAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

FEDERATION OF TAX ADMINISTRATORS 

Mr.  DUNCAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of 

the Committee. 

My  name  is  Harley  Duncan.  I’m  Executive  Director  of  the  Fed-
eration  of  Tax  Administrators,  which  is  an  association  of  the  prin-
cipal  revenue-collecting  and  tax-administration  agencies  in  the  50 
states,  D.C.,  New  York  City,  and  Puerto  Rico.  As  with  the  Gov-
ernors  Association,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here  and 
address the issues of the Internet tax moratorium and the stream-
lined sales tax legislation. 

Our organization generally has a position opposing Federal inter-
vention  in  State  taxation  where  the  Constitution  would  otherwise 
allow  us  to  impose  taxes  unless  there  are  compelling  administra-
tive  and  policy  reasons  to  do  so.  In  addition,  when  Congress  does 
choose  to  intervene,  we  make  efforts  to  ensure  that  any  interven-
tion  is  targeted  to  the  problem  at  hand,  and  doesn’t  have  a  series 
of unintended consequences. 

With  respect  to  the  Internet  tax  moratorium,  we  would  encour-
age  you  to  address  three  particular  issues  in  this  regard.  The  first 
is  the  breadth  of  the  moratorium,  or  the  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  ac-
cess.’’ As you’ve heard, the definition of ‘‘Internet access’’ is ‘‘a serv-
ice that allows a user to access the content, information, and serv-
ices available over the Internet,’’ as well as proprietary content, in-
formation, and services. I think we would all agree that this is the 
universe of what is available over the Internet. 

The  problem  from  the  State  tax  administrators’  standpoint  is 
that  the  term  ‘‘access’’  itself  has  two  definitions.  One  is  to  connect 
to,  and  put  yourself  in  a  position  to  use;  the  second  is  the  right  to 
use those services, content, and information. In other words, if the 
second  definition  of  ‘‘access’’  is  adopted,  we  believe  that  a  package 
of  access  that  enabled  one  to  use  all  of  the  services,  content,  and 
information  that’s  available  on  the  Internet,  bundled  into  a  single 
package  at  a  single  price,  would  be  precluded  from  State  taxation 
because  of  the  broad  definition  of  the  ‘‘content,  information,  and 
services’’ and the definition of ‘‘access.’’ 

It’s  this  potential  bundling  of  services  and  claiming  exemption 
that causes us concern about the definition of ‘‘access.’’ We wish we 
could get to the ‘‘reasonably bundled’’ portion of the definition that 
Dr.  White  referenced.  But,  in  the  plain  language,  as  we  read  it, 
‘‘reasonably  bundled’’  is  not  there.  Changes  are  necessary  so  that 
we  don’t  have  a  package  of  Internet  access  that  includes  what  we 
all  understand  to  be  access,  as  well  as  five  digital  books  and  ten 
movies  per  month  all  claimed  to  be  exempt.  We’ve  worked  with 
your staff and others, and we will continue to work, to craft a defi-
nition  that  includes  connection,  the  basic  services,  the  navigation, 
the mail, the messaging, and the like—that is the general package 
of what we consider to be access today—and prevents the bundling. 
And we hope that we can gather your attention on that issue. 

The second is, we believe that the—any extension of the morato-
rium should be temporary. The technology continues to evolve, the 
manner  in  which  it  is  used  by  consumers  and  business  continues 
to evolve. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Beyond  this,  Congress,  when  it  takes  the  step  of  extending  the 
Internet Tax Freedom Act, has inserted itself into State tax law in 
a way that it hasn’t, commonly, in the past. It is dealing with spe-
cific  transactions  and  types  of  services  that  will  not  be  subject  to 
the  State  sales  tax.  We  believe  that,  in  inserting  yourself  in  that 
fashion,  in  a  way  you  haven’t  done  in  other  areas,  it  is  only  pru-
dent  and  reasonable  to  expect  that  you  would  preserve  the  oppor-
tunity to come back and review that law on a periodic basis, much 
the same as you do with other laws that you pass. 

Third,  we  would  argue,  in  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act,  that 
you  should  preserve  the  grandfather  clause  that  preserves  those 
taxes  on  charges  for  access  that  were  in  place  in  1998.  That  was 
a part of the original deal involving the Internet Tax Freedom Act. 
The  agreement  was  not  to  disrupt  the  revenue  systems  of  those 
states,  and  we  believe  that  should  be  preserved.  In  addition,  re-
pealing the grandfathers could reach a broader range of taxes than 
we commonly consider. Because of the definition of ‘‘tax on Internet 
access’’  that’s  in  the  bill,  it  could  also  involve  a  series  of  general- 
purpose  business  taxes  that  are  levied  on  Internet  service  pro-
viders—the  Washington  State  business  and  occupation  tax,  local 
doing business taxes, unemployment taxes, and the like. 

Finally,  1  minute  on  remote  sales  and  the  streamlined  legisla-
tion.  We  would  support  enactment  of  this,  and  encourage  you  to 
consider it carefully for all the reasons that the Governors Associa-
tion  has  outlined.  I  think  as  you  go  through  this  you’re  going  to 
hear  a  lot  of  concerns  about,  Is  it  simple  enough?  Should  this  be 
added?  Should  this  be  added?  Do  we  need  to  make  some  changes 
here? 

I think it’s important to remember two basic things. The first is, 
remote  sales  continue  to  grow  at  25  percent  a  year,  and  the  rev-
enue impact on the states, and the unfairness and competitiveness 
disadvantage  to  retailers  that  collect,  continues  to  grow  at  that 
same  rate.  And  the  second  is  that,  through  the  Streamlined  Sales 
and  Use  Tax  Agreement,  the  states,  working  with  the  business 
community, we have achieved a system that significantly simplifies 
State  sales  tax  administration,  provides  for  much  greater  uni-
formity,  and  provides  significant  protections  to  people  that  make 
good-faith  efforts  to  collect  sales  tax.  It  deserves  your  support,  in 
terms  of  authorizing  states  that  are  part  of  that  agreement  to  re-
quire remote sellers to collect. 

While  there  are  a  lot  of  things  that  a  lot  of  people  would  like  to 
have  in  the  Streamlined  Sales  and  Use  Tax  Agreement,  we  need 
to  remember  that  it  is  a  major  piece  of  simplification  that  few 
would have expected a few years ago. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Duncan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HARLEY T. DUNCAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

FEDERATION OF TAX ADMINISTRATORS 

My name is Harley Duncan. I am the Executive Director of the Federation of Tax 
Administrators. The Federation is an association of the tax administration agencies 
in each of the 50 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and New York City. 
We are headquartered in Washington, D.C. I am please to testify on the current re-
strictions on states taxing Internet access and the efforts of the states to streamline 
their sales taxes in anticipation of a mandatory collection system that would require 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

out-of-state sellers to collect state sales taxes. First I will address the possible exten-
sion. 

The  Federation  urges  the  Congress  to  refrain  from  enacting  measures  that  abro-
gate,  disrupt  or  otherwise  restrict  states  from  imposing  taxes  that  are  otherwise 
lawful  under  the  U.S.  Constitution.  The  current  prohibition  on  the  imposition  of 
taxes  on  charges  for  Internet  access  as  contained  in  the  Internet  Tax  Non-
discrimination Act (the moratorium) is the type of law that should be avoided, espe-
cially on a permanent basis. 
Internet Taxation Moratorium 

The  Federation  urges  Congress  not  to  extend  the  Act  because  it  is  disruptive  of 
and  poses  long-term  dangers  for  state  and  local  fiscal  systems.  Moreover,  the  Gov-
ernment  Accountability  Office  and  other  researchers  have  found  that  the  morato-
rium is not effective in achieving its purported purpose of expanding the availability 
of Internet access to the American public and bridging what has been termed as the 
‘‘digital divide.’’ 

If,  however,  Congress  believes  the  Act  should  be  extended  we  believe  there  are 

three principles that should be followed: 

• The definition of ‘‘Internet access’’ in current law must be changed. As currently 
written,  we  believe  that  an  Internet  service  provider  could  bundle  virtually  all 
types  of  Internet  services,  content  and  information  (some  of  which  may  be  cur-
rently  taxable)  into  a  package  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’  and  claim  that  the  state 
would  be  preempted  from  taxing  any  part  of  that  package.  The  danger  to  state 
and  local  fiscal  systems  over  the  long  term  from  the  current  expansive  defini-
tion is considerable. 
• Any  extension  of  the  Act  should  be  temporary  in  nature.  The  nature  of  the  on-
line  world  and  the  manner  in  which  the  public  accesses  and  uses  that  world 
continues  to  change  rapidly.  The  long-term  impact  on  state  and  local  finances 
is  still  evolving.  Given  what  everyone  acknowledges  will  be  continuing  rapid 
change,  it  seems  only  prudent  that  any  extension  be  temporary  and  that  Con-
gress revisit the policy and its impact in a few years. 
• The  provision  of  the  Act  preserving  those  taxes  on  Internet  access  that  were 
‘‘generally  imposed  and  actually  enforced’’  prior  to  1998  should  be  continued  if 
the  Act  is  extended.  The  intent  when  the  original  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act 
was  passed  in  1998  was  not  to  disrupt  existing  practices  and  that  commitment 
should be maintained. 

Impact of the Moratorium 

Congress  was  responding  to  several  concerns  when  it  originally  passed  the  Inter-
net  Tax  Freedom  Act  in  1998.  Among  these  was  that  the  Internet  and  electronic 
commerce  were  ‘‘fledgling  industries’’  that  should  be  protected  from  state  and  local 
taxation  for  fear  that  the  taxes  would  be  burdensome  and  complex  and  somehow 
prevent the growth and survival of the industry. In addition, there was a belief that 
preempting  state  and  local  taxation  of  charges  for  Internet  access  would  provide  a 
financial  incentive  to  U.S.  households  to  subscribe  to  Internet  services  and  would 
encourage the Internet industry to deploy services to underserved areas. 

While the goals are laudable, the economic evidence is that state taxation of Inter-
net access charges has little or nothing to do with the adoption of Internet services 
by  consumers  or  the  deployment  of  services  by  industry.  The  Government  Account-
ability  Office  (GAO)  was  required  to  perform  a  study  on  the  deployment  of 
broadband  service  in  the  United  States  when  the  Moratorium  was  last  extended.1 
The key findings regarding taxes in their report reads as follows: 

• ‘‘Finally,  using  our  econometric  model,  we  found  that  imposition  of  taxes  was 
not  a  statistically  significant  factor  influencing  the  deployment  of  broadband.’’ 
• ‘‘Using our model, we found that the imposition of the tax was not a statistically 
significant  factor  influencing  the  adoption  [by  consumers]  of  broadband  service 
at  the  5  percent  level.  It  was  statistically  significant  at  the  10  percent  level, 
perhaps suggesting that it was weakly significant factor. However, given the na-
ture  of  our  model,  it  is  unclear  whether  this  finding  is  related  to  the  tax  or 
other characteristics of the states in which the households resided.’’ 

1 Government  Accountability  Office,  ‘‘Telecommunications—Broadband  Deployment  is  Exten-
sive  throughout  the  United  States,  but  It  Is  Difficult  to  Assess  the  Extent  of  Deployment  Gaps 
in Rural Areas’’ (GAO–06–426). In the GAO study, the term ‘‘deployment’’ refers to the offering 
of  broadband  services  by  various  types  of  providers  and  the  term  ‘‘adoption’’  refers  to  the  use 
of broadband services by consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

GAO  found  that  factors  such  as  the  education  level  of  the  head  of  a  household 
and  the  income  of  the  household  influenced  the  purchase  of  broadband  services.  A 
household  headed  by  a  college  graduate  was  12  percentage  points  more  likely  to 
purchase broadband than those headed by a person who did not graduate from col-
lege. High-income households were 39 percent more likely to adopt broadband than 
lower-income households. 

A study by economists at the University of Tennessee likewise found that taxation 
of  Internet  access  had  ‘‘no  empirical  evidence  that  Internet  access  rates  are  lower 
in states that have levied a tax on Internet access, all else being equal.’’ 2 

Concern about the moratorium and its extension should not be interpreted as sug-
gesting that states and localities do not recognize the importance of the Internet in-
dustry and the benefits improved service and utilization can provide to the citizens. 
The  GAO  report  referenced  earlier  highlighted  several  examples  of  state  and  local 
programs  aimed  a  providing  assistance  and  incentives  for  the  deployment  of  Inter-
net technologies, including: 

mitted to spend $1 billion on telecommunications infrastructure. 

• The  Texas  Telecommunication  Infrastructure  Fund  begun  in  1996  that  com-
• ConnectKentucky’s an alliance of technology-focused businesses, government en-
tities,  and  universities  that  work  together  to  accelerate  broadband  deployment. 
• Virginia Tobacco Indemnification and Community Revitalization Commission is 
designed  to  stimulate  economic  development  opportunities  by  encouraging  the 
creation of new technology-based business and industry. 

Definition of Internet Access 

The  current  definition  of  Internet  access  was  devised  in  large  part  in  1998  with 
‘‘dial-up  Internet  access’’  in  mind.  It  has  not  kept  pace  with  the  manner  in  which 
Internet  technology  and  services  and  electronic  commerce  have  evolved.  While 
changes  enacted  in  2004  did  much  to  remove  discrimination  among  various  types 
of  Internet  access  providers,  they  did  nothing  to  avoid  a  potential  unintended  ero-
sion of state tax bases. 

The  current  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’ 3 effectively  allows  a  broad  range  of 
content, information and services to be bundled with Internet access and potentially 
be considered as protected under the prohibition on the imposition of taxes on Inter-
net  access.  This  results  because  the  term  ‘‘access’’  can  be  interpreted  to  mean  a 
‘‘right to use,’’ meaning a ‘‘right to use’’ all the information, services and content on 
the  Internet  as  part  of  a  package  of  access.  The  range  of  content  and  service  that 
can  be  bundled  with  Internet  access  is  virtually  unlimited.  It  includes  all  manner 
of  electronic  books,  movies,  music,  photographs,  services,  databases,  information 
services and the like.4 

The current definition allows a growing proportion of the state and local tax base 
to  be  effectively  put  ‘‘off  limits’’  by  Federal  legislation  with  such  a  broad  definition 
of  Internet  access.  We  do  not  believe  this  was  the  intent  of  Congress  when  it  origi-
nally passed the Internet Tax Freedom Act nearly 9 years ago. 

If  the  current  moratorium  with  the  current  definition  of  Internet  access  is  made 
permanent it would lead to widespread tax avoidance and litigation that today does 
not occur because it is temporary. The temporary nature of the moratorium deprives 
companies of the long-term financial inducements to ‘‘push the edge of the envelope’’ 
in  interpreting  the  law  to  maximize  their  competitive  advantage  over  ‘‘brick  and 
mortar’’  businesses.  If  the  current  definition  of  Internet  access  were  made  perma-
nent  there  would  be  a  considerable  opportunity  to  gain  a  long-term  competitive  ad-
vantage over traditional businesses that cannot be realistically denied. 

The  current  definition  of  Internet  access  poses  an  issue  not  only  for  state  and 
local governments, but also for significant segments of the private sector. Firms that 
are  providing  content,  video,  or  other  services  that  compete  with  those  provided  by 
Internet service providers will face a discriminatory and unfair competitive situation 

2 See  also  Donald  Bruce,  John  Deskins  and  William  F.  Fox,  ‘‘Has  Internet  Access  Taxation 

Affected Internet Use,’’ State Tax Notes, May 17, 2004, pp. 519–526. 

3 Section  1105(5)  of  the  original  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act,  at  47  U.S.C.  § 1105(5),  provides: 
‘‘The  term  ‘Internet  access’  means  a  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  information, 
electronic  mail,  or  other  services  offered  over  the  Internet,  and  may  also  include  access  to  pro-
prietary  content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of  a  package  of  services  offered  to 
users. The term ‘Internet access’ does not include telecommunications services, except to the ex-
tent such services are purchased, used, or sold by a provider of Internet access to provide Inter-
net access.’’ 

4 The  moratorium’s  accounting  rule  for  separating  individual  fees  would  not  come  into  play 

because all of the bundled content would be considered ‘‘Internet access.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

if  those  services  when  provided  as  part  of  Internet  access  are  protected  from  state 
and  local  taxation,  but  services  provided  outside  a  bundle  that  includes  access  are 
subject  to  state  and  local  taxes.  The  convergence  of  technologies  and  the  consolida-
tion  in  the  communications  industry  suggest  that  this  discrimination  will  be  a  real 
issue ‘‘sooner rather than later.’’ 

The Federation has worked and continues to work to develop a definition of Inter-
net  access  that  is  acceptable  to  all  parties  and  that  is  consistent  with  what  we  be-
lieve all parties actually understand the ‘‘intent’’ of the original bill to be. Our intent 
is  to  craft  language  that  will  allow  Internet  access  packages  consistent  with  those 
now  offered  to  continue  to  be  subject  to  the  moratorium,  but  to  avoid  the  bundling 
of other products and services into the package. 

We  have  worked  with  Committee  staff  and  have  reached  out  to  the  Internet  in-
dustry to develop such language. We look forward to continuing that effort if an ex-
tension of the moratorium moves forward. 
Temporary Extension 

If the Act is to be extended, it should be done on a temporary, short-term basis— 
even  if  the  definition  of  Internet  access  is  amended.  A  short-term  extension  would 
insure  that  the  moratorium’s  impact  on  state  and  local  revenues  is  examined  peri-
odically  and  that  unintended  consequences  are  not  occurring.  This  is  necessary  be-
cause  of  the  continuing  expansion  of  Internet  availability  and  the  expanding  array 
of  activities  conducted  on  the  Internet,  which  make  it  very  difficult  to  predict  the 
impact  of  restrictions.  It  is  also  desirable  to  insure  that  the  industry  has  not 
changed in ways that somehow causes the moratorium to discriminate among Inter-
net  service  providers.  It  was  this  sort  of  discrimination  among  providers  that  was, 
in  fact,  among  the  most  contentious  issues  when  the  Act  was  last  considered  in 
2003–2004.  Finally,  presuming  a  change  in  the  definition  of  Internet  access,  it 
would be advisable to review the impact of that change in the near- to medium-term 
to insure that it is performing as intended. 
Preservation of Taxes on Internet Access Imposed Prior to 1998 

Any extension of the Act should preserve the ability of those states currently im-
posing  a  tax  on  charges  for  Internet  access  to  continue  to  do  so  if  they  so  choose. 
The  stated  intent  when  the  original  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  was  passed  in  1998 
was  not  to  disrupt  existing  practices.  Given  the  economic  evidence  that  taxation  of 
charges  for  Internet  access  has  not  impacted  the  availability  or  use  of  Internet  ac-
cess  by  households  in  these  states,  we  see  no  reason  that  commitment  should  not 
be maintained. 

Nine  states  currently  impose  taxes  that  are  protected—Hawaii,  New  Hampshire, 
New Mexico, North Dakota, Ohio, South Dakota, Texas, Washington and Wisconsin. 
The  Congressional  Budget  Office  estimated  that  in  2003,  these  states  collected  on 
the order of $120 million from their taxes on charges for Internet access. Repealing 
the  grandfathering  protection  would  disrupt  the  revenue  stream  of  these  states— 
each  of  which  must  maintain  a  balanced  budget.  Repealing  the  preemption  would 
constitute an intergovernmental mandate under the Unfunded Mandate Reform Act. 
Preservation  of  the  grandfather  for  pre-1998  taxes  is  an  issue  that  is  important 
not  only  to  these  states.  The  grandfather  also  covers  a  variety  of  general  business 
taxes that may be imposed on a wide range of businesses (e.g., state and local gross 
receipts  taxes,  unemployment  taxes,  taxes  on  machinery  and  equipment  purchases, 
real estate transfer taxes, etc.) that are not generally considered ‘‘taxes on Internet 
access’’  but  would  be  subject  to  challenge  under  the  Act  if  the  grandfather  clause 
is repealed. 
Conclusion 

We  submit  that  the  ‘‘fledgling  industry’’  argument  for  Internet  services  in  the 
United States is no longer relevant. Electronic commerce is a mature and important 
part  of  the  U.S.  and  international  economy.  The  continued  moratorium  on  taxing 
charges  for  Internet  access  should  be  evaluated.  In  our  estimation,  there  has  been 
no  showing  that  the  purchase  or  supply  of  Internet  access  services  in  those  states 
that tax the services has been adversely affected. Neither has there been a showing 
of an undue compliance burden on Internet service providers that would justify the 
preemption.  Continuing  the  preemption  simply  provides  a  special  position  for  this 
particular communications medium and unfairly shifts the burden of taxation on to 
other activities. 

If  the  preferential  treatment  of  Internet  access  continues,  three  matters  should 

be addressed: 

• The scope of the preferential tax treatment (definition of Internet access) needs 

to be limited to protect businesses that compete with Internet companies; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

• The Act should be made temporary to insure periodic review of the Act and its 
• The  original  commitment  to  those  states  imposing  taxes  on  Internet  access 

consequences; and 

should be continued. 

State Sales Tax Simplification 

FTA  supports  the  enactment  of  Federal  legislation  to  authorize  states  to  require 
remote  sellers  to  collect  sales  and  use  taxes  on  goods  and  services  sold  into  the 
state.  FTA  believes  that  advancing  this  legislation  should  be  the  top  state  tax  pri-
ority issue of the Commerce Committee. The change to a service based from a man-
ufacturing based economy along with the saturation of our sales system with Inter-
net transactions make modernization of the sales tax collection system an essential 
step that states must take. 

The  first  major  achievement  of  the  system  has  already  occurred.  Late  last  year 
a  voluntary  system  for  remote  seller  collection  of  sales  taxes  began.  We  have  1,200 
companies participating and more that 30 percent of the U.S. population covered in 
the new system. We expect a rapid expansion of the system once it becomes manda-
tory. 

Streamlining of state sales taxes has a long history. The U.S. Supreme Court held 
(Quill  Corp.  v.  North  Dakota)  that  a  state  may  not  require  a  seller  that  does  not 
have a physical presence in the state to collect tax on sales into the state. The deci-
sion  was  based  in  part  on  the  complexity  of  the  sales  tax  system  for  remote  sellers 
i.e.,  nonresident  sellers  without  a  physical  presence  in  the  state  of  purchase.  The 
Court also said clearly that Congress could authorize states to require remote sellers 
to collect tax. 

States have worked for 5 years with the business community to simplify adminis-
tration  of  sales  and  use  taxes  for  fixed-base  retailers  as  well  as  for  remote  sellers, 
to  reduce  the  compliance  burden.  Action  began  with  the  Streamlined  Sales  Tax 
Project (SSTP) and led to the creation of the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agree-
ment.  The  Agreement  substantially  simplified  sales  tax  collection.  Congress  should 
authorize member states to require remote sellers to collect sales taxes. 

Senate  legislation  from  the  109th  Congress  would  have  provided  the  basis  for 
states to require the collection of sales taxes by remote sellers. S. 2152 and S. 2153 
were  similar  bills,  differing  only  in  the  rules  for  exempting  small  businesses  from 
the  collection  requirement.  A  single  bill  resolving  the  differences  is  expected  to  be 
introduced by Senators Dorgan (D–ND) and Enzi (R–WY) before Memorial Day. 

• Key  simplifications  of  SSTP  include  state-level  administration  of  all  local  sales 
taxes,  greater  uniformity  in  tax  bases,  greater  use  of  technology,  due  diligence 
safe harbors for sellers, and uniform definitions. 
• Erosion of state and local government tax bases will intensify without required 
collection.  It  is  estimated  annual  revenue  loss  to  the  state  and  local  govern-
ments is now approximately $15 billion. 
• The  absence  of  required  remote  seller  tax  collection  places  hometown  sellers 
• The  Streamlined  Sales  and  Use  Tax  Agreement  took  effect  on  October  1,  2005, 
with  19  states,  representing  almost  30  percent  of  the  population,  participating. 
Collection of sales and use taxes by remote sellers under the Agreement is vol-
untary.  Federal  legislation  could  require  participation  of  remote  vendors  under 
the Agreement. 

that are required to collect tax at an unfair competitive disadvantage. 

FTA  urges  the  Committee  to  take  up  streamlining  as  a  separate  and  distinct 

issue. It should be advanced to conclusion this year. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
And now may I recognize Ms. Canning. 

STATEMENT OF ANNABELLE CANNING, ESQ., VICE 

PRESIDENT, STATE TAX POLICY, VERIZON COMMUNICATIONS 
Ms.  CANNING.  Chairman  Inouye,  Senator  Stevens,  and  members 
of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  an 
issue  of  real  importance  to  millions  of  consumers  and  businesses 
across the United States. 

My  name  is  Annabelle  Canning  and  I  am  Vice  President  for 
State Tax Policy at Verizon Communications. I appear today on be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

half  of  a  broad  coalition  of  Internet  service  providers,  Internet 
backbone providers, and Internet application and content providers 
to  support  a  permanent  extension  of  the  Internet  tax  moratorium. 
Thank you for the opportunity to speak today. 

It appears that the states and industry are in agreement that the 
moratorium  should  be  extended.  Accordingly,  I  would  like  to  focus 
my comments on three important points. 

First,  at  a  time  when  State  and  local  economic  development  ex-
perts are touting broadband as critical to economic competitiveness, 
the  moratorium  should  be  made  permanent  because  new  taxes  on 
Internet  access  could  have  a  chilling  effect  on  broadband  invest-
ment. 

The  moratorium  has  benefited  the  entire  United  States  economy 
by improving the productivity of American businesses and lowering 
prices  for  consumers  through  competition.  Recent  studies  support 
the  premise  that  broadband  investments  that  increase  the  speed 
and reach of communications networks improve the productivity of 
businesses.  Unfortunately,  in  many  states,  economic  development 
policy and tax policy are not aligned. 

Congressional  approval  of  a  permanent  moratorium  would  send 
a  clear  signal  to  the  markets  that  long-term  investment  decisions 
will not be undermined by the imposition of new taxes on Internet 
access  or  discriminatory  taxes  on  electronic  commerce.  A  strong 
pro-investment  signal  from  Congress  would  help  ensure  that  these 
investments,  which  have  had  such  an  important  role  in  the  U.S. 
economic  growth  and  productivity  over  the  last  decade,  will  con-
tinue  to  be  encouraged  and  rewarded.  It  will  send  a  signal  to  the 
capital markets to invest here in the U.S., and not abroad. 

Second, now that competition between different types of Internet 
access providers is lowering prices for consumers and making high- 
speed  Internet  access  more  accessible  and  affordable  to  lower-in-
come  households,  regressive  new  taxes  on  Internet  access  would 
create a new obstacle in efforts to close the digital divide. 

The  convergence  that  many  in  the  industry  have  discussed  for 
years  is  finally  here.  In  more  and  more  areas  of  the  country,  con-
sumers  have  choices:  high-speed  DSL,  high-speed  cable  modem  ac-
cess,  or  wireless  ‘‘3G’’  service.  Other  technologies  on  the  horizon 
may provide even more competitive choices. 

With  the  benefits  of  competition  now  coming  to  low-  and  mod-
erate-income  households,  the  imposition  of  new  taxes  on  Internet 
access  would  increase  prices  and  make  broadband  access  less  af-
fordable  to  such  households  as  well  as  small  businesses  that  need 
broadband  access  to  compete  in  the  global  economy.  Taxes  matter 
in  many  households  with  limited  amounts  of  discretionary  income. 
Finally, Congress should make it clear that the transport under-
lying the provision of Internet access is covered by the moratorium. 
The  current  Internet  tax  moratorium  on  State  and  local  taxes 
covers  the  transport  purchased,  used,  and  sold  by  Internet  access 
service  providers  to  provide  Internet  access.  Nonetheless,  some 
states  and  localities  have  persisted  in  imposing  taxes  on  Internet 
transport.  From  an  economic  standpoint,  taxation  of  the  transport 
component  of  Internet  access  is  indistinguishable  from  taxation  of 
Internet access itself. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Congress  expressed  its  clear  legislative  intent  that  Internet  ac-
cess  taxes  be  banned  at  both  the  retail  and  the  wholesale  level. 
Congress  must  ensure  that  consumers  are  not  subject  to  hidden 
taxes,  and  that  all  providers  of  Internet  access  are  subject  to  the 
same level of taxation with respect to purchases of wholesale trans-
port services. 

State and local governments have failed, over the past decade to 
reduce  excessive  and  discriminatory  taxes  on  telecommunications 
services—Virginia  remains  the  only  State  that  has  successfully 
eliminated  its  discriminatory  taxes  and  reduced  the  level  of  tax-
ation  imposed  on  communications  services  to  the  same  level  im-
posed on other competitive goods and services. 

What level of taxation would likely be imposed on Internet access 
and  electronic  commerce  if  the  moratorium  is  expired?  Consumers 
in  Prince  George’s  County,  Maryland,  could  pay  an  additional  11 
percent  in  local  taxes  on  purchases  of  Internet  access,  while  con-
sumers  in  Jacksonville,  Florida,  could  pay  as  much  as  30  percent 
in  combined  State  and  local  taxes  on  purchases  of  high-speed 
broadband access. 

There  is  widespread  agreement  that,  given  the  critical  impor-
tance  of  education  in  the  global  economy,  broadband  access  is  not 
a  luxury  but  a  necessity  for  American  families.  It  is  time  to  treat 
all  consumers  in  the  U.S.  the  same  and  to  protect  all  consumers 
from  excessive  and  regressive  taxation  by  eliminating  the 
grandfathering of the nine remaining states. 

Taxes do matter. The risk of excessive taxation of Internet access 

is as real in 2007 as it was in 1998. 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, thank you, again, 
for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  this  important  subject,  and  I  re-
spectfully  urge  you  to  pass  a  permanent  extension  of  the  Internet 
tax moratorium without extending the grandfather provisions. 

I look forward to answering any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Canning follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANNABELLE CANNING, ESQ., VICE PRESIDENT, 

STATE TAX POLICY, VERIZON COMMUNICATIONS 

Chairman Inouye, Senator Stevens, and members of the Committee, thank you for 
this  opportunity  to  testify  on  an  issue  of  real  importance  to  millions  of  consumers 
and businesses across the United States. 

My  name  is  Annabelle  Canning  and  I  am  Vice  President,  State  Tax  Policy  at 
Verizon Communications. I am responsible for pursuing state legislative tax reform 
initiatives that ensure fair and nondiscriminatory taxation of our consumers and en-
courage  increased  broadband  investment  by  communications  providers  in  innova-
tive,  new  technologies.  I  appear  today  on  behalf  of  a  broader  coalition  of  Internet 
service  providers,  Internet  ‘‘backbone’’  providers,  and  Internet  application  and  con-
tent providers—the ‘‘Don’t Tax Our Web’’ Coalition—to support a permanent exten-
sion of the Internet tax moratorium. 

Unless  Congress  acts,  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  will  expire  on  November  1, 
2007. I will focus on three important reasons why Congress should make the Inter-
net tax moratorium permanent: 

• First, at a time when state and local economic development experts are touting 
broadband as critical to economic competitiveness, new taxes on Internet access 
could have a chilling effect on broadband investment. 
• Second,  now  that  competition  between  different  types  of  Internet  access  pro-
viders  is  lowering  prices  for  consumers  and  making  high-speed  Internet  access 
more accessible and affordable to lower income households, regressive new taxes 
on  Internet  access  would  create  a  new  obstacle  in  efforts  to  close  the  ‘‘digital 
divide.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

• Finally,  a  number  of  states  and  localities  are  ignoring  the  will  of  Congress; 
therefore,  Congress  needs  to  make  it  clear  once  and  for  all  that  the  transport 
underlying  the  provision  of  Internet  access  and  high-speed  Internet  access  is 
covered  by  the  moratorium  on  taxes  on  Internet  access  service.  Otherwise,  the 
record  is  clear  that  states  and  localities  will  seek  to  avoid  the  moratorium  on 
Internet  access  taxes  by  imposing  taxes  on  the  underlying  transport  and  high- 
speed  Internet  access.  Recent  studies  of  the  taxation  of  telecommunications 
services suggest that such taxes could be excessive and discriminatory. 

1. Taxes on Internet Access Could Have a Chilling Effect on Investment in 

Broadband Networks 

The  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  was  adopted  by  the  Congress  and  signed  into  law 
by  President  Clinton  in  1998  to  promote  the  availability  of  Internet  access  services 
by  preventing  excessive  and  inconsistent  taxation  of  these  services.  Congress  was 
rightly  concerned  that  high  taxes  would  impose  undue  burdens  on  consumers,  and 
the  administrative  burdens  of  filing  in  thousands  of  taxing  jurisdictions  would  im-
pose a barrier to new competitors and innovation. 

The  moratorium,  by  preventing  the  imposition  of  excessive  telecommunications 
and  other  taxes  on  Internet  access,  has  been  instrumental  in  promoting  the  rapid 
development of high-speed broadband networks and the web-based applications that 
use  these  networks.  Congress’  foresight  in  adopting  the  moratorium  has  benefited 
the  entire  U.S.  economy  by  improving  the  productivity  of  American  businesses  and 
lowering prices for consumers through competition. 

Economists strongly discourage policymakers from imposing taxes on investment. 
However, in the case of investments in the communications networks that make up 
the  backbone  of  the  Internet,  tax  policies  that  discourage  investment  are  especially 
problematic  because  of  the  network  benefits  of  advanced  investments  in  the  tele-
communications infrastructure. Network benefits are the economic benefits provided 
by infrastructure investments—benefits that extend beyond the direct impact on the 
affected industry and enhance growth throughout the entire economy. 

Numerous  studies  support  the  premise  that  investments  that  increase  the  speed 
and  reach  of  communications  networks  improve  the  productivity  of  the  businesses 
that use these networks to conduct business every day. For example, a recent study 
by  the  international  technology  consulting  firm  Ovum  and  Indepen  found  that  as 
much  as  80  percent  of  the  productivity  growth  in  the  entire  economy  in  2003  and 
2004 was due to just two sectors: communications and information technology.1 For 
this reason, tax policies that have the effect of reducing investment in telecommuni-
cations  networks  have  negative  consequences  that  extend  far  beyond  the  firms  di-
rectly hit with the new taxes. 

The  productivity  benefits  to  the  U.S.  economy  that  flow  from  ensuring  continued 
growth  of  the  communications  sector  and  increased  investment  in  these  networks 
highlight the importance of making the Internet tax moratorium permanent. Failure 
to make the moratorium permanent will likely result in the excessive and discrimi-
natory taxes currently imposed on other communications services being extended to 
Internet access, resulting in decreased productivity in the economy generally. 

New  taxes  on  Internet  access,  or  discriminatory  taxes  on  electronic  commerce, 
would impose significant new costs on purchasers of Internet access and purchasers 
of  goods  and  services  that  are  delivered  over  the  Internet.  Higher  prices  for  such 
services  would  reduce  sales,  reduce  company  revenues,  and  thus  lower  the  rate  of 
return  on  investments  in  communications  networks  and  the  applications  provided 
over them. In addition, new taxes would increase the cost of doing business for U.S. 
firms  that  increasingly  rely  on  Internet-based  applications  and  services  as  part  of 
their operations. 

Much  has  been  written  in  the  last  few  years  about  the  investments  that  our  eco-
nomic  competitors  in  China,  India,  and  other  nations  are  making  in  their  commu-
nications networks. They recognize that broadband networks are crucial components 
of a successful strategy to compete in a global economy. Here at home, the Congress, 
our  Governors,  state  legislators,  and  local  officials  also  recognize  the  importance  of 
broadband networks in an overall economic development strategy. 

Unfortunately,  in  many  states,  state  economic  development  policy  and  tax  policy 
are  not  aligned.  On  the  one  hand,  states  subsidize  broadband  deployment  while  on 
the  other  hand  they  impose  excessive  property  and  sales  taxes  on  the  equipment 
necessary to provide broadband service. A review of current state tax policy suggests 
that,  notwithstanding  the  good  intentions  of  state  and  local  governments,  economic 
development  policy  priorities  alone  have  not  been  sufficient  to  prevent  state  and 

1 Lewin, David and Roger Entner. ‘‘Impact of the U.S. Wireless Telecom Industry on the U.S. 

Economy ,’’ Ovum and Indepen, Boston, MA, September 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

local governments from pursuing tax policies that are counterproductive to economic 
growth. 

Congressional  approval  of  a  permanent  moratorium  would  send  a  clear  signal  to 
the markets that long-term investment decisions will not be undermined by the im-
position  of  new  taxes  on  Internet  access  or  discriminatory  taxes  on  electronic  com-
merce.  Such  a  strong,  pro-investment  signal  from  the  Congress  would  help  ensure 
that  these  investments—which  have  had  such  an  important  role  in  U.S.  economic 
growth  and  productivity  over  the  last  decade—will  continue  to  be  encouraged  and 
rewarded. It will send a signal to the markets to invest here, not abroad. 
2.  Regressive  New  Taxes  on  Internet  Access  Would  Hurt  Efforts  To  Close 

the ‘‘Digital Divide’’ 

The ‘‘convergence’’ that many in the industry have been touting for years is finally 
here. In more and more areas of the country, consumers have choices. They can get 
high-speed  Internet  access  from  a  cable  provider,  DSL  from  a  telecommunications 
company,  and/or  WiFi  or  ‘‘3G’’  service  from  a  wireless  provider.  Other  technologies 
on the horizon may provide even more competitive choices. The key to this consumer 
choice is the availability of competing networks that reach the consumer. 

As a result of competition, the price of broadband Internet access service has fall-
en  in  many  markets.  In  those  areas  that  still  lack  competition,  the  key  to  bringing 
down prices for consumers is to get competing networks built and operating. 

At the very time that the benefits of competition are coming to low- and moderate- 
income  households,  the  imposition  of  new  taxes  on  Internet  access  would  increase 
prices  and  make  broadband  access  less  affordable  to  such  households  as  well  as 
small  businesses  that  need  broadband  access  to  enhance  their  ability  to  compete. 
New taxes on Internet access would be especially problematic if excessive state and 
local  telecommunications  taxes  were  simply  extended  to  such  services  by  tax  au-
thorities. 
3. Congress Should Act To Ensure That the Moratorium Is Not Undermined 

by State and Local Taxation 

The  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act’s  moratorium  on  state  and  local  taxes  covers  the 
transport  purchased,  used,  and  sold  by  Internet  access  service  providers  to  provide 
Internet  access  and  high-speed  Internet  access.  Nonetheless,  some  states  and  local-
ities have persisted in imposing taxes on Internet transport and high-speed Internet 
access.  If  left  unchecked,  such  activities  will  undermine  the  moratorium.  From  an 
economic standpoint, taxes on the transport component of Internet access are indis-
tinguishable from taxes on Internet access services. Both put the same upward pres-
sure  on  end-user  cost  of  service,  deterring  the  growth  of  Internet  access 
subscribership. 

A  report  released  by  GAO  in  2006,  on  the  Impact  of  the  Internet  Tax  Non-
discrimination Act on State Tax Revenues,2 concluded that the Internet tax morato-
rium  did  not  apply  to  Internet  backbone  services  (described  as  ‘‘acquired  services’’). 
However,  the  plain  language  of  the  statute,  as  well  as  the  relevant  legislative  his-
tory, reflect a clear legislative intent to ban Internet access taxes at both the retail 
and  wholesale  level.  One  of  Congress’s  primary  purposes  underlying  the  reenact-
ment  of  ITNA  was  to  address  potential  and  existing  inequities  with  respect  to  the 
states’ taxation of the various providers of Internet access. Congress was concerned 
that those providers who are required to primarily purchase the transport backbone 
services  from  another  entity  would  be  placed  at  a  competitive  disadvantage  com-
pared to those who own backbone networks. 

Congress  sought  to  correct  this  potential  inequity  to  ensure  that  all  providers  of 
Internet  access  would  be  subject  to  the  same  level  of  taxation  with  respect  to  their 
purchase of wholesale transport services and consumers would not be subject to ad-
ditional costs through the imposition of ‘‘hidden taxes’’ on the transport. 

The  willingness  of  states  and  localities  to  tax  communications  services  at  exces-
sive and discriminatory rates highlights the risk to consumers of indiscriminate new 
taxes  if  the  moratorium  is  not  extended  and  its  applicability  to  Internet  transport 
is  not  clarified  once  and  for  all.  These  excessive  rates  impact  not  only  consumers 
but also the growth of the Nation’s economy generally. 

In 1999, the Committee on State Taxation released a comprehensive study of the 
state  and  local  tax  burden  on  telecommunications  services.3 The  study  found  that 
consumers  of  telecommunications  services  paid  effective  state/local  tax  rates  that 

2 Government  Accountability  Office,  ‘‘Internet  Access  Tax  Moratorium  Revenue  Impacts  Will 

Vary by State.’’ Washington, D.C., January 2006, GAO–06–273. 

3 Committee on State Taxation, ‘‘50-State Study and Report on Telecommunications Taxation.’’ 

Washington, D.C., 1999. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

were  more  than  twice  those  imposed  on  taxable  goods  sold  by  general  business 
(13.74  percent  vs.  6  percent).  Including  Federal  taxes,  the  tax  burden  was  nearly 
three  times  higher  than  general  business.  In  addition,  due  to  the  sheer  number  of 
different  state  and  local  taxes  imposed  in  many  jurisdictions,  the  typical  commu-
nications  service  provider  was  required  to  file  seven  to  eight  times  as  many  tax  re-
turns compared to those filed by typical businesses (63,879 vs. 8,951 annually). 

Unfortunately,  with  the  exception  of  Virginia,  states  with  excessive  and  discrimi-
natory taxes on telecommunications service have not reformed their taxes to reduce 
the  level  of  taxation  imposed  on  these  services  to  the  same  level  imposed  on  other 
competitive  goods  and  services.  The  Heartland  Institute  released  a  new  report  this 
month  that  found  that  consumers  of  cable  TV,  wireless  and  wireline  phone  service 
paid an average of 13.5 percent in taxes, more than two times the 6.6 percent aver-
age sales tax rate. The study found that the average household would pay $125 less 
in  taxes  per  year  if  excessive  taxes  on  cable  TV  and  telecommunications  were  low-
ered to the sales tax rate. 

The  failure  of  most  State  and  local  governments  over  the  past  decade  to  reduce 
excessive  and  discriminatory  taxes  on  telecommunications  services  and  the  efforts 
by some states and localities to circumvent the moratorium by taxing telecommuni-
cations transport in blatant disregard of the moratorium heightens the risk that, ab-
sent the moratorium, these excessive and discriminatory taxes could be extended to 
Internet  access.  The  moratorium  was  enacted  to  prevent  this  from  happening,  and 
this  threat  is  as  real  in  2007  as  it  was  in  1998.  It  is  time  to  make  the  moratorium 
permanent and to end the state grandfather clauses. 

There is widespread agreement that, given the critical importance of education in 
the  global  economy,  broadband  access  is  not  a  luxury  but  a  necessity  for  American 
families. Making the moratorium permanent and clarifying the scope of its applica-
bility  would  ensure  that  regressive  state  and  local  taxes  do  not  impose  another  ob-
stacle  on  the  ability  of  low-income  families  to  prepare  for  and  participate  in  the 
global economy, particularly since only 16 states specifically exempt Internet access 
from their sales or communications taxes.4 

To  summarize,  making  the  Internet  tax  moratorium  permanent  will  provide  im-
portant social and economic benefits for American consumers and businesses. A per-
manent  moratorium  will  send  a  strong,  pro-investment  signal  to  those  entre-
preneurs that are looking to improve communications and commerce over the Inter-
net.  It  will  prevent  the  imposition  of  expensive  new  taxes  and  administrative  bur-
dens  on  businesses  that  conduct  interstate  commerce  over  the  Internet.  It  will  en-
sure  that  regressive  new  tax  burdens  are  not  imposed  on  lower-income  American 
families seeking to ensure that their kids are prepared for the global economy. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  again  for  the  oppor-
tunity to testify on this important subject, and I respectfully urge you to pass a per-
manent extension of the Internet tax moratorium. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Ms. Canning. 
Now may I recognize Mr. Dircksen. 

STATEMENT OF JEFF DIRCKSEN, DIRECTOR, CONGRESSIONAL 

ANALYSIS, NATIONAL TAXPAYER UNION FOUNDATION 

Mr. DIRCKSEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  members  of  the  Committee, 
my  name  is  Jeff  Dircksen,  and  I  am  the  Director  of  Congressional 
Analysis  for  the  National  Taxpayers  Union  Foundation,  the  re-
search  and  education  arm  of  the  National  Taxpayers  Union.  NTU 
is  America’s  oldest  and  largest  grassroots  taxpayer  organization, 
with  over  362,000  members  in  all  50  states.  You  can  learn  more 
about NTU and NTUF online, at NTU.org. 

I appreciate the opportunity to testify on the topic of communica-
tions, taxation, and federalism here today. I also had the privilege, 
in 2001, of addressing the Committee. And so, in the sense of Sen-
ator Carper’s de´ja` vu, here I am again, as well. 

But  these  hearings  continue  to  address  some  of  the  most  impor-
tant  technological  and  economic  issues  facing  America.  I  am  here 

4 AL, AZ, CO, CT, DC, FL, IA, MD, MA, MI, MO, NY, NC, PA, UT, VA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

on behalf of NTU’s members, and taxpayers in general, to urge you 
to  extend  the  Internet  tax  moratorium  and  to  ensure  that  the 
Internet  and  online  transactions  remain  free  from  predatory  tax-
ation. 

My  prepared  statement  touches  on  three  taxpayer  concerns.  The 
first  is  that  taxpayers  already  face  sizable  taxes,  fees,  and  other 
charges for telecommunications services. Research shows that, over 
time,  the  users  of  telecom  services  have  consistently  shouldered 
higher  tax  burdens  on  those  products,  when  compared  to  the  tax 
on other goods and services. 

Also,  studies  have  shown  that  there  is  a  significant  economic 
deadweight  loss,  due  to  taxes  and  fees  on  cable  and  wireless  serv-
ices, that run in the billions annually. I would also commend to you 
a  2006  study  by  Chicago  Professor  Goolsbee,  who  found  that  the 
deadweight loss, in looking back to 1998, on broadband services in 
some  markets  would  have  forced  some  providers  to  exclude  those 
markets or not enter those markets at all. It’s seeing them as mar-
ginal. 

Second, additional taxes on telecommunication services would be 
counterproductive for consumers and service providers. Representa-
tive  Eshoo  noted  earlier  that  we  rank  15th  in  broadband  penetra-
tion among OECD countries. 

Third,  we  believe  that  the  1992  Supreme  Court  Quill  ruling  has 
protected  taxpayers  by  ensuring  tax  competition  among  states  and 
local governments. We believe tax harmonization will only result in 
a  race  to  the  top,  as  State  legislators  are  unwilling  to  forego  local 
add-on taxes and, instead, build from that base up. 

And, finally, fourth, we talk about pro-taxpayer, pro-market solu-
tions  and  suggestions  that  can  encourage  economic  growth  and  in-
novation  on  the  telecom  sector.  Just  a  couple  of  recommendations 
would  be:  a  permanent  ban  on  Internet  access  taxes,  a  permanent 
ban  on  levying  new  discriminatory  taxes  on  wireless  services,  and 
the  repeal  of  the  remainder  of  the  phone  excise  taxes  that  apply 
to local phone calls. 

As  Senator  Carper  mentioned,  I’d  like  to  retell  or  follow  up  on 

a story I told when I testified in 2001. 

Prior  to  my  testimony,  I  received  an  e-mail  from  my  sister,  who 
lived  in  Gann  Valley,  South  Dakota.  She  said  that  my  brother-in- 
law  was  going  to  give  up  farming  and  go  to  work  for  the  local 
telecom,  and  do  telecommunications  Internet  services.  I  mentioned 
that  in  the  hearing.  My  mother,  who  lives  in  South  Dakota,  was 
listening to the hearing online, and was surprised to hear that fact. 
My  sister  hadn’t  told  her  yet.  Now,  that  little  touchy  moment  for 
my family was probably unimportant to the millions of people who 
access  the  Internet.  But  that  little  family  moment,  for  us,  was 
made possible because the Internet does not have high tax and reg-
ulatory  burdens  that  either  faced  my  sister  in  Gann  Valley  or  in 
Woonsocket  or  Parker  or  Tea  or  Harrisburg,  South  Dakota,  or  for 
my  mother,  in  Sioux  Falls.  It’s  important,  then,  to  make  sure  that 
those  individuals,  whether  in  metro  areas  or  across  rural  areas, 
have access to Internet broadband technology. 

In  a  recent  conversation  with  someone,  talking  about  these 
issues,  the  individual  said,  ‘‘Well,  this  ground  has  been  well 
plowed.’’  And  I  said,  ‘‘Yes.’’  It  seems  as  if  the  Internet  and  these 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Internet  issues—tax  policy  issues—have  been  around  forever.  We 
believe  that  it  is  time  that  members  of  the  Committee  agree  that 
Internet access should not be taxed. Back in 2001, a member of the 
Committee  came  out  and  said  so.  Senator  Carper  has  said  so.  It’s 
time to send a clear signal to consumers and service providers that 
making  the  Internet  tax  moratorium  permanent  is  the  way  to  go, 
that other legislation should be adopted, then, that is both low-tax 
and pro-free-market. Those are the best means to clear the way for 
more  innovation  and  more  growth  in  the  21st  century.  NTU’s  gov-
ernment  affairs  folks  are  willing  to  work  with  you,  your  staff,  and 
the Committee to help advance a pro-taxpayer, low-tax, pro-growth 
agenda. 

I  thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  It  is  my  hope 
that  in  the  future,  if  I  have  the  privilege  to  return  again,  we  will 
be talking about the successes of these pro-growth policies, and not 
wishing that we could extend them for a few more years. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Dircksen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEFF DIRCKSEN, DIRECTOR, CONGRESSIONAL ANALYSIS, 

NATIONAL TAXPAYERS UNION FOUNDATION 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  my 
name is Jeff Dircksen, and I am the Director of Congressional Analysis for National 
Taxpayers Union Foundation, the education and research arm of the National Tax-
payers Union (NTU). NTU is America’s oldest and largest grassroots taxpayer orga-
nization with over 362,000 members in all 50 states. You can learn more about NTU 
and NTUF online at www.ntu.org. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  topic  of  communications,  taxation, 
and  federalism.  This  hearing  addresses  some  of  the  most  important  technological 
and  economic  issues  facing  America.  I  am  here  on  behalf  of  NTU  and  its  member-
ship to urge you to extend the Internet tax moratorium and to ensure that the Inter-
net and online transactions remain free from predatory taxes. 

Today,  I  want  to  share  three  taxpayer  concerns  regarding  taxing  Internet  usage 
and the application of additional taxes or fees to Internet access or transactions. In 
addition,  I  will  suggest  policy  alternatives  that  would  be  both  pro-free  market  and 
pro-taxpayer  in  their  orientation.  First,  state  and  local  governments  already  place 
sizable  taxes,  fees,  and  other  charges  on  taxpayers  who  subscribe  to  various  tele-
communications  services,  whether  wired,  wireless,  or  online.  Second,  allowing  gov-
ernmental  entities  to  increase  this  burden  would  be  counterproductive  for  con-
sumers  and  telecommunications  providers.  Third,  the  Supreme  Court’s  1992  Quill 
ruling  has  protected  taxpayers  by  ensuring  tax  competition  among  state  and  local 
governments  who  might  otherwise  engage  in  round  after  round  of  tax  hikes  in  a 
‘‘race to the top.’’ 

Finally,  on  behalf  of  our  members,  I  would  urge  you  to  consider  how  taxpayers 
would be better served by low-tax, pro-free market policies that encourage economic 
growth and innovation in the telecommunications sector (in contrast to higher taxes, 
fees, and additional regulation). 
1.  Taxpayers  Already  Face  Sizable  Taxes,  Fees,  and  Other  Charges  for 

Telecommunications Services 

In 2000, the National Conference of State Legislatures estimated that there were 
nearly 11,000 state and local governmental entities that could levy taxes or fees on 
telecommunication activities, including franchise taxes, utility taxes, line access and 
right-of-way  charges,  9–1–1  fees,  relay  charges,  and  maintenance  surcharges.1 Re-
search  shows  that  over  time,  the  users  of  telecommunication  services  have  consist-
ently  shouldered  higher  tax  burdens  on  telecommunications  products  when  com-
pared to taxes on other goods and services. A Council on State Taxation (COST) re-
port  released  in  1999  found  that  consumers  faced  an  effective  state  and  local  tax 
rate of 13.74 percent, which was more than double the 6 percent rate that imposed 

1 Scott  Mackey,  ‘‘Telecommunications  and  the  Tangle  of  Taxes,’’  State  Legislatures,  February 

2000, www.ncsl.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

on  other  taxable  goods.2 A  2005  update  to  that  report  found  that  the  effective  rate 
confronting  taxpayers  had  risen  to  14.17  percent,  while  general  business  taxes  had 
increased to 6.12 percent from 6 percent. 

While  a  recent  report  produced  by  the  Heartland  Institute  and  the  Beacon  Hill 
Institute at Suffolk University found a slightly lower tax rate than the COST study, 
it did estimate that the average tax rate for telecommunications services was either 
13.52 percent or 11.04 percent, depending upon whether Internet access taxes were 
included  or  not.  Table  1  below  summarizes  the  average  monthly  bill,  tax  paid,  and 
tax rate that consumers face. That rate is still double the average general sales tax, 
which  was  6.61  percent  in  the  study.  Please  bear  in  mind  also  that  Heartland/Bea-
con  Hill’s  findings  reflect  adjustments  to  the  methodology  for  which  COST’s  study 
was  criticized  by  self-interested  local  officials.  Using  the  average  annual  taxes  and 
fees paid on cable TV and telephone services (both wired and wireless), the authors 
estimate  that  the  total  annual  tax  bill  paid  by  consumers  is  $37  billion.  The  esti-
mate does not include ‘‘losses due to reduced investment, productivity, and consump-
tion.’’ 3 

Table 1.—The Average Monthly Bill, Tax Paid, and Tax Rate for Communication Services 

Service 

Average 

monthly bill 

Average 
tax paid 

Average 
tax rate 

Cable TV 
Wireline Phone 
Wireless Phone 
Subtotal 

Internet Access 

Total 

$52.36 
49.33 
49.98 
151.67 

36.50 

188.17 

$6.12 
8.50 
5.89 
20.51 

0.26 

20.77 

11.69% 
17.23 
11.78 
13.52 

0.71 

11.04 

Source: Heartland Institute Policy Study #113, May 2007. 
Lowering  the  taxes  on  telecommunications  to  even  the  average  sales  tax  rate 
would  put  some  money  in  the  pockets  of  consumers.  The  authors  of  the  Heartland 
and  Beacon  Hill  Institute  study  observe,  ‘‘The  average  household  would  save 
$125.76  a  year  if  taxes  and  fees  on  cable  television  and  phone  calls  were  the  same 
as  the  average  general  sales  tax  on  clothing,  sporting  goods,  and  household  prod-
ucts.’’ 4 The  savings  may  not  appear  to  be  significant  to  those  of  us  living  in  the 
Washington metro area, but for consumers in other areas of the country the amount 
might not be a paltry matter. (Of course, the savings could be even more substantial 
if  the  tax  rates  were  reduced  to  zero  for  the  communications  services.)  I  make  this 
point because when I had the opportunity to testify on these issues in 2001, I men-
tioned that I had just learned that my brother-in-law was planning to stop farming 
near Gann Valley, South Dakota, and start working for a local Internet service pro-
vider. For some potential Internet or telecommunications customers in Gann Valley, 
Woonsocket,  or  Viborg,  South  Dakota,  those  savings  might  make  the  difference  be-
tween connecting to a world outside of the Great Plains or not. 
2.  Additional  Taxes  on  Telecommunications  Services  Would  Be 

Counterproductive for Consumers and Service Providers 

Additional taxes on Internet access or other telecommunications services may fur-
ther slow the adoption of broadband technologies in the U.S. According to data from 
the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD), as of Decem-
ber  2006,  the  U.S.  ranks  15th  out  of  30  OECD  countries  for  broadband  subscribers 
per  100  inhabitants.5 Table  2  below  shows  that  the  U.S.  trails  countries  such  as 
Denmark and Canada, but also Luxembourg. 

2 Scott R. Mackey, Testimony before the House Committee on the Judiciary, Subcommittee on 
Commercial  and  Administrative  Law,  Oversight  Hearing  on  State  Taxation  of  Internet  Tele-
communications Services, June 13, 2006. 

3 David Tuerck et al., ‘‘Taxes and Fees on Communication Services,’’ The Heartland Institute, 

Policy Study #113, May 2007, http://www.heartland.org, p. 22. 

4 David Tuerck et al. 
5 Organisation  for  Economic  Co-operation  and  Development,  ‘‘OECD  Broadband  Statistics  to 

December 2006,’’ http://www.oecd.org/sti/ict/broadband. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Table 2.—Broadband Subscribers per 100 Inhabitants 

Country 

Rank 

1 
2 
3 
4 
5 
6 
7 
8 
9 
10 
11 
12 
13 
14 
15 

Denmark 
Netherlands 
Iceland 
Korea 
Switzerland* 
Norway 
Finland 
Sweden* 
Canada 
Belgium 
United Kingdom 
Luxembourg 
France 
Japan 
United States 
Notes: *Data for Sweden and Switzerland are preliminary estimates based on September 2006 data. 
Source: OECD. 
Broadband technologies are highly price-elastic, meaning that consumers are sen-
sitive  to  changes  in  price,  including  the  imposition  of  additional  taxes  and  fees. 
Steve  Titch,  a  policy  analyst  with  the  Reason  Foundation,  points  out  that  a  1  per-
cent  hike  in  the  price  of  wireless  service  leads  to  a  1.29  percent  drop  in  demand. 
The demand for cable TV falls 3 percent in response to a 1 percent rise in the price 
of  the  service.  Titch  concludes,  ‘‘This  elasticity  also  is  why  legislators  should  avoid 
the  temptation  to  ‘simplify’  telecom  taxes  by  raising  them  all  to  match  the  service 
taxed at the highest rate. In addition to being simplified, telecom taxes must be low-
ered.’’ 6 

Such  taxes  can  cause  consumers  to  alter  their  decisionmaking  processes  and  to 
select  services  based  on  taxes  rather  than  on  the  true  cost  or  quality  of  what  is 
being  offered.  Producers  may  decide  to  forego  an  investment  that  they  might  have 
made  in  the  absence  of  the  tax  structure.  These  economically  inefficient  decisions 
lead  to  a  loss  of  both  consumer  and  producer  surpluses,  resulting  in  what  econo-
mists  would  call  a  ‘‘deadweight  loss.’’  The  annual  deadweight  loss  due  from  taxes 
and  fees  on  cable  has  been  estimated  to  be  as  high  as  $2.6  billion  annually.7 The 
economic loss to the country from wireless taxes and fees is even larger—$8.8 billion 
a year.8 A 2006 analysis by economist Austan Goolsbee found that if taxes had been 
levied  on  broadband  technologies  in  1998  that  the  resulting  deadweight  loss  would 
have slowed the entry of broadband suppliers into some marginal markets.9 Accord-
ing  to  Goolsbee,  ‘‘[T]he  deadweight  loss  adjustment  associated  with  the  impact  of 
taxes on diffusion, $70 million, exceeds the conventional deadweight loss by a factor 
of  2  (raising  the  total  [deadweight  loss]  from  around  180  percent  of  revenue  to  434 
percent of revenue.)’’ 10 

Rather  than  aggravating  these  economic  losses  with  new  or  higher  taxes,  Con-
gress  should  adopt  a  policy  that  bans  new  taxes  and  repeals  those  already  in  place 
(or at least lowers them). NTU has supported the temporary extensions of the Inter-
net  tax  moratorium,  while  urging  a  permanent  ban  on  access  taxes  and  other  tele-
communications  fees.  Such  a  ban  would  remove  the  economic  inefficiencies  and  un-
certainties  associated  with  temporary  moratoriums,  thereby  sending  a  strong  and 
clear  signal  to  taxpayers  and  service  providers:  namely,  that  broadband  and  wire-
less  are  technologies  that  will  be  allowed  to  grow  and  innovate  without  the  specter 
of the ‘‘tax man’’ lurking in the shadows. 
3. The Quill Ruling has Protected Taxpayers by Ensuring Tax Competition 

Among State and Local Governments 

Any  scheme  that  intends  to  simplify,  streamline,  or  make  sales  taxes  ‘‘fairer’’  on-
line  is  just  one  step  away  from  trampling  the  Supreme  Court’s  1992  Quill  ruling. 

6 Steve Titch, ‘‘The $37 Billion Telecom Tax Burden,’’ http://www.reason.org, May 1, 2007. 
7 Jerry  Ellig  and  James  Nicholas  Taylor,  ‘‘The  Consumer  Costs  of  Wireless  Taxes  and  Sur-
charges,’’  Working  Paper  in  Regulatory  Studies,  Mercatus  Center,  March  2006,  cited  in  David 
Tuerck et al. 

8 Ibid. 
9 Austan  Goolsbee,  ‘‘The  Value  of  Broadband  and  the  Deadweight  Loss  of  Taxing  New  Tech-

nology,’’ Contributions to Economic Analysis & Policy, Vol. 5, Issue 1, 2006. 

10 Austan Goolsbee, pp. 19–20. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Consumers  should  be  wary  of  this  backdoor  attempt  to  run  roughshod  over  the 
Court’s  restrictions  on  taxing  phone  and  catalog  sales.  If  such  a  system  of 
extraterritorial  collection  is  allowed,  Congress  will  have  opened  the  door  to  any 
number  of  potential  tax  cartels  that  will  eventually  harm  rather  than  help  tax-
payers. 

Forty-five states and the District of Columbia impose some type of a broad-based 
retail sales and use tax.11 The Federation of Tax Administrators calculates the me-
dian  state  sales  tax  rate  to  be  5.5  percent.12 The  sales  taxes  levied  on  consumers 
is  likely  higher,  however,  since  local  governments  in  34  states  are  also  allowed  to 
levy  a  sales  tax.  Consequently,  there  are  an  estimated  7,458  governmental  entities 
that can impose a sales or use tax. 

In  almost  every  case,  the  taxes  imposed  by  local  governments  are  ‘‘add-ons,’’  or 
taxes  that  are  in  addition  to  the  state’s  base  sales  tax  rate.  One  must  ask  whether 
it  is  reasonable  to  believe  that  local  elected  officials  would  be  willing  to  eliminate 
these  ‘‘add-ons’’  in  the  name  of  simplification.  Instead,  taxpayers  are  likely  to  see 
an escalation of rates—a ‘‘race to the top’’—especially when politicians can hide be-
hind  the  cloak  of  ‘‘simplification’’  and  ‘‘harmonization.’’  In  reality,  such  actions 
would essentially kill tax competition among states. Elected officials would have lit-
tle incentive to keep tax rates—or government expenditures—in check. The current 
sales tax structure authorizes states and localities to determine taxing priorities, al-
lowing  tax  bases  and  rates  to  vary  as  legislative  bodies  see  fit.  NTU  frequently  re-
ceives  letters  and  e-mail  messages  from  individuals  who  are  considering  relocating 
their  families  and  businesses  and  want  to  find  information  on  state  and  local  tax 
burdens.  These  individuals  see  tax  competition  among  states  as  extremely  bene-
ficial. 
4. Pro-Taxpayer, Pro-Market Policy Suggestions That Encourage Economic 

Growth and Innovation in the Telecommunications Sector 

The  following  is  a  list  of  recommendations  that  would  benefit  taxpayers  through 
lower  taxes  and  economic  expansion,  as  well  as  through  innovation  in  the  quality 
and delivery of telecommunication services. 

• A permanent ban on Internet access taxes. As NTU’s Senior Government Affairs 
Manager  Kristina  Rasmussen  noted  in  a  January  5,  2007  letter  to  Senators 
Wyden,  McCain,  and  Sununu,  ‘‘Since  its  enactment  in  December  2004,  the 
Internet  Tax  Nondiscrimination  Act  has  stopped  any  new  taxes  targeted  at 
Internet  access  services.  This  bill  and  its  predecessors  have  helped  to  create  a 
dynamic  environment  where  the  Internet  is  thriving  and  bringing  advanced 
communication capabilities to millions. Keeping the burden of new government- 
mandated access charges off Internet service has made entry to the information 
superhighway more affordable for Americans from all walks of life.’’ Making the 
moratorium  permanent  would  continue  to  keep  that  information  superhighway 
affordable, today and in the future. 
• A permanent ban on levying new discriminatory taxes on wireless services. Local 
and  state  governments  believe  wireless  taxes,  fees,  and  surcharges  are  a  ‘‘cash 
cow’’  for  the  21st  century.  Yet,  they  fail  to  consider  that  the  total  wireless  tax 
and fee burden can exceed 20 percent in some areas—a higher effective tax rate 
than  the  typical  middle-class  consumer  pays  on  a  1040  Federal  income  tax  re-
turn. Again, higher wireless taxes will cause consumer demand to fall and limit 
the ability of service providers to enhance current offerings or develop new ones. 
The  fact  is,  all  too  many  officials  in  states  and  localities  have  been  oblivious, 
and often contemptuous, toward this miserable situation. The City of Corvallis, 
Oregon provides but one example of where elected leaders resorted to a noxious 
tax scheme to make wireless services far less affordable. Voters demolished this 
proposal  when  it  was  referred  to  them  last  fall,  but  this  laudable  outcome  en-
tailed  extraordinary  efforts  on  the  part  of  local  residents  (including  our  own 
members)  to  beat  back  the  tax  hike.  Until  citizen  activists  can  establish  com-
prehensive  tax  limitation  and  reduction  measures  in  their  communities,  it  is 
perfectly reasonable for Congress to set some sensible boundaries under Federal 
law (just as it did with the Internet Tax Freedom Act). 
• Repeal  the  remainder  of  the  phone  excise  tax.  While  the  Treasury’s  decision  to 
forgo  collection  of  the  phone  excise  tax  on  long  distance  telephone  calls  was  a 

11 Harley T. Duncan, ‘‘State and Local Retail Sales Taxes, Submitted to the President’s Advi-

sory Panel on Federal Tax Reform,’’ Federation of Tax Administrators, April 2005. 

12 Federation  of  Tax  Administrators,  ‘‘State  Sales  Tax  Rates  and  Vendor  Discounts,’’  January 

1, 2006, http://www.taxadmin.org/fta/rate/vendor.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

step in the right direction, action should be taken to repeal the tax that is still 
being levied on local calls. 
• Adopt  business  activity  tax  simplification  legislation.  The  integration  of  the 
Internet and telecommunications technologies has allowed businesses to expand 
across  state  lines,  and  interstate  business  activities  are  now  commonplace. 
However, these developments have created confusion about when states are per-
mitted  to  collect  income  taxes  from  out-of-state  companies  conducting  certain 
activities within their jurisdiction. Unfortunately, governments are increasingly 
defining  ‘‘substantial  nexus’’  differently,  leading  to  a  complex  matrix  of  tax 
rules.  Congress  should  adopt  legislation  that  contains  specific  standards  that 
define when firms should be obliged to pay business activity taxes. 
• Provide  clarification  on  whether  ‘‘acquired  transactions’’  are  taxable  or  not.  In 
its  January  2006  report  to  this  Committee  entitled  ‘‘Internet  Access  Tax  Mora-
torium:  Revenue  Impacts  Will  Vary  by  State,’’  the  Government  Accountability 
Office (GAO) argued that the current Internet tax moratorium does not exempt 
certain  ‘‘acquired  services’’  from  taxation.  These  services  include  ‘‘high-speed 
communications capacity over fiber, acquired by Internet service providers (ISP) 
and used to deliver Internet access.’’ 13 However, GAO’s view is not accepted by 
all state tax officials or representatives of the telecommunications industry. We 
would recommend exempting such transactions to prevent state or local govern-
ments from making an end-run around the moratorium. 
• Maintain  the  integrity  of  the  spectrum  auctioning  process.  Competitive  bidding 
for taxpayer-owned airwaves has been successful all around, by providing a fair 
price  for  a  valuable  commodity,  yielding  billions  of  dollars  in  potential  deficit 
reduction, and fostering the expansion of telecommunications services. Yet, Con-
gress  and  the  FCC  continue  to  experience  pressure  from  certain  businesses 
seeking  exceptions  or  favorable  treatment  during  the  auctioning  process.  Fur-
thermore,  disgruntled  rivals  in  the  same  or  even  other  industries  seek  regu-
latory  action  to  enjoin  common  business  decisions  such  as  mergers.  The  proper 
response  to  such  pleas  is  not  additional  intervention  in  the  market,  but  rather 
providing  the  spectrum  (through  competitive  auctioning)  that  will  allow  all 
comers  to  follow  through  with  their  business  plans  and  offer  consumers  more 
choices. 
• Reexamine  unproductive  subsidies.  To  give  just  one  example,  the  Universal 
Service  Fund’s  ‘‘High  Cost’’  program,  which  subsidizes  phone  service  in  certain 
areas (often rural), was created as a way to further the goal set out by the 1934 
Communications  Act  to  provide  reasonably  priced  communications  across  the 
Nation.  According  to  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget’s  Program  Assess-
ment  Rating  Tool,  High  Cost  is  rated  ‘‘Results  Not  Demonstrated’’  because  it 
‘‘does  not  measure  the  impact  of  funds  on  telephone  subscribership  in  rural 
areas  or  other  potential  measures  of  program  success,  nor  does  it  base  funding 
decisions  on  measurable  benefits.’’  A  program  whose  purpose  has  been  firmly 
implanted  for  decades  should  have  established  benchmarks  for  success  by  now, 
but apparently not in this case. 

Conclusion 

Given  the  potentially  destructive  impact  that  expanding  or  raising  Internet  and 
telecommunications taxes could have on this important economic sector, the remedy 
could  not  be  clearer:  Congress  and  the  states  should  declare  this  tax  territory  per-
manently  ‘‘off  limits.’’  Again,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  here  today,  Mr. 
Chairman. Our membership is grateful that the voices of taxpayers are being heard 
as well as recognized. I look forward to your questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Dircksen. 
May I now recognize our Vice Chairman, Senator Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Would  you  put  my  statement—opening  statement  in  the  record 

here—— 

The CHAIRMAN. It is so ordered. 

13 U.S. Government Accountability Office, ‘‘Internet Access Tax Moratorium: Revenue Impacts 

Will Vary by State,’’ January 2006, Highlights. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Senator STEVENS.—please? 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thanks to the Internet, more goods and services are sold in Alaska every day, and 
Alaskans are able to market their goods to customers in the Lower 48. This is bene-
ficial  for  small  businesses.  Access  to  the  Internet  has  provided  Alaskans  with  a 
means to get lower rates for hotel and air travel when they are planning trips out-
side  the  state.  Additionally,  broadband  access  has  eliminated  distance  barriers  for 
education and medicine. 

To  ensure  those  benefits  continue  to  reach  as  many  Americans  as  possible,  Con-
gress  should  reduce  any  obstacles  to  Internet  access.  One  way  to  do  that  is  to  pre-
vent  Federal,  state  and  local  taxes  that  drive  up  costs  for  Internet  access.  During 
the period of the imposition of the moratorium in 1998 and now, there has been tre-
mendous  investment,  growth  and  innovation  in  broadband  deployment  and  I  hope 
this continues. 

I am pleased to see that this issue has bipartisan support in both the House and 
the Senate and look forward to the testimony today and working with my colleagues 
to extend the moratorium which expires in November of this year. 

Senator STEVENS. I apologize for being late. 
And  I  do  not  wish  to  offend  my  good  friend,  but  I’m  compelled 
to  ask  this  question.  Under  what  procedure  do  you  think  we  could 
approach the nine remaining states that do tax, and have a phase- 
out that’s fair to all concerned? Any suggestions? 

Ms. Canning? 
Ms. CANNING. Yes. I think most states are either in session once 
a  year  or  every  2  years.  So  typically  when  we’ve  done  solutions  in 
the states, as far as tax-reform types of solutions, it’s typically been 
a  2-year  period.  I  think  it  theoretically  could  be  a  4-year  period. 
But I think the idea is, to give the State sufficient time. We’re not 
talking about a substantial amount of money, as compared to other 
sources of revenue in the states, and, I would think, over some pe-
riod of time that allowed for the states to analyze their budget con-
siderations  during  the  1  year,  2  year,  maybe  a  4  year  period—— 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I’m informed—— 
Ms. CANNING.—it could be addressed. 
Senator  STEVENS.  I’m  informed  that  Hawaii’s  is  somewhere 
around $5 million a year. It is just a State tax, and it’s not county 
or local taxes, right? 

Ms. CANNING. It can vary. There may be a few local jurisdictions 
in  Colorado.  It’s  sort  of  uncertain.  But,  otherwise,  it’s  only  state- 
level, yes. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  if  we  could  do  that,  we  could  then  have 

a permanent, rather than a moratorium, right? 

Ms. CANNING. That is correct. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Any  of  you  have  any  opposition  to  that  con-

cept? 

Mr. Quam? 
Mr.  QUAM.  Yes,  sir.  The  Governors  have  called  for  a  temporary 
extension  and  a  continuation  of  the  grandfathers.  And  the  reason 
for  that,  they  serve  some  very  important  purposes.  They  are  safe-
guards. It’s pretty clear, from even the testimony today in some dif-
ferences  in  what  the  definition  means,  both  between  GAO,  NGA, 
and industry, that we haven’t gotten this right yet. The temporary 
extension of the moratorium and the grandfathers were part of the 
original  deal,  really  out  of  respect  for  federalism  and  the  fact  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

these  are  State  and  local  taxes  that  we’re  dealing  with.  By  having 
those safeguards in place in a temporary moratorium, you can deal 
with  issues  of  the  definition.  Congress  can  come  back  and  recheck 
where the things stand, because the Internet is changing so much. 
And then, on the grandfather clause, it’s not just nine states with 
taxes I think you’re right, in Colorado there are some local jurisdic-
tions—but  that  protection  also  protected  a  lot  of  other  taxes  in  all 
states, because it grandfathered in all taxes that may apply to this 
industry as it came online. 

You’d  have  to  go  back  and,  with  the  grandfather  protection, 
make sure that the moratorium would not inadvertently apply, es-
pecially at the local level, to taxes that were not anticipated or peo-
ple aren’t thinking of. It’s not just the direct tax on Internet access, 
there  is  a  protection  there  for  indirect  taxes  that,  unless  you  get 
the  definitions  right,  could  fall  under  the  moratorium.  So,  it’s  an 
important safeguard, and we’d argue that it needs to stay in place. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  if  I  understand  this  correctly,  the  use  of 
the Internet has expanded that—the economy of the country—that 
all  states  benefit  from  that  expansion.  Now,  the  difficulty  is,  is 
there  were  some  states  that  already  had  taxes  in  place.  You  sort 
of  implied  that  you  think  that  there  are  taxing  jurisdictions  be— 
smaller  than  the  states  themselves,  that  are  still  imposing  taxes. 
That surprises me. I didn’t think that was the case. 

But I would like to see us get to the point where it’s a level play-
ing  field.  It  does  seem  to  me  that  the  states  that  don’t  have  taxes 
are  being  penalized  by  the  moratorium  more  than  those  that 
have—get  the  moratorium,  obviously.  And  I’d  like  to  see  us  elimi-
nate  this  moratorium,  the  necessity  to  extend  the  moratorium 
every—it’s 2 years, isn’t it, Mr. Chairman? 
The CHAIRMAN. It expires in November. 
Senator STEVENS. November, yes. 
We  could  put  into  this  extension  a  process  for  elimination  of  the 
existing taxes, if we desire to do so. And I seem to remember a dis-
cussion  like  this  the  last  time  we  extended  this.  Now,  were  any  of 
you involved in those discussions? 

Mr. QUAM. Yes, sir. 
Ms. CANNING. Yes. And, actually, I do want to point out that, in 
fact—last time around, we did have—similar concerns raised about 
the clarity of what is meant by a tax on Internet access. When we 
talk  about  a  tax  on  Internet  access,  we’re  talking  about  the  pur-
chase  of  service  by  the  consumer.  These  are  consumer  taxes.  And 
additional language was put into the compromise version last time 
that did clarify the fact that it did not apply to taxes on infrastruc-
ture, on the companies, that sort of thing. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I think as long as the moratorium exists, 
it  raises  the  question  of  how  to  get  around  it  in  those  states  that 
want to continue to tax. And I think we ought to have a flat, abso-
lute barrier to taxes on the Internet. Now, I don’t know how we get 
there,  but  I  would  encourage  you  all  to  give  us  some  suggestions. 
I  don’t  know  how  the  Chairman  and  other  members  of  the  Com-
mittee feel about that. But it does seem to me that this is such an 
essential  element  now,  particularly  going  into  broadband,  its  ubiq-
uitous  utility  now  has  got  to  be  realized  by  everybody,  and  it’s  not 
going to be if some places are going to try to go around what we’ve 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

done  and  impose  the  tax  and  leave  it  up  to  some  court  to  decide 
whether that’s valid or not. I would like to see an impregnable ban 
on tax on the Internet. 

Now, does that—do any of you think that’s not possible? 
Dr. White, do you think that’s possible? 
Dr.  WHITE.  It’s  possible,  Senator.  Our  issue  is  about  the  clarity 
of  the  language  in  the  law.  We  interpreted  the  plain  language  of 
the  statute.  In  terms  of  the  clarity  issues,  we  recognize  that  there 
are  others  that  have  a  different  opinion  on  what  it  means,  and  we 
would  be  happy  to  work  with  your  staff  to  clarify  the  language,  if 
that’s  the  issue.  In  terms  of  extending  it  to  the  nine  states,  we 
haven’t  done  work  on  that  specific  issue,  the  best  way  to  do  that. 

Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Mr. DUNCAN. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  would  invite  your  assistance  to  the 
staff to make suggestions. And I don’t know yet how my colleagues 
feel about this, but I know that ours is a State that deals with the 
Internet  exclusively  now,  in  terms  of  commerce,  and  most  people 
don’t  realize  how  Alaska  has  utilized  the  Internet  to  the  extent  of 
just almost total utilization in very remote areas. And, through the 
use  of  the  mails  and  the  express  delivery,  we  now  have  the  con-
cepts of access to markets we’ve never had before. Now, if our peo-
ple, in using that new system—(new to us)—are going to face taxes 
from another State, that bothers me. I think we should be assured 
that’s  not  going  to  happen.  I  hope  that  we  can  find  some  way  to 
just put down a blanket prohibition against anyone charging taxes 
of fees or anything else on utilization of the Internet for commerce. 
And  I  hope  that  we  can  achieve  that  goal  someday,  and  I’d  like  to 
start that process this year, if it’s at all possible. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Mr. Duncan? 
Mr. DUNCAN. If I might, two comments on the grandfather. First, 
with respect to taxpayers in Alaska facing some additional cost be-
cause of a grandfathered tax, I—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  No,  there  are  people  that  are  utilizing  it. 

They’re not paying any taxes in Alaska. 

Mr. DUNCAN. No, and I understand. The grandfathered taxes are, 
indeed,  consumer  taxes,  so  if  it’s  levied  by  the  State  of  Wisconsin, 
it is paid only by a Wisconsin resident, and does not have an effect 
on  Alaska.  The  amendments  adopted  last  time  that  prevented  or 
prevent  states  from  taxing  the—what  I  will  call  a  wholesale  pur-
chase  of  telecommunications  by  an  Internet  service  provider  when 
they’re used to provide Internet access, are, indeed, intended to re-
duce  the  costs  to  Alaskan  residents  and  across  the  country.  And 
that piece—while the grandfathered taxes from 1998 are consumer 
taxes, we estimate them at something on the order of $100 to $120 
million  across  the  country,  the  piece  that  was  expanded  last  time 
to  the  telecommunications  purchases  by  Internet  service  providers 
affected  many  more  states,  and,  we  think,  is  several  hundred  mil-
lion dollars in foregone revenue. So, that there are significant steps 
that have already been taken to eliminate taxes that were imposed 
on  Internet  access,  and  then—consumer  taxes  from  1998  are  there 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

because  they  were  levied  by  those  states  in  1998,  and  there  is  no 
getting around the moratorium there. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  if  we  eliminated  the  moratorium,  and 

prohibited it, they could not collect those any longer, right? 

Mr.  DUNCAN.  That  would  be  correct.  But  what  we’re  saying  is 
that  they  were  in  place  in  1998.  They’re  taxes  on  the  consumers 
in  those  states  as  part  of  their  sales  tax  that  tries  to  get  at  the 
broad taxation of consumer purchases by people living in the State. 
And the arrangement in 1998 was that they would remain in place. 
The  other  thing  is  that  they  are  paid  by  consumers  in  those 
states,  and  work  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office  as  well 
as  by  economists  at  the  University  of  Tennessee,  would  show  you 
that  the  degree  to  which  consumers  adopt  Internet  access  and 
adopt  broadband,  and  the  degree  to  which  companies  provide 
broadband services, is not statistically related to whether the State 
taxes  it  or  not.  In  other  words,  whether  a  State  taxes  Internet  ac-
cess doesn’t have any statistically significant effect on whether the 
consumers in that State adopt it or whether the companies provide 
it. Other things are much more important, particularly income lev-
els of the families and education levels. 

Senator STEVENS. Do you have any—— 
Mr. DUNCAN. Those are the primary determinants. 
Senator STEVENS. Do you have any statistics on the total amount 

of taxes collected by those moratorium states? 

Mr.  DUNCAN.  When  you  dealt  with  it  previously,  were  $80  to 
$120 million. We’re in the process of gathering them. We think that 
that’s still an accurate range. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Carper? 
Senator CARPER. Thanks. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
And  let  me  just  say  welcome  to  all  of  you.  Thank  you  for  your 

testimony today. 

I  want  to  go  back  and  ask  a  couple  of  you  to  repeat  what  you 
said,  please.  And,  Mr.  Quam,  would  you  go  back,  I  think  you  said 
there are three principles that we should adhere to. 

And  I  would  invite  Senator  Stevens—Senator  Stevens?  Excuse 
me,  Senator  Stevens,  I  don’t  know  if  you  were  here  when  Mr. 
Quam mentioned these three principles, right at the top of his tes-
timony.  I’m  just  going  to  ask  him  to  repeat  them  for  all  of  us, 
please. 

Mr. QUAM. Thank you, Senator Carper. 
The  three  principles  we  would  ask  Congress  to  look  at  is,  when 
they’re  looking  at  the  moratorium:  first,  be  clear;  definitions  mat-
ter. Again, we’re talking about State and local taxes. Be very clear 
as  to  what  is  going  to  be  affected.  Number  two,  be  flexible;  a  tem-
porary  solution  is  better  than  permanent  confusion.  Therefore,  a 
temporary  extension  of  the  moratorium  makes  more  sense.  And, 
number three, do no harm; continue the grandfather protections to 
preserve existing State authority and revenues. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Mr.  Duncan,  I  don’t  know  if  you  had  three  principles  that  you 
shared with us, but—I’ll call them three principles—would you just 
go back and repeat those, as well, please? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Mr.  DUNCAN.  Yes,  Senator.  The  three  key  points  on  the  access 
and  moratorium  that  I  made  were  that  the  definition  of  Internet 
access  needs  to  be  modified  as  we  go  forward,  and  it  needs  clari-
fication  so  that  it  deals  with  issues  of  connecting  to  the  Internet, 
the tools to navigate, the e-mail, the instant messaging, but avoids 
the bundling of other services. 

The second is that we believe the moratorium should be extended 
only  temporarily,  and  that  Congress  should  preserve  its  preroga-
tives to come back and review that periodically. 

And, third, that the grandfather clause that protects those taxes 

in place prior to 1998 should remain. 

Senator  CARPER.  OK.  All  right.  I  think  both  of  you  talk  about 
making  the  extension  of  the  moratorium  temporary,  and  I  just 
want us to dwell on that for just a moment. 

A dozen or so years ago, when the Internet was maybe not in its 
infancy,  but  was  certainly  just  a  pup,  just  sort  of  growing  up,  and 
we  wanted  to  make  sure  it  had  a  chance  to  really  reach  its  poten-
tial,  I  could  see  a  need  to  try  to  protect  it  and  to  nurture  it.  And 
we sought to do that with the legislation that the Congress passed 
in  1998.  In  1998,  we  didn’t  think  of  things  like  VoIP  or  IPTV.  In 
fact,  in  2001,  it  was  my  first  year  here—when  we  extended  the 
moratorium  for,  oh,  2  or  3  years,  we  just  hadn’t  thought  of  it.  At 
least  I  don’t  recall  ever  hearing,  in  debate,  any  discussion  of  VoIP 
or IPTV. In fact, 3 years ago, in 2004, when we passed the last ex-
tension  of  this  moratorium,  I  didn’t  hear  we  were  talking  about 
VoIP. I joked, at the time, I had barely learned how to spell VoIP, 
and now I have to learn how to spell IPTV; and the technology just 
continues to change. And I think that that’s one of the factors that 
argues  for  not  making  this  permanent,  at  least  until  this  all  kind 
of settles out and we, sort of, know what we’re facing. And so, your 
recommendation  for  the  temporary  nature  of  the  extension  is,  I 
think, well founded. 

I would just say to my colleagues, in—anybody want to comment 

on what I just said? 

[No response.] 
Senator CARPER. No? OK. 
Ms. Canning, go ahead. 
Ms.  CANNING.  Yes,  just  to  address  the  permanency  issue,  the 
communications  providers  that  are  making  investment  decisions, 
they’re  making  them  over  5  to  10  year  periods,  as  far  as  invest-
ment  in  these  networks  that  I  think  everybody  has  agreed  is  in-
credibly  critical  to  the  country’s  future,  as  far  as  the  productivity 
of  our  businesses  and  competing  in  the  new  economy.  Having  a 
permanent  moratorium  is  critical  to  enable  those  companies  to 
make  the  right  investment  decisions  to  get  as  much  capital  in  the 
form of infrastructure in this country. 

The other issue I’d just like to mention—— 
Senator  CARPER.  Well,  before  you  do  that—I  only  have  so  much 

time, so—thank you for responding to my point. 

As an old Governor, as a recovering Governor, I’m mindful of the 
need for the business community to have certainty. And, you know, 
they’re  making  these  big  decisions,  big  investments.  And  I—obvi-
ously,  they’d  want  certainty.  I  would  want  certainty,  too.  But  the 
question  is,  how  do  we  balance  that  desire,  that  need—in  our  de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

sire  to  extend  broadband  throughout  the  country—how  do  we  bal-
ance  that  with  the  need  for  some  certainty  from  State  and  local 
governments  that  are  trying  to  provide  education  for  kids,  early 
childhood  education,  run  their  schools,  K–12,  to  provide  some  hos-
pital  care  for  people  who,  maybe,  don’t  have  the  access  to  the  sort 
of  hospital  care  or  healthcare  that  the  rest  of  us  do—how  do  we 
balance  that  against  the  needs  for,  you  know,  State  and  local  gov-
ernments to have some certainty, too, with respect to their revenue 
streams?  And  as  I  said  earlier,  we  don’t  have  a  sales  tax  in  my 
State, so this idea of remote collection of sales tax—it’s actually not 
a  parochial  issue  for  me,  so  I  think  I  can  be,  maybe,  a  little  more 
objective than some in looking at this. 

But  if—how  is  it  appropriate  for  those  of  us  in  the  Congress  to 
say  to  a  State  or  a  local  government,  ‘‘You  can’t  collect  telephone 
taxes,  even  if  you’ve  collected  them  for  years.  But  as  telephone 
services  move  over  to  the  Internet,  you  can’t  collect  those.’’  Well, 
we  said,  3  years  ago,  ‘‘You  can  collect  those.  You  can  continue  to 
collect them.’’ I think—I might be wrong, but I think under the leg-
islation  that  our  colleague  Senator  Wyden  and  others  are  going  to 
do—I think we actually may go back and change that. 

Can  somebody  clarify  that  for  me?  Mr.  Quam,  do  you  know  how 

we continue to protect VoIP for the states? 

Mr.  QUAM.  I  believe  the  bills  that  are  out  there,  including  Sen-
ator Wyden’s bill, would just be a straight extension of current law. 
That should carry the VoIP—— 

Senator CARPER. OK. 
Mr.  QUAM.—extension  forward.  The  problem  is,  it  does  not 
change  the  underlying  loophole.  So,  it’s  the  next  VoIP—IPTV, 
whatever  the  next  major  service  is—that  causes  the  problem.  We 
never addressed the underlying issue of the definition, the last go- 
round. 

Senator CARPER. Hopefully, as we go through that—this process, 
this  year,  we  can  find  a  way  to  address  that.  But,  put  on  my  old 
hat,  or  a  State  or  local  government  person,  I  just  don’t  know  that 
it’s appropriate for us to take away their ability to continue to raise 
revenues  from  ways  they’ve  traditionally  done  that.  If  you  happen 
to  be  a  city  with  cable  franchise  taxes,  and  your  video  migrates  to 
the  Internet,  or  your  telephone  I  don’t  know  that  it’s  appropriate 
for us to step in and say, ‘‘Well, you’ve always collected these taxes, 
and we’re not going to let you do that.’’ You know, they need some 
certainty, as well, and what we have to do is find the right balance 
that’s  respectful  of  the  need  for  the  business  community  to  have 
some  certainty  as  they  make  their  investment  decisions.  We  also 
have  a  need  to  respect  the  obligation  of  State  and  local  govern-
ments  to  serve  the  folks  that  need  to  be  served,  and  particularly 
at  a  time  when  their  ability  to  collect  sales  tax  is  being  under-
mined. 

Anyone want to comment on that? 
Dr. White, do you have any thoughts? 
Dr. WHITE. Well, again, I think if the issue is uncertainty, based 
on  the  language  of  the  statute,  we  have  an  interpretation  of  what 
the  statute  means.  We  would  be  happy  to  work  with  the  Commit-
tee’s staff to further clarify that, because we do recognize there are 
differences of opinion about both what’s in an Internet access bun-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

dle  and  whether  or  not  the  moratorium  applies  to  acquired  serv-
ices. 

Senator CARPER. All right. 
Mr. Quam? 
Mr. QUAM. Senator Carper, you strike a very important tone, and 
it  was  one  that  was  here  in  1998.  And  it’s  that  of  balance,  that  if 
Congress is going to take a step, that it needs to balance that with 
the  sovereign  authority  of  states  to  really  define  what  their  rev-
enue  systems  are  and  meet  the  needs  of  their  citizens.  That  was 
a core reason why it was temporary, why grandfather clauses were 
made  part  of  the  original  moratorium.  As  we  look  at  the  debate 
that’s  before  us  today,  if  you  look  at  a  moratorium  that  prohibits 
states  from  taxing  a  certain  service,  it  should  be  done  very  sur-
gically, and should be done very rarely. It’s not a business, I think, 
Congress  really  should  get  into,  because  it  starts  to  cross  the  line 
and interfere with that State-Federal relationship. 

On  the  other  side—and  I  know  Delaware  doesn’t  collect  State 
sales taxes—however, the Streamlined Agreement is states actually 
coming  together  to  address  a  problem  that  everybody  said  was  a 
problem, and that’s the complexity of State sales tax systems. Well, 
Governors and legislators and others, using their sovereign author-
ity,  came  together  to  say,  ‘‘We’ll  solve  it  together.’’  We  have  a  na-
tional  issue.  The  states  came  together,  working  with  the  business 
community,  to  come  up  with  a  voluntary  agreement,  incredible 
odds against it, and yet you have 15 full member states, and most 
states  actually  participating  at  some  level,  and  over  1,000  compa-
nies  agreeing  to  voluntarily  collect  those  taxes.  That’s  a  success 
story  that  we  should  be  talking  about.  That’s  the  type  of  balance 
and  respect  for  federalism  that  I  think’s  really  important  here. 
Congress  can  help  by  coming  in  and  authorizing  those  states  who 
have done that work. 

On  the  moratorium,  we  need  to  keep  a  balance,  and  I  think 

that’s going to be very important. 

Senator CARPER. Mr. Chairman, thanks. Thanks very much. 
If  I  could  just  say  one  last  quick  sentence,  you  know,  to  my  col-
leagues, Mr. Chairman, on the one hand, I think we all want to see 
broadband  deployed  broadly  in  this  country.  And  we  know  that’s 
going to be part of our glide path, if you will, to success in the 21st 
century as an economy. By the same token, another part of our suc-
cess is going to be determined by the kind of skills that kids grad-
uate with from high school and college—the kind of skills that they 
bring to the workforce, and the ability of states to be able to ensure 
that those kids get the education they need at very young ages, and 
throughout their years in public school. 

So,  our  challenge  is  to  find  that  balance.  I  think  we  can  have 

both. And the challenge for us is to find a way to do both. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Quam  and  Ms.  Canning,  Senator  Carper  has  touched  on  a 
question  I’m  interested  in,  and  it’s  related  just  to  the  whole  issue 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

of  bundling.  Are  there  any  businesses  that  are  under  the  current 
definition of ‘‘Internet access,’’ take the position that anything they 
sell as part of the package with Internet access is exempt, because 
it is part of a package? 

Mr.  QUAM.  I  have  no  specific  examples  of  that.  However,  the 
temporary aspect of the moratorium also helps protect against that. 
What  you  have  is  a  very  broad  definition  that  was  meant  to  be 
temporary  in  1998.  A  straight  reading  of  that  would  say  that  it  is 
possible  to  read  it  that  way,  that  you  can  bundle  these  together 
and make the whole package tax-free. We’re only asking for a clari-
fication to say that was not Congress’s intent. If that’s the practice 
today,  then  no  one’s  doing  it.  It  should  not  be  a  problem,  then,  to 
define  this  to  make  sure  it’s  absolutely  clear  that  it  can’t  be  done, 
because that is the risk into the future. 

Senator SMITH. OK. 
Ms.  CANNING.  This  issue  actually  came  up  last  time,  when  the 
bill was up for extension, as well. And, at that time, in addition to 
the  VoIP  provision  that  was  included  to  clarify  that  Voice  over 
Internet  Protocol  would  be  subject  to  tax,  there  was  also  an  ac-
counting rule included in that bill and that accounting rule is very 
similar  to  the  same  bundling  rule  that  is  included  in  the  Stream-
lined  Sales  and  Use  Tax  Agreement  and  process.  And  the  entire 
purpose  of  that  provision  is  to  address  the  concern  of  bundling, 
which  means,  if  a  company  is  selling  video/music-type  services  in-
cluded  in  the  bundle,  they  will  be  charging  for  those  services,  and 
that the accounting rule requires the company to separate the—out 
the taxable charges for either telecommunications or other services 
from  the  nontaxable  Internet  access.  Failure  to  unbundle  will  re-
sult in the entire package being taxable, and, obviously, substantial 
revenues to State and local governments. 

Senator  SMITH.  Are  there  any  businesses  that  you  know  of  that 

are currently taking that aggressive—— 

Ms.  CANNING.  I’m  not  aware  of  any  businesses  that  are  taking 

an aggressive position. 

Senator SMITH. Mr. Quam? 
Mr. QUAM. I would add, and Ms. Canning is absolutely right, the 
bundling or the accounting provision was very important. However, 
it  only  works  if  there  is  something  actually  to  unbundle.  If  you 
have  to  unbundle  with  Internet  access,  but  ‘‘Internet  access’’  can 
mean everything, the accounting rule really has no effect. 

Really, by clarifying the definition, you can make the accounting 
rule, which everybody agreed to, work. Therefore, we can get to the 
point I think you’re trying to make, which is, no one’s doing it now, 
let’s make sure that Congressional intent was never that, ‘‘just be-
cause  it  goes  over  the  Internet  means  it’s  not  subject  to  state  and 
local  taxes;’’  rather,  Congressional  intent  was,  access  to  the  Inter-
net,  we  want  tax-free.  That’s  one  of  the  reasons  we’re  supporting 
an extension of the moratorium—— 

Senator SMITH. And a clarification. 
Mr. QUAM. Absolutely. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Dorgan? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
You  know,  I  think  these  issues  can  be  resolved.  All  of  us  know 
they  are  difficult  and  complicated.  The  Internet  has  changed  a  lot 
in  our  lives.  It’s  happened  very  quickly.  It’s  one  of  the  innovations 
in  our  lives  that  is  unusual,  and  perhaps  one  of  the  great  innova-
tions in many, many decades. 

I was thinking, sitting here, you know, in the morning, at home, 
I  go  on  the  computer  and  check  the  news  in  North  Dakota.  So, 
that’s  my  home  computer.  I  go  to  the  Internet.  Driving  in,  I’ll  use 
my  cell  phone.  I’ll  probably  also  use  my  cell  phone  to  go  to  the 
Internet,  check  Headline  News,  CNN  News  or  something.  I  get  to 
the  Capitol,  I’ve  got  a  BlackBerry,  so  I’m  walking  to  the  Russell 
Building,  I,  perhaps,  will  use  the  Internet  on  my  BlackBerry.  And 
then,  maybe  I’ll  stop  someplace  to  make  a  phone  call,  and  they 
have  VoIP  service  for  telephone.  So,  that’s  four  different  activities, 
all  of  which  use  the  Internet.  But  the  Internet  came  in  different 
forms  to  all  of  those  activities.  And  I  think  it  describes  why  it  is 
so  important  that,  whatever  we  do,  we  do  understanding  the  con-
sequences of the actions. The definitions are critical here. 

You  know,  the  issue  of  the  moratorium  has  been  controversial, 
not because there are a lot of people that want to say to the states 
or  local  governments,  ‘‘Go  ahead  and  just  impose  some  new  taxes. 
It’s  a  new  area  of  activity,  just  layer  on  some  taxes,  if  you  like.’’ 
That’s  not  been  the  attitude,  I  think,  of  any  Member  of  the  Con-
gress that I’m aware of. 

We  have,  however,  tried  to  link,  if  we  could,  the  opportunity  to 
give the states some help in collecting taxes that are already owed 
with respect to Internet—the commerce on the Internet; that is, the 
purchasing  and  so  on,  the  shopping  that  goes  on.  When  that  hap-
pens, a tax is owed for the access to a product on the Internet, but 
is never paid, because it needs to be paid in the form of a use tax, 
because it’s not collected in the form of a sales tax. But the use tax 
on  hundreds  of  billions  of  transactions  is  never  paid  by  an  indi-
vidual  consumer.  So,  the  question  is,  can  the  State  and  local  gov-
ernments be able to collect that tax on the remote sale? 

I’m  somebody  who  believes  we  should  try  to  find  a  way  to  help 
make that happen, but I don’t want anyone—a business that is af-
fected, to have to subject themselves to 7,000 jurisdictions and dif-
ferent rates, different bases, and the complexity of all that. So, the 
question is, how does one streamline that, or how does one simplify 
it?  These  two  issues  have  generally  been  linked.  That’s  why  we 
have had a temporary, rather than permanent, moratorium; not be-
cause  somebody  believes  that  there  should  be  new  layers  of  taxes 
on the Internet. 

I  think  somehow  we  can  work  through  this  and  solve  it.  Mr. 
Dircksen, you probably disagree. But I know some of the organiza-
tions  in  town  that  feel  as  you  do,  feel  that  we  should  not  be  col-
lecting  sales  tax  or  use  taxes  on  transactions  from  the  Internet. 
Would  you  agree  that  if  you  bought  that  necktie  that  you’re  wear-
ing on the Internet—— 

Mr. DIRCKSEN. This was a gift from my girlfriend, Senator. 
[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

Senator DORGAN. Well, that’s—— 
Mr. DIRCKSEN. That’s why I’m wearing it this morning. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  I  happen  to  know  that  your  girlfriend 

bought that on the Internet. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. And—— 
Mr. DIRCKSEN. Really? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. And when she did, my guess is—— 
Mr. DIRCKSEN.—the instant messenger when I—— 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Mr. DIRCKSEN.—the room now—— 
Senator DORGAN. When she—— 
Mr. DIRCKSEN.—I know why. 
Senator DORGAN. When she bought that beautiful necktie on the 
Internet,  she,  like  most  Americans,  will  not  pay  a  use  tax.  She 
won’t  pay  a  sales  tax,  because  the  Internet  seller,  in  most  cases, 
isn’t  required  to  collect  it,  so  will  not.  She,  perhaps,  is  required  to 
pay  a  use  tax,  but  will  not  file  a  use  tax  form  to  pay  a  use  tax  on 
the necktie. So, do you, first of all, do you agree that a tax is owed 
on that transaction? 

Mr.  DIRCKSEN.  There  is  a  use  tax  transaction,  yes.  And,  as  the 
NTU  has  stated  previously,  and  as  I  talked  about,  testifying  in 
2001, we believe that states unfortunately, have rarely made an ef-
fort, or only are then starting to make efforts, to inform consumers 
of  their  use  tax  obligations.  We  feel  it’s,  kind  of,  the  lazy  tax  col-
lector  way  to  say,  ‘‘You  know  what?  We  can’t  really  do  anything. 
We’re  not  going  to  make  any  effort  to  tell  you  about  use  tax.  So, 
we’re just going to try to come together through the harmonization 
process,’’ which we, again, have a concern will result in higher tax 
rates—simplified is fine, but higher for consumers. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  you  know  what?  That’s  a  curious  choice 
for you to make. It seems to me you’re saying, ‘‘Let’s send the local 
taxing  authorities  after,  individually,  hundreds  of  millions  of  peo-
ple. Let’s just sic them on those people individually’’—that’s a curi-
ous  thing  to  do.  It  seems  to  me  you  would  want  to  simplify  it  for 
those that owe the taxes. 

Mr.  DIRCKSEN.  We  believe  in,  again,  a  simplified  process.  But 
there  could  be  education  efforts  made  by  states  to  let  consumers 
know  of  their  obligation.  Again,  as  I  stated  in  2001,  I  formerly 
worked  for  the  Pennsylvania  Department  of  Revenue.  The  Com-
monwealth  of  Pennsylvania,  in  their  statistics  of  revenue  collec-
tions,  has  the  category  of  ‘‘Unknown  Use  Tax  Collections.’’  They 
don’t  know  where  it  comes  from.  People  just  send  them  checks. 
They  cash  the  checks.  They’re  very  happy  to  take  the  checks.  And 
they  don’t  do  anything  else.  And  then,  when  they  did  their  online 
analysis,  said,  ‘‘Oh,  but  we  don’t  know  where  this  comes  from,  but 
we  really  don’t  think  it  comes  from  the  Internet.  So,  we’re  losing 
a lot of money.’’ 

Senator DORGAN. But, as a practical matter, hundreds of millions 
of transactions are not going to result in the filing of individual use 
tax.  That’s  just  common  sense.  And  so,  there  is  a  substantial 
amount  of  difficulty  with  State  governments  being  able  to  collect. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

And  the  question  is,  how  do  we  try  to  find  a  way  to  help  them  do 
that, collect a tax that is already owed? 

Now, on the question of the issue of Internet access, I personally 
am  not  very  interested  in  having  somebody  go  to  the  Internet  and 
say,  ‘‘You  know  what?  We’ve  got  a  new  area  of  activity  here,  let’s 
slap  a  tax  on  it.’’  I’m  very  interested  in  much  deeper  penetration 
of  Internet  use  in  this  country,  of  broadband  use  especially.  And  I 
don’t think that’s very tax sensitive, But, by the same token, I have 
no  difficulty  in  saying,  ‘‘Let’s  not  have  people  take  a  look  at  this 
as  a  plum  with  which  we  can  impose  a  new  tax.’’  But  as  we  begin 
thinking  about  these  areas,  the  definitions  are  absolutely  crucial, 
because I think there is no question, once you write this, if you give 
an opportunity for interests to bundle up a lot of activities and de-
cide  these  are  activities  that  are  out  of  the  reach—activities  that, 
in  previous  cases,  have  always  had  to  bear  a  tax—after  all,  you 
know,  we  have  to  build  roads,  and  we  have  to  have  law  enforce-
ment and inspect food. We have to do things as a government, and 
we have to pay for that, so we have a tax system. So, I mean, ulti-
mately,  we’ve  got  to  find  ways  here  to  wind  our  way  through  this 
without  creating  massive  problems.  And  I  think  at  least  early  on 
in  this  discussion,  some  of  the  proposals  would  have  caused  very 
serious problems, had we enacted them. I recall one in front of this 
Committee,  Mr.  Chairman,  dealing  with  VoIP,  when  it  was  going 
to  be  a  broad  preemption  from  VoIP,  broad  preemption  of  issues. 
And when I said, ‘‘Well, what are you preempting?’’ and the author 
had  no  idea,  couldn’t  give  me  a  list—just  wanted  to  preempt,  but 
didn’t know what he wanted to preempt. 

So, it seems to me that we ought to at least have some basic un-
derstanding,  or  minimum  understanding,  of  what  we’re  doing  and 
what the consequences of that would be. 

I’ll  make  one  additional  comment.  Mr.  Duncan  and  Mr.  Quam 
make  a  point,  and  it’s  not  an  irrelevant  point.  It  has  not  custom-
arily  been  the  province  of  the  U.S.  Congress  to  take  a  look  at  a 
State  and  say,  ‘‘We’ve  defined  the  role  here,’’  in  federalism,  ‘‘of 
what  you  can  and  cannot  do.’’  And  so,  we  need  to  tread  very  care-
fully  in  those  areas.  Their  admonition  about  that  is,  I  think,  well 
taken. 

Having said all of that, I think the testimony here has been good 
testimony,  and  we  need  to  think  our  way  through  this  carefully.  I 
know  there  are  people  who  just  say,  ‘‘Well,  permanent  morato-
rium,’’  and  then  leave  the  room.  That’s  just  a  slogan,  you  know, 
‘‘permanent moratorium.’’ 

We  need  to  balance  all  of  the  issues  here  of  fostering  Internet 
growth,  fostering  broadband  penetration,  all  those  issues,  with  all 
the  other  related  issues,  including  the  one  that  I  was  asking  Mr. 
Dircksen  about.  And  I  didn’t  mean  to  engage  your  girlfriend’s—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN.—identity here. 
Mr. DIRCKSEN. You and I will talk later. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. And it is a nice necktie. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. DIRCKSEN. As is yours, Senator. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  going  to  send  a  series  of 
questions  to  these  witnesses,  because  I  think  there  are  a  lot  of 
things  we  should  put  on  the  record  as  our  Committee  begins  to 
think through how we deal with these issues that Senator Enzi and 
Senator  Wyden  raised,  as  well  as  Representative  Eshoo,  and  the 
issues raised by these five witnesses. 

So, thank you very much for holding the hearing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
When  this  Committee  participated  in  the  enactment  of  the  Tele-
communications Act of 1996, I believe the word ‘‘Internet’’ appeared 
three  times  in  the  final  measure  that  became  law.  Since  then,  the 
Internet  and  Internet  services  have  grown  phenomenally.  And 
there is a song that says, ‘‘We’ve only just begun.’’ It would be most 
applicable. 

Obviously, listening to the testimony—and I purposely permitted 
this  freewheeling  discussion—there  is  much  confusion  as  to  inter-
pretation,  and  it  will  take  some  clarification  to  determine  what 
Congressional  intent  was,  or  should  be,  and  whether  the  morato-
rium  is  permanent  or  temporary.  Listening  to  the  testimony,  I 
would  opt  out  for  a  temporary  extension,  if  at  all,  because  I  have 
no  idea,  at  this  moment,  what  we  enacted,  listening  to  all  of  the 
experts  here.  I  don’t  know  whether  services,  such  as  music,  things 
like  that,  should  fall  into  Internet.  So,  I  will  join  my  colleague  in 
submitting questions, if I may, to all of you, so that our record will 
show your thoughts. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  And,  with  that,  I  can  tell  my  staff  here,  ‘‘Your 

work is cut out for you’’—— 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN.—because if we are coming up with any measure 
we  must  do  so  before  November  the  1st,  because  that’s  when  the 
moratorium expires. 

I can assure the witnesses that we will do our very best to come 
up with something that is fair and equitable, because we are tread-
ing  into  an  area,  as  my  colleague  stated  very  clearly—our  role 
should  not  be  an  absolute  one,  but  one  that’s  very  fair,  equitable. 
So, with that, I’d like to thank all of you for your testimony. It’s 

been very helpful, but confusing. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. And the hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:40 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 
Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens—Thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing 
today. I was serving in the House of Representatives when the original Internet Tax 
Freedom  Act  was  passed  in  1998  and  when  it  was  extended  in  2001.  I  supported 
the measure both times with the inclusion of the grandfather clause for states that 
had  already  levied  taxes  on  Internet  access.  As  most  of  you  know  South  Dakota  is 
one of those grandfathered states. 

Some of the arguments we heard during those first debates focused on the Inter-
net  being  a  nascent  technology.  We  were  told  that  we  shouldn’t  be  putting  a  heavy 
tax  burden  on  this  new  sector  of  our  economy.  Today’s  hearing  is  extremely  impor-
tant  because  the  Internet  is  no  longer  a  nascent  technology,  but  there  are  still  sig-
nificant  reasons  why  we  should  extend  the  Internet  tax  moratorium,  either  tempo-
rarily  or  permanently.  The  Internet  has  been  essential  to  recent  economic  growth. 
Multiple  or  discriminatory  taxes  could  easily  slow  the  growth  we  have  seen  in  this 
sector. 

Additionally,  as  a  strong  supporter  of  expanding  broadband  deployment  out  to 
those  furthest  reaches,  many  of  which  are  in  my  home  State  of  South  Dakota,  I 
have  to  seriously  consider  the  impact  new  and  discriminatory  taxes  might  have  on 
these  efforts.  It  doesn’t  make  any  sense  to  support  broadband  deployment  on  the 
one  hand  and  then  support  taxing  broadband  and  making  it  out  of  reach  for  some 
of  those  who  do  not  yet  have  an  Internet  connection  in  extremely  rural  or  urban 
areas. 

As  policymakers  we  will  have  to  weigh  these  benefits  against  the  arguments  we 
will  hear  from  those  who  believe  a  moratorium  handcuffs  states  and  their  ability 
to collect revenue. This is an important debate and I look forward to having it. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BOB GOODLATTE, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM VIRGINIA 

Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  speak  with  you  about  the  need  to  permanently  ex-

tend the moratorium on Internet access taxes. 

The  Internet  has  facilitated  faster,  more  efficient  and  less  expensive  communica-
tion  among  businesses,  between  businesses  and  consumers,  and  among  consumers. 
It  has  helped  usher  in  a  new  era  of  reduced  costs,  increased  efficiency,  and  in-
creased  access  to  those  who  would  not  otherwise  be  able  to  travel  to  obtain  goods 
and services. 

One of the best ways to ensure that businesses, consumers, and our economy will 
continue to reap these benefits from the Internet is to keep it free from burdensome 
taxes  and  regulations.  As  you  know,  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  of  1998  created 
a  moratorium  on  Internet  access  taxes  and  multiple  and  discriminatory  taxes  on  e- 
commerce. As a result of this moratorium, the Internet has remained relatively free 
from the burdens of new taxation. The moratorium has been extended on numerous 
occasions. Most recently, it was extended until November of this year. 

However,  without  further  action  by  Congress,  the  moratorium  will  sunset  in  No-
vember  of  this  year,  subjecting  the  Internet  to  possible  taxation  from  more  than 
7,500 taxing jurisdictions. We have seen the tremendous growth in both the rollout 
and  adoption  of  broadband  Internet  connections  over  the  past  decade.  The  morato-
rium on Internet access taxes has undoubtedly contributed to this growth, and now 
is  not  the  time  to  hamstring  the  Internet.  On  the  contrary,  now  is  the  time  to  per-
manently make the tax moratorium permanent. 

Excessive  taxation  and  regulation  will  hamper  the  Internet’s  tremendous  growth 
and stifle investment in small businesses that utilize this tremendous medium. The 
last thing that consumers need is for the puzzling array of taxes on their phone bills 
to be repeated on their Internet service bills. In addition, the last thing that innova-
tive  Internet  service  providers  need  is  to  have  to  factor  into  their  business  plans 

(63) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

the costs of complying with a multitude of additional tax burdens. Let’s permanently 
free these businesses to focus their resources on rolling out broadband to more rural 
areas and enhancing the cutting edge services they already offer. 

In  addition,  it  is  estimated  that  only  11  percent  of  U.S.  households  with  incomes 
of  less  than  $30,000  have  high-speed  Internet  service,  as  opposed  to  61  percent  of 
households  with  incomes  over  $100,000.  Taxes  on  Internet  access  will  increase  the 
costs of households going on-line, as the prices for providing Internet access service 
increase.  What  this  means  is  that  the  digital  divide  between  those  who  can  afford 
to  go  online  and  those  who  cannot  will  become  much  larger,  further  complicating 
our efforts to bridge this divide. 

During  the  107th  Congress,  I  introduced  legislation  that  sought  to  permanently 
ban Internet access taxes and discriminatory taxes on electronic commerce. In addi-
tion, I worked to help pass legislation out of the House in the 108th Congress, which 
also  enacted  a  permanent  ban.  This  Congress,  I  was  pleased  to  join  with  my  col-
league, Representative Anna Eshoo, to introduce the bipartisan Permanent Internet 
Tax  Freedom  Act,  H.R.  743.  This  legislation,  which  has  already  garnered  over  65 
additional  bipartisan  cosponsors,  will  encourage  continued  investment  in  and  utili-
zation  of  the  Internet  by  permanently  banning  Internet  access  taxes.  This  legisla-
tion  is  forward-looking,  will  help  make  Internet  access  more  affordable  for  all  citi-
zens,  and  will  provide  the  long-term  certainty  that  businesses  need  to  make  cal-
culated  decisions  regarding  the  ways  in  which  they  will  utilize  and  invest  in  Inter-
net technologies. 

Senator  Wyden  has  introduced  identical,  bipartisan  legislation  in  the  Senate, 
along with Senators McCain and Sununu. I look forward to continuing to work with 
all  Members  from  both  chambers  on  this  and  other  solutions  to  ensure  that  the 
Internet remains a tremendous boon to our economy, as well as a medium that con-
tinues to enhance the quality of life of our citizens. 

Thank you again for inviting me to speak to you today on this important matter. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOAN WAGNON, CHAIR, MULTISTATE TAX COMMISSION 
Mr.  Chairman,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Committee  on  Com-

merce, Science, and Transportation: 

My name is Joan Wagnon and I am the Chair of the Multistate Tax Commission. 
I  am  also  the  Secretary  of  the  Kansas  Department  of  Revenue.  The  Multistate  Tax 
Commission  (MTC)  is  an  intergovernmental  State  tax  agency  working  on  behalf  of 
states  and  taxpayers  to  administer,  equitably  and  efficiently,  tax  laws  that  apply 
to  multistate  and  multinational  enterprises.  Created  by  the  Multistate  Tax  Com-
pact, the Commission is charged with: 

• Facilitating  the  proper  determination  of  State  and  local  tax  liability  of 
multistate  taxpayers,  including  the  equitable  apportionment  of  tax  bases  and 
settlement of apportionment disputes; 
• Promoting uniformity or compatibility in significant components of tax systems; 
• Facilitating  taxpayer  convenience  and  compliance  in  the  filing  of  tax  returns 
• Avoiding duplicative taxation. 
Established  in  1967,  forty-six  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia  participate  in 

and other phases of tax administration; and 

the work of the MTC. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  our  views.  In  considering  whether  to 
enact  a  Federal  law  that  gives  preferential  treatment  to  one  economic  sector  under 
State  and  local  tax  law,  Congress  must  first  consider  its  Constitutional  responsi-
bility  to  allow  state  and  local  governments  to  manage  their  own  fiscal  affairs.  It  is 
axiomatic  that  states  cannot  provide  governmental  services  to  its  citizenry  without 
the  power  to  raise  revenues.  Federal  preemption  of  state  taxing  authority  not  only 
undercuts the states’ ability to provide those services, it also undercuts the very life- 
blood of state power and distorts the Constitution’s intentional balance of power be-
tween  the  Federal  Government  and  the  states  that  created  it.  Congress  should, 
therefore,  consider  exercising  its  authority  under  the  Commerce  Clause  of  the 
United  States  Constitution  to  preempt  State  and  local  tax  laws  only  when  there  is 
a compelling reason to do so. 

Thus,  it  is  appropriate  to  consider  the  reasons  presented  by  the  industry  rep-
resentative  to  see  if  they  are  of  the  magnitude  to  warrant  Federal  preemption  of 
State  and  local  tax  laws.  The  first  argument  is  that  ‘‘new  taxes  on  Internet  access 
could have a chilling effect on broadband investment.’’ First, even if this were true, 
it  provides  no  basis  for  Congressional  regulation  under  the  Commerce  Clause.  Sec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

ond, it may not even be true. The best way of testing the validity of this statement 
is  to  examine  the  evidence  in  the  nine  states  that  currently  impose  taxes  on  Inter-
net  access  and  compare  that  evidence  to  that  of  the  other  forty-one  states.  In  fact, 
this very analysis was performed by economists at the University of Tennessee who 
conducted  a  regression  study  to  discern  whether  there  was  any  impact  of  existing 
Internet  access  taxes  on  Internet  access.  The  result:  ‘‘Internet  access  taxation  has 
no  statistically  discernible  effect.’’  (State  Tax  Notes,  May  17,  2004,  p  519).  The  in-
dustry representative did not provide any evidence to the contrary. 

The  second  argument  advanced  in  support  of  federally-imposed  preferential  tax 
treatment  is  that  ‘‘new  taxes  on  Internet  access  would  create  a  new  obstacle  in  ef-
forts  to  close  the  ‘digital  divide.’ ’’  In  other  words,  a  monthly  tax  of  41⁄2 percent  to 
71⁄2 percent  of  a  $30  access  fee  ($1.35–$2.25  per  month)  would  discourage  those  of 
limited  means  from  accessing  the  Internet.  Once  again,  no  evidence  was  presented 
to back up this assertion. A larger obstacle preventing Internet access would be the 
cost  of  the  computer  itself.  Moreover,  American  consumers  pay  ten  times  or  more 
for  Internet  access  than  do  their  fellow  consumers  across  the  globe.  (Testimony  of 
Ben  Scott,  Consumer  Federation  of  America  before  the  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on 
Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation,  ‘‘Communications,  Broadband  and  Com-
petitiveness: How Does the U.S. Measure Up?,’’ April 24, 2007) Therein lies the ‘‘dig-
ital divide.’’ 

Finally,  the  proponents  of  imposing  permanent  preferential  tax  treatment  of  one 
industry upon state and local governments argue that Internet access taxes are dis-
criminatory, imposing a higher taxation burden on Internet users than on non-Inter-
net  users.  Once  again,  no  evidence  is  presented  from  the  nine  existing  states  that 
already  tax  Internet  access.  There  is  only  a  comparison  to  the  telecommunications 
industry,  which  is  still  adjusting  from  decades  of  monopoly  status  to  its  current 
competitive situation. Ironically, however, it is the current Internet access tax mora-
torium  that  causes  discriminatory  taxation.  Under  the  present  moratorium,  non- 
grandfathered states may not tax e-mails or instant messaging. Yet, text messaging 
does not fall within the moratorium and is taxed under existing State and local tele-
communication  tax  laws.  The  current  moratorium,  therefore,  causes  discriminatory 
tax  treatment  of  functionally  equivalent  digital  communications  methods.  Indeed, 
the  moratorium  results  in  disparate  tax  treatment  if  electronic  messages  accessed 
on  precisely  the  same  digital  device;  e-mails  and  instant  messaging  accessed  on  a 
cell  phone  come  within  the  moratorium  while  text  messages  accessed  on  the  same 
cell phone do not. 

The proponents of a permanent Internet access tax preemption have not provided 
any  substantive  justification  for  Congressional  exercise  of  interstate  commerce  au-
thority  for  this  one  sector  of  the  national  economy.  Congress  has  traditionally  seen 
fit  to  intervene  in  State  and  local  tax  policy  choices  only  where  there  has  been  a 
perception  that  states  may  seek  to  ‘‘export’’  their  tax  burdens  or  where  taxation 
would  impose  a  disproportionate  burden  on  interstate  business.  Thus,  when  Con-
gress  passed  the  Railroad  Regulatory  Reform  and  Revitalization  Act  of  1977,  it 
chose  to  prohibit  State  taxation  only  to  the  extent  such  taxes  discriminated  or  im-
posed higher burdens on railroads than competing modes of transportation. Pub. L. 
94–210, 45 U.S.C. Sec. 801; Tax Reform Act of 1976, Pub. L. 94–455, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 
391 (Prohibiting discriminatory taxes on electrical generation and transmission; See 
also, Buck Act, 4 U.S.C. Sec. 111(a) (prohibiting states from imposing discriminatory 
income  taxes  on  Federal  employees  on  Federal  reservation);  Pub.  L.  96–113,  49 
U.S.C. Sec. 2101 (limiting taxation of airline employees to state of residence or state 
where  50  percent  of  flight  time  occurs);  Pub.  L.  104–95;  4  U.S.C.  Sec.  114  (limiting 
state taxation of pension income to residents). The common thread in each of these 
Acts  has  been  to  trust  local  legislatures  to  respond  to  political  pressure  brought  by 
its  constituents.  Where  a  tax  is  passed  on  to  local  residents,  as  is  the  case  with 
Internet  access  charges,  the  political  process  ensures  that  those  taxes  will  remain 
at an appropriate level. 

Moreover, it is worth reconsidering the original purpose for the 1998 Federal pre-
emption and whether that legislative purpose is still valid in 2007. When President 
Clinton signed the original law 9 years ago, Internet access was considered a ‘‘fledg-
ling’’  industry.  In  2007,  it  is  ‘‘fledgling’’  no  more.  In  the  last  6  years,  e-commerce 
has  ballooned  from  $25.8  billion  to  $107.8  billion,  and  high-speed  lines  have  ex-
panded from 9 million locations to nearly 65 million. Looking into the future, Inter-
net  Protocol  Television  is  expected  to  expand  by  92  percent  per  year.  Any  justifica-
tion  that  existed  9  years  ago  to  aid  this  sector  of  the  economy  by  bestowing  upon 
it  Federal  preferential  treatment  under  State  and  local  tax  laws,  therefore,  no 
longer exists today. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to present these views. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROGER J. COCHETTI, GROUP DIRECTOR—U.S. PUBLIC 

POLICY, THE COMPUTING TECHNOLOGY INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION (COMPTIA) 

66 

On  behalf  of  CompTIA’s  more  than  20,000  members,  I  am  pleased  to  submit  this 
testimony strongly supporting passage of S. 156, the Permanent Internet Tax Free-
dom  Act  of  2007.  Our  members,  particularly  our  roughly  15,000  small  business 
members,  thank  the  Committee  for  discussing  a  topic  so  vital  to  the  welfare  of 
American  small  businesses  and  consumers.  Small  businesses  are  the  backbone  of 
the  American  economy.  Some  23  million  small  businesses  employ  over  half  of  the 
private  sector  workforce.  Small  businesses  are  a  vital  source  of  the  entrepreneur-
ship,  creativity,  and  innovation  that  keeps  our  economy  globally  competitive.  As  a 
Nation,  we  are  dependent  upon  the  health  of  the  small  business  sector,  and  this  is 
why we are so adamantly in support of making permanent the moratorium on Inter-
net  access  taxes  and  the  prohibition  on  multiple  or  discriminatory  Internet  sales 
and use taxes. 

The  U.S.  Congress  championed  small  businesses  and  consumers  and  promoted 
growth in the American economy by enacting a moratorium on Internet access taxes 
and  new,  discriminatory  taxes  on  e-commerce  in  1998,  and  by  further  extending 
that moratorium most recently in 2004. The Congress’s wise policy decision in 1998 
served as a catalyst to revolutionize the way small businesses and consumers inter-
act and needs to be made permanent to ensure small businesses and consumers can 
continue  to  drive  our  e-commerce  economy.  Nearly  all  economists  today  agree  that 
the  unprecedented  growth  in  American  productivity  with  almost  no  inflation  that 
we experienced from the mid-1990s onward was driven in large part by the benefits 
of  the  use  of  the  Internet  by  business  and  consumer  alike.  These  statistics  do  not 
begin to capture the enormous contribution that the Internet has made to education, 
culture, entertainment, and international cooperation, however. 

The U.S. policy of not permitting anti-Internet taxes—including taxes on Internet 
access  or  taxes  that  discriminate  against  Internet  transactions—has  led  the  world 
in this direction and done as much as any other single policy to promote the benefits 
of Internet usage. The time has long passed when this policy should be made perma-
nent. 
CompTIA Overview 

CompTIA is the largest computer industry trade association in the United States. 
We  include  among  our  members  virtually  every  brand  name  and  large  company  in 
the  industry  as  well,  as  noted  above,  roughly  15,000  small  information  technology 
(IT)  companies  that  are  commonly  called  Value-Added  Resellers  or  VARs.  A  typical 
small business in the United States, almost regardless of its business, will not have 
an  IT  department  of  its  own.  Instead,  America’s  small  businesses  rely  on  the  serv-
ices of one or more of thousands of VARs that are located in every city, town, coun-
try and district in the United States. VARs are small businesses who are themselves 
system integrators and operators. VARs design, install and maintain computer sys-
tems  and  networks  for  other  small  businesses.  An  estimated  32,000  VARs,  most  of 
which are small businesses themselves, sell approximately $43 billion worth of com-
puter hardware, software, and services annually. This means that over one-third of 
the computer hardware sold in the U.S. today is sold by VARs. 

While  we  in  CompTIA  represent  all  segments  of  the  IT  industry,  including  large 
hardware,  software,  services  and  training  companies,  we  also  uniquely  represent 
America’s  VARs.  For  25  years,  CompTIA  has  provided  research,  networking,  and 
partnering  opportunities  to  its  20,000  mostly  American  member  companies.  And 
while  we  represent  nearly  every  major  computer  hardware  manufacturer  and  soft-
ware  publisher,  nearly  75  percent  of  our  membership  is  comprised  of  American 
VARs—the small business component of the tech industry. 

In addition to representing the interests of VARs, CompTIA also works to provide 
global  policy  leadership  for  the  IT  industry  through  our  headquarters  in  Chicago 
and  our  public  policy  offices  in  Washington,  Brussels,  Hong  Kong,  and  Sa˜o  Paulo. 
For most people in the computer industry, however, CompTIA is well known for the 
non-policy-related  services  that  it  provides  to  advance  industry  growth:  standards, 
professional certifications, industry education, and business solutions. 
The Online Economy, Small Business and Consumers 

The  clients  of  CompTIA’s  15,000  VARs  are  traditionally  not  large  corporations; 
our  VAR  members  serve  as  the  IT  departments  for  America’s  small  businesses, 
which are themselves the backbone of the American economy. As such, our members 
are  highly  sensitive  to  the  needs  of  both  small  businesses  and  consumers  of  small 
business  products  and  services.  At  the  time  of  the  initial  passage  of  the  Internet 
Tax  Freedom  Act,  many  small  businesses  considered  it  a  relatively  expensive  nov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

elty  to  maintain  some  presence  on  the  Internet.  Now,  the  times  have  drastically 
changed. 

On  May  21st,  the  new  head  of  the  Small  Business  Administration  (SBA),  Steve 
Preston,  told  a  conference  of  small  businesses  that  embracing  high-tech  solutions 
‘‘can  mean  the  difference  between  maintaining  a  competitive  organization  and  po-
tentially  not  being  in  business  anymore.’’  He  also  explained,  as  we  all  know,  that 
something  as  simple  as  having  a  high-quality  website  can  ‘‘make  a  small  business 
look  like  a  big  business.’’  Small  businesses  are  as  much,  if  not  more,  a  beneficiary 
of the benefits of the Internet as are large businesses and consumers. 

Naturally,  in  today’s  U.S.  markets,  small  businesses  justifiably  consider  mar-
keting  and  selling  on  the  web  essential  to  the  success  of  their  businesses  and  are 
pushing the envelope of innovation and creativity online. In a recent survey of small 
business owners conducted by allbusiness.com, 83 percent reported that the Internet 
had  improved  communication  about  their  company,  and  61  percent  said  that  the 
Internet had helped open new markets for their businesses. The same survey found 
that  small  businesses  are  using  the  Internet  to  improve  operational  efficiency;  87 
percent  use  the  Internet  for  business  communications  and  89  percent  of  those  sur-
veyed  use  the  Internet  regularly  for  research.  Moreover,  44  percent  of  small  busi-
nesses  surveyed  already  had  a  website  up  and  running  and  38  percent  had  plans 
to  launch  a  website  within  6  months.  The  Internet  is  the  great  leveling  field  in 
American  business  today,  permitting  a  small  business  to  compete  with  one  that  is 
much larger. In that respect, the Internet promotes competition, innovation and pro-
ductivity. 

We should not discourage the use of this medium by taxing it or allowing anyone 
to  impose  discriminatory  taxes  that  will  discourage  its  use.  In  fact,  we  should  be 
doing everything that we can to encourage greater access to the Internet and invest-
ments in, and use of, it. 
Small  Business  Success  Online  Depends  on  Access,  Affordability,  and 

Parity 

These successes for small businesses and consumers would not have been possible 
without  the  Internet  tax  moratorium.  There  are  two  driving  factors  behind  the 
growth  of  e-commerce  for  small  business:  Access  to  affordable  high-speed  Internet 
connections for businesses and consumers and tax parity between online and offline 
sales.  This  hearing  addresses  a  key  component  in  Internet  access  and  usage  by 
small businesses and consumers: the taxes that may be imposed on it. Onerous and 
unjust  Internet  tax  schemes  would  add  significantly  to  the  cost  of  both  providing 
and  obtaining  Internet  services  and  thereby  discourage  Internet  usage  and 
broadband adoption. Should this occur, small businesses and consumers would expe-
rience more limited availability of Internet infrastructure, frustrating the Internet’s 
rich  promise.  For  these  reasons,  CompTIA  supports  broadband  deployment, 
broadband  competition,  and  the  further  closing  of  the  digital  divide,  in  addition  to 
supporting the permanent ban on Internet access taxes. 

But  access  must  be  more  than  available—it  must  also  be  affordable  and  predict-
ably  affordable.  For  small  businesses  operating  on  slim  margins  and  consumers 
working to make ends meet, even small increases in cost can push either group off-
line and the unpredictability of what new taxes may be imposed on Internet services 
at any time will scare away consumers, investors and entrepreneurs alike. Layering 
an unpredictable array of changing Internet access taxes on top of what is an essen-
tial but moderately priced component of people’s businesses and lives can easily pre-
vent those with the most to gain from the empowerment of the Internet from being 
able to use it. This is especially true for rural small businesses. According to an SBA 
study  in  December  of  2005,  rural  small  businesses  pay  nearly  10  percent  more  for 
broadband  services  than  their  urban  counterparts.  Given  that  broadband  services 
are  price  elastic,  disparities  created  by  access  taxes  will  unjustly  harm  small  busi-
nesses, particularly those in rural areas. 

The  driving  force  that  the  Internet  has  become  for  the  United  States’  economy 
and culture should not ever be subject to an access tax. Such a regressive tax would 
place a significant hurdle to clear for small businesses and low to moderate income 
consumers  to  access  to  what  has  become  the  defining  economic,  political  and  cul-
tural  necessity  of  this  century.  Permitting  unpredictable  and  multiple  taxes  on 
Internet  access  was  not  a  sound  social  or  economic  policy  in  1998,  and  it  will  not 
be  in  2008,  2018,  or  2028.  Congress  should  provide  cost  conscious  small  businesses 
and consumers the piece of mind that their increasing investments in, and reliance 
upon,  the  Internet  will  not  be  wasted  because  arbitrary  state  or  local  taxes  levied 
against them in the future will make the Internet unaffordable. 

Moreover,  the  continued  success  of  e-commerce,  specifically  among  small  busi-
nesses, depends upon Congress’ protection of consumers and businesses from unpre-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

dictable and multiple or discriminatory taxes. The mere legal possibility that a con-
sumer could be taxed by multiple states on a single purchase would have a chilling 
effect  on  small  businesses  in  the  United  States.  Given  the  impressive  contributions 
that  e-commerce  has  made  to  our  economy,  education,  culture  and  prosperity  since 
1998, and the trends indicating that online marketing and sales by small businesses 
will only increase, it would be an economic disaster to ever let the our current pro- 
Internet policy expire. 
Recommendations and Conclusion 

and for new, multiple, unpredictable discriminatory sales and use taxes. 

To  continue  Congressional  support  of  small  business  and  individual  taxpayers, 
CompTIA specifically supports the following related to the Internet tax moratorium: 
• The  Internet  tax  moratorium  should  be  made  permanent  for  both  access  taxes 
• The  Internet  tax  moratorium  legislation  before  the  Senate  should  be  amended 
to  clarify  the  definition  of  Internet  access  to  cover  all  the  services  intended  by 
Congress  in  enacting  the  original  moratorium  and  in  subsequent  amendments. 
This  is  necessary  to  prevent  taxing  bodies  from  finding  creative  ways  to  try  to 
tax Internet access services. 
• The  State  Streamlined  Sales  Tax  Project  is  an  important  but  quite  separate 
issue and its progress should not be merged with, muddied by, or otherwise con-
fused with the importance of a pro-Internet tax policy. A prohibition of discrimi-
natory  taxes  against  Internet  usage  does  not  impact  any  state’s  ability  to  tax 
online  sales  in  a  nondiscriminatory  manner,  or  otherwise  collect  business  and 
telecommunications taxes. The bill simply continues the existing prohibition on 
taxation  of  Internet  access  and  precludes  any  taxation  that  would  single  out 
Internet users for unfair tax treatment. As such, the merits and progress of the 
Streamlined Sales Tax Project need to be considered independently. 

Given  the  growth  of  the  Internet’s  economic  and  social  importance—from  saving 
time  buying  back  to  school  clothes,  to  finding  and  evaluating  a  doctor  or  searching 
for employment—access to the Internet, free of unjust taxes, is one of the most crit-
ical  issues  before  America’s  consumers  and  small  business  entrepreneurs.  As  such, 
CompTIA strongly encourages this Committee and this Congress to continue its vig-
orous defense of small businesses and American consumers by passing S. 156. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE COALITION FOR RATIONAL AND FAIR TAXATION 1 

The  Coalition  for  Rational  and  Fair  Taxation  (‘‘CRAFT’’)  is  a  diverse  coalition  of 
some  of  America’s  largest  corporations  involved  in  interstate  commerce,  including 
technology  companies,  broadcasters,  interstate  direct  retailers,  publishers,  financial 
services  businesses,  traditional  manufacturers,  and  multistate  entertainment  and 
service businesses. The businesses maintain locations throughout the United States 
and employ several hundred thousand employees in our country. 

This statement focuses on why a bright-line, quantifiable physical presence nexus 
standard is the appropriate standard for state and local taxation of out-of-state busi-
nesses  and  why  modernization  of  Public  Law  86–272  is  essential  to  the  U.S.  econ-
omy.  CRAFT  strongly  supports  Business  Activity  Tax  Simplification  Act  of 
2006(‘‘BATSA’’) legislation, which was introduced as S. 2721 in the 109th Congress. 
Such legislation would bring clarity and uniformity to the currently diverging state 
business activity tax jurisdictional standards. We believe that it is essential for Con-
gress to act to provide clear guidance to the states in the area of state taxing juris-
diction,  removing  the  drag  that  the  current  climate  of  uncertainty  places  on  Amer-
ican businesses, and thereby protecting American jobs and enhancing the U.S. econ-
omy. 

The absence of a clear business activity tax jurisdictional standard has negatively 
affected  interstate  commerce.  Businesses  are  not  certain  what  activities  they  can 
and cannot do in states before becoming subject to taxation. A few states now assert 
that  they  can  impose  a  business  activity  tax  on  a  business  that  has  no  property  or 
employees  in  the  state,  but  that  merely  has  an  out-of-state  telephone  number  that 
is  registered  in  a  local  telephone  book.2 The  intent  is  clearly  to  punish  out-of-state 
businesses  that  reach  into  a  state  and  try  to  open  lines  of  communication  with  po-
tential  in-state  customers.  Broadcasters  are  subject  to  similar  treatment.  Broad-
casting  a  signal  into  a  state  is  being  asserted  as  grounds  for  business  activity  tax-

1 By Arthur R. Rosen, Counsel CRAFT, McDermott Will & Emery LLP, 340 Madison Avenue, 

New York, NY 10173. 

2 See 2007 BNA Survey of State Tax Departments, p. S–14. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

ation  in  some  states.  An  outrageous  tactic  of  some  state  revenue  departments  is  to 
impose  a  business  activity  tax  on  corporations  that  merely  have  trucks  passing 
through the state for as little as six times in an entire year, even where the trucks 
do not stop in the state and do not deliver goods in the state.3 This is not only bad 
policy. It also is a difficult standard as a practical matter—after all, it requires that 
a corporate tax department keep track of the routes truckers take and what the tax-
ability standards are for each state the trucks pass through. Tax jurisdiction should 
not be based on such trivialities. 

CRAFT submits this statement to apprise this committee about BATSA-type legis-
lation,  to  explain  why  it  is  necessary  and  to  advocate  for  its  passage.  We  believe 
that this Committee will find BATSA-type legislation to be particularly interesting, 
because it is actuated by concern about recent trends in the state taxation of inter-
state  commerce,  telecommunications,  interstate  trucking  and  transportation  and 
many other matters within this Committee’s purview. 
Overview 

The  principal  motivation  for  the  adoption  of  the  United  States  Constitution  as  a 
replacement  to  the  Articles  of  Confederation  was  a  desire  to  establish  and  ensure 
the maintenance of a single, integrated, robust American economy. This is reflected 
in  the  Commerce  Clause,  which  provides  Congress  with  the  authority  to  safeguard 
the  free  flow  of  interstate  commerce.  As  an  additional  consideration,  the  Supreme 
Court  has  determined,  in  the  context  of  the  Due  Process  Clause,  that,  in  the  area 
of state taxation, ‘‘the simple but controlling question is whether the state has given 
anything for which it can ask return.’’ 4 

Unfortunately,  some  state  revenue  departments  have  been  creating  barriers  to 
interstate commerce by aggressively attempting to impose direct taxes on businesses 
located  in  other  states  that  have  little  or  no  connection  to  their  state.  Some  state 
revenue  departments  have  even  asserted  that  they  can  tax  a  business  that  merely 
has customers in the state based on the recently-minted notion of ‘‘economic nexus.’’ 
Such behavior is entirely logical on the part of the taxing state because it has every 
incentive  to  try  collecting  as  much  revenue  as  possible  from  businesses  that  play 
no  part  in  the  taxing  state’s  society.  But  this  country  has  long  stood  against  such 
taxation  without  representation.  And  worse,  the  ‘‘economic  nexus’’  concept  flies  in 
the face of the current state of business activity taxation, which is largely based on 
the  notion  that  a  business  should  only  be  subject  to  tax  by  a  state  from  which  the 
business receives benefits and protections. And worse still, it creates significant un-
certainty  that  has  a  chilling  effect  on  interstate  economic  activity,  dampening  busi-
ness  expansion  and  job  growth.  Practicing  tax  attorneys  and  accountants  regularly 
advise  businesses  that  ultimately  decide  not  to  engage  in  a  particular  transaction 
in  another  state  out  of  concern  that  those  businesses  might  become  subject  to  tax 
liability in that state. It is entirely appropriate for Congress to intervene to prevent 
individual  states  from  erecting  such  barriers  to  trade,  and  to  protect  and  promote 
the  free  flow  of  commerce  between  the  states  for  the  benefit  of  the  U.S.  economy.5 
Confronted  with  aggressive—and  often  Constitutionally  questionable  (as  is  dis-
cussed  below)—efforts  of  state  revenue  departments  to  tax  their  income  when  they 
have  little  or  no  presence  in  the  jurisdiction,  American  businesses  are  faced  with 
a  difficult  choice.  They  can  oppose  the  tax—but  then  must  bear  substantial  litiga-
tion  costs  to  do  so.  Or,  they  can  knuckle  under  to  the  state  revenue  departments 
and pay the asserted tax—but then they risk being subject to multiple taxation. Un-
fortunately, the latter choice is sometimes made, especially since some state revenue 
departments  are  making  increasing  use  of  ‘‘hardball’’  tactics,  a  topic  on  which  the 
American  business  community  would  truly  relish  elaborating  at  another  time  or  in 
another forum. Moreover, the compliance burdens of state business activity taxation 
can  be  immense.  Think  of  an  interstate  business  with  customers  in  all  50  states. 
If  economic  nexus  were  the  standard,  that  business  would  be  faced  with  having  to 
file  an  income  or  franchise  tax  return  with  every  state  and  pay  license  or  similar 
taxes to thousands upon thousands of localities. 

As  businesses  adapt  to  the  ‘‘new  order’’  of  conducting  business  in  the  new  econ-
omy,  efforts  by  state  revenue  departments  to  expand  their  taxing  jurisdiction  to 
cover  activities  conducted  in  other  jurisdictions  constitute  a  significant  burden  on 
the  business  community’s  ability  to  carry  on  business.  Left  unchecked,  this  at-

3 Id.  At  S–40–S–41  (five  states  reported  that  they  would  impose  a  business  activity  tax  on 
these  facts;  several  other  states  reported  that  they  may  or  may  not  impose  the  tax  depending 
on  the  taxpayer’s  business  and/or  the  total  number  of  miles  logged  in  the  state  by  the  trucks). 

4 Wisconsin v. J.C. Penney Co., 311 U.S. 435 (1940). 
5 See e.g., Diann L. Smith, Supreme Court Would Uphold Pub. L. 86–272 (letter to the editors), 
25  State  Tax  Notes  135  (July  8,  2002)  (discussing  the  authority  of  Congress  to  regulate  inter-
state commerce). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

tempted  expansion  of  the  states’  taxing  power  will  have  a  chilling  effect  on  the  en-
tire  economy  as  tax  burdens,  compliance  costs,  litigation,  and  uncertainty  escalate. 
Clearly, the time is ripe for Congress to consider when state and local governments 
should  and  should  not  be  permitted  to  require  out-of-state  businesses  to  pay  busi-
ness activity taxes. It appears eminently fair and reasonable for Congress to provide 
relief  from  unfair  and  unreasonable  impositions  of  income  and  franchise  taxes  on 
out-of-state  businesses  that  have  little  or  no  physical  connection  with  the  state  or 
locality. 

Consistent  with  principles  enumerated  by  the  majority  of  the  Federal  Advisory 
Commission  on  Electronic  Commerce  (‘‘ACEC’’),6 and  earlier  by  the  Congressional 
Willis Commission in 1965, the Business Activity Tax Simplification Act is designed 
to  address  the  issue  of  when  a  state  should  have  authority  to  impose  a  direct  tax 
on a business that has no or merely a minimal connection with the state. This issue 
has become increasingly pressing as the U.S. and global economies have become less 
goods-focused  and  more  service-oriented  and  as  the  use  of  modern  technology  has 
proliferated  throughout  the  country  and  the  world.  BATSA-type  legislation  would 
apply  to  state  and  local  business  activity  taxes,  which  are  direct  taxes  such  as  cor-
porate  income  taxes,  gross  receipts  taxes,  franchise  taxes,  gross  profits  taxes,  and 
capital stock taxes that are imposed on businesses engaged in interstate commerce. 
BATSA-type legislation does not apply to other taxes, like sales and use taxes, per-
sonal  income  taxes,7 gross  premium  taxes  imposed  on  insurance  companies,  or 
transaction  taxes  measured  by  gross  receipts,  such  as  the  New  Mexico  Gross  Re-
ceipts and Compensating Tax Act.8 

The  underlying  principle  of  BATSA-type  legislation  is  that  states  and  localities 
that  provide  benefits  and  protections  to  a  business,  like  education,  roads,  fire  and 
police  protection,  water,  sewer,  etc.,  should  be  the  ones  who  receive  the  benefit  of 
that  business’  taxes,  rather  than  a  remote  state  that  provides  no  services  to  the 
business.  By  imposing  a  physical  presence  standard  for  business  activity  taxes, 
BATSA-type  legislation  would  ensure  that  state  tax  impositions  are  appropriately 
borne  only  by  those  businesses  that  receive  such  benefits  and  protection  from  the 
taxing  state.  Such  legislation  would  do  so  in  a  manner  that  would  ensure  that  the 
business  community  continues  to  pay  its  fair  share  of  tax  but  would  put  a  stop  to 
new and unfair tax impositions. Perhaps most important, a physical presence nexus 
standard  is  entirely  consistent  with  the  jurisdictional  standard  that  the  Federal 
Government uses in tax treaties with its trading partners. In fact, creating consist-
ency with the international standards of business taxation is vital to eliminating un-
certainty and promoting the growth of the U.S. economy. 
Background 

The question of when a state has the authority to impose a tax directly on a busi-
ness domiciled outside the state has been asked for decades.9 In 1959, the Supreme 
Court ruled that a corporation with several sales people assigned to an office located 
in  the  State  of  Minnesota  could  be  subjected  to  that  state’s  direct  tax  scheme.10 
Prior to that time, there had been a ‘‘well-settled rule,’’ stated in Norton Co. v. Illi-
nois  Dept.  of  Revenue,  340  U.S.  534  (1951),  that  solicitation  in  interstate  commerce 
was  protected  from  taxation  in  the  State  where  the  solicitation  took  place.’’ 11 The 
Supreme  Court’s  1959  decision  in  Northwestern  States  Portland  Cement,  coupled 
with  the  Court’s  refusal  to  hear  two  other  cases 12 (where  the  taxpayers,  which  did 
not maintain offices in the state, conducted activities in the state that were limited 
to mere solicitation of orders by visiting salespeople), cast some doubt on that ‘‘well- 
settled rule’’ and fueled significant concern within the business community that the 
states could tax out-of-state businesses with unfettered authority, thereby imposing 

6 See Special Subcomm. on State Taxation of Interstate Commerce of the House Comm. on the 
Judiciary  of  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  ‘‘State  Taxation  of  Interstate  Commerce,’’  H.R. 
Rep.  No.  1480,  88th  Cong.,  2d  Sess.  (1964);  H.R.  Reps.  Nos.  565  and  952,  89th  Cong.  (1965); 
and  Advisory  Commission  on  Electronic  Commerce,  ‘‘Report  to  Congress,’’  pp.  17–20  (April 
2000), respectively. 

7 In  addition,  nothing  in  BATSA-type  legislation  affects  the  responsibilities  of  an  employer  to 
withhold  personal  income  taxes  paid  to  resident  and  nonresident  employees  earning  income  in 
a state or to pay employment or unemployment taxes. 

8 N.M. Stat. § 7–9–1 et seq. 
9 See, e.g., Walter Hellerstein, State Taxation of Interstate Business: Perspectives on Two Cen-

turies of Constitutional Adjudication, 41 Tax Law. 37 (1987). 

10 Northwestern States Portland Cement Co. v. Minnesota, 358 U.S. 450 (1959). 
11 Wisconsin  Dep’t  of  Revenue  v.  William  Wrigley  Jr.  Co.,  505  U.S.  214,  238  (1992)  (Kennedy, 

J., dissenting). 

12 Brown Forman Distillers Corp. v. Collector of Revenue, 101 So.2d 70 (La. 1958), appeal dis-
missed  and  cert.  denied,  359  U.S.  28  (1959);  International  Shoe  Co.  v.  Fontenot,  107  So.2d  640 
(La. 1958), cert. denied, 359 U.S. 984 (1959). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

significant  costs  on  businesses  and  harm  to  the  U.S.  economy  in  general.  As  a  re-
sult,  Congress  responded  rapidly,  enacting  Public  Law  86–272  a  mere  6  months 
later. Public Law 86–272 prohibits states and localities from imposing income taxes 
on a business whose activities within the state are limited to soliciting sales of tan-
gible personal property, if those orders are accepted outside the state and the goods 
are  shipped  or  delivered  into  the  state  from  outside  the  state.13 Subsequently,  the 
Congressional  Willis  Commission  studied  this  and  other  interstate  tax  issues  and 
concluded that, among other things, a business should not be subject to a direct tax 
imposition by a state in which it merely had customers.14 

In recent years, certain states and organizations of state tax collectors have been 
advocating  the  position  that  a  state  has  the  right  to  impose  tax  on  a  business  that 
merely  has  customers  there,  even  if  the  business  has  no  physical  presence  in  the 
state  whatsoever.15 The  business  community,  in  contrast,  believes  that  a  state  can 
impose direct taxes only on businesses that have a physical presence in the state.16 
While  the  taxpayers’  position  has  repeatedly  been  upheld,  the  state  courts  and  tri-
bunals  have  rendered  non-uniform  decisions  on  this  issue.17 Unfortunately,  the  Su-
preme Court has not granted writs of certiorari in relevant cases.18 

The bottom line is that businesses should pay tax where they earn income. It may 
be true, as certain state tax collectors assert, that without sales there can be no in-
come.  While  this  may  make  for  a  nice  sound  bite,  it  simply  is  not  relevant.  Income 
is  earned  where  an  individual  or  business  entity  employs  its  labor  and  capital,  i.e., 
where he, she, or it actually performs work.19 In fact, as early as 2019, the Attorney 
General  of  the  State  of  New  York  pointed  out  that  ‘‘the  work  done,  rather  than  the 
person paying for it, should be regarded as the ‘source’ of income.’’ 20 

Proponents  of  the  so-called  ‘‘economic  nexus’’  standard  argue  that  the  states  pro-
vide  benefits  for  the  welfare  of  society  as  a  whole  and,  therefore,  the  states  should 
be able to collect business activity taxes from all U.S. businesses, wherever located. 
Such an argument is not only ludicrous, but it ignores the fact that businesses (and 
individuals)  are  members  of  the  American  society  and  pay  Federal  taxes  for  such 
general  benefits  and  protections.  Nevertheless,  some  argue  that  states  have  spent 
significant  amounts  of  revenue  to  maintain  an  infrastructure  for  interstate  com-
merce  and  court  systems  that  the  Nation  can  utilize,  not  to  mention  spending  tril-

13 Pub. L. No. 86–272, 73 Stat. 555 (codified at 15 U.S.C. §§ 381 et seq.). 
14 Special  Subcomm.  on  State  Taxation  of  Interstate  Commerce  of  the  House  Comm.  on  the 
Judiciary  of  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  ‘‘State  Taxation  of  Interstate  Commerce,’’  H.R. 
Rep.  No.  1480,  88th  Cong.,  2d  Sess.  (1964);  H.R.  Reps.  Nos.  565  and  952,  89th  Cong.  (1965), 
Vol.  1,  Part  VI.,  ch.  39,  42.  See  also  W.  Val  Oveson,  Lessons  in  State  Tax  Simplification,  2002 
State Tax Today 18–39 (Jan. 20, 2002). 

15 A  survey  conducted  by  BNA  Tax  Analysts  demonstrates  the  extent  to  which  the  states  are 
asserting the right to impose tax on out-of-state businesses based on so-called ‘‘economic nexus’’ 
grounds. Special Report: 2004 Survey of State Tax Departments, 11 Multistate Tax. Rep’t 4, pp. 
S–9–S–43, at S–36, S–37 (April 23, 2004). See also Ensuring the Equity, Integrity and Viability 
of  Multistate  Tax  Systems,  Multistate  Tax  Commission  Policy  Statement  01–2  (October  17, 
2002).  Accord  Letter  from  Elizabeth  Harchenko,  Director,  Oregon  Department  of  Revenue,  to 
Senator Ron Wyden (July 16, 2001). See also Doug Sheppard, The Certainty of Disagreement on 
Business Activity Tax Nexus, 25 State Tax Notes 420 (Aug. 5, 2002). 

16 See  Jurisdiction  to  Tax—Constitutional,  Council  of  State  Taxation  Policy  Statement  of 
2001–2002;  The  Internet  Tax  Fairness  Act  of  2001:  Hearing  on  H.R.  2526  Before  the  Sub-
committee on Commercial and Administrative Law of the House Comm. on the Judiciary, 107th 
Cong. (2001) (statements of Arthur Rosen on Behalf of the Coalition for Rational and Fair Tax-
ation; Stanley Sokul, Member, Advisory Commission On Electronic Commerce, on Behalf of the 
Direct Marketing Association and the Internet Tax Fairness Coalition). See also Scott D. Smith 
and  Sharlene  E.  Amitay,  Economic  Nexus:  An  Unworkable  Standard  for  Jurisdiction,  25  State 
Tax Notes 787 (Sept. 9, 2002). 

17 See  Lanco  Inc.  v.  Director,  Div.  of  Tax’n,  008  A.2d  176  (N.J.  2006);  A&F  Trademark,  Inc. 
v.  Tolson,  605  S.E.2d  187  (N.C.  Ct.  App.  2004);  Acme  Royalty  Co.  v.  Missouri  Dir.  of  Revenue, 
96  S.W.3d  72  (Mo.  2002);  Rylander  v.  Bandag  Licensing  Corp.,  Tex.  App.  Ct.,  No.  03–99– 
004217–CV  (May  11,  2000);  J.C.  Penney  National  Bank  v.  Johnson,  19  S.W.3d  831  (Tenn.  Ct. 
App.  1999);  Cerro  Copper  Prods.,  Inc.,  No.  F–94–444,  1995  Ala.  Tax  LEXIS  211  (Ala.  Dep’t  of 
Revenue Dec. 11, 1995); Geoffrey, Inc. v. South Carolina Tax Comm’n, 437 S.E.2d 13 (S.C. 1993); 
and Wisconsin v. J.C. Penney Co., 311 U.S. 435 (1940). 

18 Comptroller  of  the  Treasury  v.  SYL,  Inc.;  Crown  Cork  &  Seal  Co.  (Del.),  Inc.,  825  A.2d  399 
(MD  2003),  cert.  denied  2003  U.S.  LEXIS  8044  (2003)  and  2003  U.S.  LEXIS  9221  (2003);  J.C. 
Penney  National  Bank  v.  Johnson,  19  S.W.3d  831  (Tenn.  Ct.  App.  1999),  cert.  denied,  531  U.S. 
927  (2000);  Geoffrey,  Inc.  v.  South  Carolina  Tax  Comm’n,  437  S.E.2d  13,  cert.  denied,  510  U.S. 
992 (1993). 

19 As noted by one state tax expert, ‘‘ ‘[i]ncome,’ we were told long ago, ‘may be defined as the 
gain derived from capital, from labor, or from both combined.’ ’’ W. Hellerstein, On the Proposed 
Single-Factor  Formula  in  Michigan,  State  Tax  Notes,  Oct.  2,  1995,  at  1,000  (quoting  Eisner  v. 
Macomber, 252 U.S. 189, 207 (2020)). 

20 Op. N.Y. Att’y Gen. 301 (May 29, 2019) (emphasis added). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

lions  of  dollars  over  the  years  to  provide  education  to  their  populations.  This  argu-
ment  continues  with  the  incredible  example  of  the  student  who  benefits  from  his 
or  her  state’s  education  funding  who  may  someday  work  for  an  out-of-state  com-
pany;  apparently,  the  out-of-state  company  would  then  receive  benefits  that  had 
been  provided  by  that  employee’s  former  state  and  should  therefore  bear  some  of 
the  burden  by  paying  tax  to  the  state  that  provided  that  education.  The  absurdity 
of this position should be clear. Should U.S. companies that have hired people edu-
cated in England have to pay taxes to the Queen? Should every business automati-
cally be obligated to pay taxes to all 50 states, in anticipation of the possibility, how-
ever  remote,  that  they  may  at  some  undefined  future  point  hire  a  person  who  was 
educated in the taxing state? No one can argue that the states do not play an impor-
tant  role  in  interstate  commerce,  that  an  educated  public  is  not  an  element  of  a 
fruitful  society  and  marketplace,  or  even  that  a  court  system  does  not  help  to  pro-
mote  order.  But  this  simply  cannot  be  a  basis  for  states  to  impose  tax  on  all  busi-
nesses in the Nation. Imposing business activity taxes on every out-of-state business 
is truly ‘‘taxation without representation.’’ 

The business activity tax concepts that were incorporated in the 109th Congress’s 
S.  2721  were  similar  to  the  recommendations  of  the  majority  report  issued  by  the 
Advisory  Commission  on  Electronic  Commerce.  Specifically,  the  ACEC  majority  re-
port  concluded  that  a  company  should  have  some  level  of  physical  presence  before 
a  state  could  impose  business  activity  tax  reporting  and  payment  obligations  on  it 
and  that  certain  activities  would  not  be  considered  physical  presence  for  this  pur-
pose  and  specifically  carved  them  out  from  nexus  consideration.21 Consistent  with 
this  conclusion,  S.  2721  provided  for  a  bright-line  physical  presence  standard  that 
recognized  that  certain  instances  of  ‘‘presence’’  are  qualitatively  de  minimis.22 As  a 
result, S. 2721 was more conservative and actually provided states with more oppor-
tunity  to  tax  interstate  commerce  than  was  available  under  the  ACEC  majority  re-
port recommendation. 

BATSA-type  legislation  would  provide  simple  and  identifiable  standards  that 
would  significantly  minimize  litigation  by  establishing  clear  rules  for  all  states, 
thereby freeing scarce resources for more productive uses both in and out of govern-
ment.  Although  it  is  unlikely  that  such  legislation  would  end  all  business  activity 
tax jurisdictional controversies, any statute that adds nationwide clarification would 
obviously  reduce  the  amount  of  controversy  and  litigation  by  narrowing  the  areas 
of  dispute.  For  example,  in  the  47  years  since  its  enactment  in  1959,  Public  Law 
86–272  has  generated  relatively  few  cases,  perhaps  a  score  or  two.  On  the  other 
hand,  areas  outside  its  coverage  have  been  litigated  extensively  and  at  great  ex-
pense.  Recent  litigation  has  focused  on  what  the  appropriate  nexus  standard  for 
business activity taxes actually is; there is no indication that this issue will be set-
tled absent Congressional action. 
The Provisions of the 109th Congress’s S. 2721 

Codification  of  the  Physical  Presence  Standard.  S.  2721  provided  that,  pursuant 
to  Congress’  Commerce  Clause  authority,  a  state  or  locality  could  not  impose  busi-
ness activity taxes on businesses that did not have a ‘‘physical presence’’ within the 
jurisdiction.  The  requisite  degree  of  physical  presence  (employees,  property,  or  the 
use  of  third  parties  to  perform  certain  activities)  was  set  at  greater  than  21  days 
during  a  taxable  year,  with  certain  specified  incidences  of  presence  being  dis-
regarded as qualitatively de minimis. 

The  21-day  quantitative  de  minimis  threshold  was  measured  by  each  day  that  a 
business  assigned  one  or  more  employees  in  the  state,  used  the  services  of  certain 
third parties in the state, or had certain property in the state. For example, a busi-
ness that sent only four employees into a state together for 10 days would not have 
physical presence. On the other hand, a business that sent one employee into a state 
on  twenty-two  different  days  during  a  taxable  year  would  have  physical  presence 
in  that  state.  The  standard  proposed  in  S.  2721  thus  would  have  made  taxpayer 
compliance  and  state  revenue  department  administration  simple  and  straight-
forward. 

S. 2721 included two exceptions to the 21 day rule that applied to those who real-
ly  do  earn  their  income  during  shorter  visits  to  the  state.  The  first  exception  en-

2000). 

21 See  Advisory  Commission  on  Electronic  Commerce,  Report  to  Congress,  pp.  21–22  (April 

22 H.R.  2526  and  S.  664  from  the  previous  Congress  were  drafted  ‘‘negatively,’’  defining  ‘‘sub-
stantial  physical  presence’’  by  what  it  was  not,  i.e.,  the  activities  protected  by  the  safe  harbors 
recommended  by  the  ACEC  majority.  In  response  to  state  revenue  departments’  criticisms  of 
this ‘‘negative’’ definition, S. 2721 was drafted to positively define what is a ‘‘physical presence’’ 
for  purposes  of  allowing  states  to  impose  business  activity  taxes  on  out-of-state  businesses 
(among other refinements). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

sured  that  businesses  engaged  in  actual  selling  of  tangible  personal  property 
through the use of traveling employees, e.g., businesses that hold ‘‘tent sales’’ or ‘‘off 
the  truck  sales,’’  or  in  performing  certain  services  to  real  property  in  the  state 
through  the  use  of  traveling  employees,  e.g.,  migrant  painters  or  roofers,  were  sub-
ject to state and local business activity taxes. The second exception was targeted at 
athletes,  musicians,  and  other  entertainers.  Such  persons  were  not  eligible  for  the 
de  minimis  exceptions  (and,  thus,  were  subject  to  tax  by  the  jurisdictions  in  which 
they  perform).  Both  of  these  exceptions  were  consistent  with  the  underlying  intent 
of S. 2721 that businesses pay tax where income is actually earned. 

For  a  qualitative  de  minimis  standard,  S.  2721  provided  that  certain  property  or 
certain  activities  engaged  in  by  a  business’  employees  within  the  jurisdiction’s 
boundaries  would  not  be  considered  in  determining  whether  the  business  had  the 
requisite physical presence in the jurisdiction. This approach of disregarding certain 
activities for nexus purposes was recognized in Public Law 86–272, where Congress 
determined that mere solicitation is qualitatively de minimis relative to the benefits 
that  protecting  such  activities  offered  to  the  U.S.  economy.  The  protected  activities 
were limited to situations where the business was patronizing the local market (i.e., 
being  a  customer),  and  thereby  generating  economic  activity  in  the  state  that  pro-
duced  other  tax  revenues  for  the  state,  rather  than  exploiting  that  market  (many 
states have issued rulings, albeit inconsistent and ad hoc in nature, recognizing this 
principle), including ancillary property and activities. This encompassed visiting cur-
rent  and  prospective  suppliers,  attending  conferences,  seminars,  or  media  events, 
utilizing  an  in-state  manufacturer  or  processor,  or  having  testing  performed  in  the 
state. 

In  the  area  of  attributing  one  business’  physical  presence  in  a  state  to  another, 
S.  2721  provided  that  an  out-of-state  business  would  have  a  physical  presence  in 
a  state  if  that  business  used  the  services  of  an  in-state  person,  on  more  than  21 
days,  to  perform  services  that  established  or  maintained  the  nonresident  business’ 
market  in  that  state,  unless  the  in-state  person  performed  similar  functions  for 
more  than  one  business  during  the  year.  The  ownership  relationship  between  the 
out-of-state person and the in-state person was irrelevant for purposes of this provi-
sion. By limiting attribution of nexus only to situations involving market enhancing 
activities, S. 2721 not only more accurately reflected the economics of a transaction 
or  business,  but  was  also  consistent  with  the  current  state  of  the  law.  Expanding 
attribution  any  further  would  undermine  the  principles  of  fairness  and  equity  in 
taxation. To the extent that a separate company was conducting business in a state, 
its  own  income,  including  appropriate  entrepreneurial  profit,  was  subject  to  tax  in 
that  state.  In  other  words,  limiting  attribution  ensures  that  a  state  taxes  the  eco-
nomic activity that actually occurred in that state and not the activity that occurred 
elsewhere. 

As  an  example,  suppose  a  manufacturing  company  located  only  in  State  A  used 
a  sales  company  in  State  B  to  market  and  sell  the  manufacturer’s  product  in  State 
B.  The  sales  company  was  conducting  a  business  activity  within  State  B  and  there 
is  no  doubt  that  it  should  be  subject  to  tax  by  the  state.  That  state  would  receive 
tax  revenues  commensurate  with  the  marketing  and  selling  activities  that  actually 
occurred  in  the  state;  the  tax  revenues  would  be  based  on  the  compensation,  set  at 
fair  market  value,  that  the  manufacturer  paid  the  sales  company  for  its  marketing 
and  selling  services  (i.e.,  the  in-state  activities  that  add  value  in  the  economic 
stream).  As  for  the  manufacturing  company,  its  activities  constituted  a  separate 
business  activity  that  took  place  totally  outside  of  State  B.  Putting  this  example  in 
a global context, attempts by the state of manufacture to tax the out-of-state manu-
facturing company would be akin to France attempting to impose tax on the manu-
facturing  income  of  every  American  business  that  contracted  with  a  French  mar-
keting  company  to  market  and  sell  products  in  France.  Clearly,  merely  signing  the 
contract  with  the  in-state  company  provides  too  attenuated  a  connection  to  enable 
the state to tax the out-of-state manufacturer on its manufacturing income. 

Modernization  of  Public  Law  86–272.  As  noted  earlier,  our  economy  has  under-
gone  significant  changes  in  the  47  years  since  Public  Law  86–272  was  enacted.  In 
addition  to  codifying  the  physical  presence  nexus  standard,  BATSA-type  legislation 
extends  the  longstanding  protections  of  Public  Law  86–272  to  all  sales,  not  just  to 
sales of tangible personal property, in recognition of those changes, specifically, the 
change  in  the  focus  of  the  American  economy  from  goods  to  services  and  the  in-
creased importance of intangible property in the marketplace. 

BATSA-type legislation also modernizes Public Law 86–272 by addressing the ef-
forts of some aggressive states to avoid the restrictions imposed by Congress in Pub-
lic  Law  86–272  by  establishing  taxes  on  business  activity  that  are  measured  by 
means other than the net income of the business. Two examples of these new state 
business  activity  taxes  are  the  Michigan  Single  Business  Tax,  which  imposes  a  tax 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

on a company’s business activities in the state, not on net income, and the New Jer-
sey  Corporation  Business  Tax,  which  was  amended  effective  in  2002  to  impose  a 
gross  profits/gross  receipts  tax.  What  is  most  distressing  about  the  New  Jersey 
amendments is that, as of July 1, 2006, these ‘‘gross’’ taxes apply only to businesses 
protected  by  Public  Law  86–272.  In  other  words,  New  Jersey  has  effectively  cir-
cumvented  the  Congressional  policy  decision  underlying  the  enactment  of  Public 
Law 86–272 by imposing a non-income tax only on those businesses that would oth-
erwise  be  protected  by  the  Public  Law.  States  are  increasingly  turning  to  non-in-
come  based  business  activity  taxes,  in  large  part  to  avoid  the  effect  of  Federal  law. 
Both Ohio and Texas have recently done just that. BATSA-type legislation address-
es  this  by  ensuring  that  Public  Law  86–272  covers  all  business  activity  taxes,  not 
just net income taxes. 
Federalism 

As noted above, considerations of federalism support passing BATSA-type legisla-
tion.  The  Founding  Fathers,  by  discarding  the  Articles  of  Confederation  and  estab-
lishing  a  single  national  economy,  intended  for  Congress  to  protect  the  free  flow  of 
commerce  among  the  states  against  efforts  by  individual  states  to  set  up  barriers 
to  this  trade.  Congress  itself  has  recognized  this  numerous  times  in  the  context  of 
state taxation and has exercised its responsibilities repeatedly by enacting laws that 
limit  the  states’  authority  to  impose  taxes  that  would  unreasonably  burden  inter-
state  commerce.  A  few  of  the  many  such  instances  are: 23 Public  Law  86–272,  the 
statute  that  S.  2721  would  modernize;  the  Federal  Aviation  Act;  the  Mobile  Tele-
communications Sourcing Act; the Amtrak Reauthorization Act; Public Law 104–95; 
the ICC Termination Act; the Miscellaneous Revenue Act of 1981; the Railroad Reg-
ulatory  Reform  and  Revitalization  Act  (the  ‘‘4R  Act’’);  and  the  Soldiers  and  Sailors 
Civil Relief Act. 

The  very  adoption  of  the  Constitution  was  itself  a  backlash  against  the  ability  of 
states  to  impede  commerce  among  themselves;  in  adopting  the  Constitution,  which 
expressly grants Congress the authority to regulate interstate commerce, the states 
relinquished  a  portion  of  their  sovereignty.24 The  Supreme  Court  has  explicitly 
noted Congress’ role in the area of multistate taxation.25 

BATSA-type  legislation  strikes  the  correct  balance  between  state  autonomy/sov-
ereignty and the regulation of interstate commerce. Such legislation merely codifies 
current  jurisdictional  standards  for  when  a  business  may  impose  a  tax  and  does 
nothing  to  determine  how  a  state  may  tax  businesses  that  are  properly  subject  to 
its taxing jurisdiction. A state remains free to determine what type of tax to impose, 
be  it  an  income  tax,  a  gross  receipts  tax,  a  value  added  tax,  or  a  capital  stock  tax; 
to  determine  how  to  apportion  the  income  that  is  taxed  in  the  state,  be  it  a  single- 
or  three-factor  formula  based  on  property,  payroll  and/or  sales;  to  set  the  rate  at 
which the tax chosen will be imposed; to determine whether or not to follow Federal 
taxable income, e.g., to choose whether to decouple from Federal bonus depreciation; 
to provide credits or deductions for certain types of expenses; and so on. 

On  the  other  hand,  the  economic  nexus  standard  (i.e.,  establishing  the  requisite 
nexus  based  solely  on  a  business  having  a  customer  in  the  taxing  jurisdiction)  as-
serts that a business is liable for a business activity tax if that business has derived 
revenue  or  income  from  a  customer  in  a  state—even  though  the  business  has  con-
ducted  no  activities  in  the  state  (i.e.,  has  had  no  property  or  employees  located  in 
that  state).  Keeping  in  mind  that  every  buyer  in  a  transaction  in  a  free  market 
economy  benefits  from  the  transaction  as  much  as  the  seller,  the  economic  nexus 
standard  effectively  imposes  a  toll  charge  on  out-of-state  businesses  for  exchanging 
cash  for  property  (or  for  the  provision  of  a  service).  Such  a  tax  acts  as  a  tariff  on 
interstate commerce and creates exactly the problem that existed under the Articles 
of Confederation and that led to the adoption of the Constitution. Under the Articles 
of  Confederation,  state  taxes  and  duties  impeded  interstate  commerce  as  states 
began enacting their own tariffs and taxing interstate commerce, thereby putting up 

23 For  a  detailed  list  of  instances  where  Congress  has  exercised  its  authority  under  the  Com-
merce Clause, see Frank Shafroth, The Road Since Philadelphia, 30 State Tax Notes 155 (Octo-
ber 13, 2003). 

24 See  Adam  D.  Thierer,  A  Delicate  Balance:  Federalism,  Interstate  Commerce,  and  Economic 
Freedom in the Technological Age, The Heritage Foundation (1998) (citing Alexander Hamilton, 
Federalist No. 22). 

25 Barclay’s Bank PLC v. Franchise Tax Bd. of Cal., 512 U.S. 298 (1994); Quill Corp. v. North 
Dakota,  504  U.S.  298  (1992).  See  also  Eugene  F.  Corrigan,  Searching  for  the  Truth,  26  State 
Tax  Notes  677,  (Dec.  9,  2002)  (‘‘No  amount  of  state  legislation  of  any  kind  can  extend  a  state’s 
taxing jurisdiction beyond the limits set by the Supreme Court; and that Court has, for all prac-
tical purposes, washed its hands of the matter, deferring it to Congress.’’) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

trade  barriers  to  free  trade.26 This  led  to  some  states  retaliating  by  banning  prod-
ucts from other states. By effectively imposing such toll charges, the economic nexus 
standard would clearly have a negative impact on interstate commerce. 
Comparison to Current Common Law 

The  physical  presence  nexus  standard  set  forth  in  BATSA-type  legislation  is  con-
sistent with the current state of the law. An out-of-state business must have nexus 
under  both  the  Constitution’s  Due  Process  Clause  and  its  Commerce  Clause  before 
a  state  has  the  authority  to  impose  tax  on  that  business.  The  Supreme  Court  has 
determined  that  the  Commerce  Clause  requires  the  existence  of  a  ‘‘substantial 
nexus’’ between the taxing state and a putative taxpayer for all state taxes, whereas 
the  Due  Process  Clause  requires  only  a  ‘‘minimum’’  connection.  In  Quill,  the  Su-
preme Court determined, in the context of a business collecting sales and use taxes 
from  its  customers,  that  the  substantial  nexus  requirement  could  be  satisfied  only 
by  the  taxpayer  having  a  physical  presence  in  the  state;  the  Court  refrained  from 
articulating  the  appropriate  measure  for  business  activity  taxes.27 This  is  because 
under  the  American  legal  system,  a  court  only  has  the  authority  and  responsibility 
to address the case before it. The Supreme Court has not granted a writ of certiorari 
for  a  case  that  would  permit  it  to  address  the  business  activity  tax  nexus  issue.  So 
what constitutes substantial nexus for business activity taxes? 28 

Since  the  Court  has  not  yet  ruled  on  this  issue,  we  must  use  clear  logic  and  re-
view  what  state  courts  and  tribunals  have  recently  decided.  The  answer  is  clear:  if 
non-de minimis physical presence is the test for a mere collection and remission sit-
uation  such  as  is  the  case  for  sales  and  use  taxes,  physical  presence  must  be,  at 
a  bare  minimum,  the  appropriate  test  for  the  imposition  of  business  activity  taxes. 
Indeed,  the  standard  for  business  activity  taxes  should,  if  anything,  be  higher  than 
the  standard  for  sales  taxes  for  at  least  two  reasons.  First,  a  business  activity  tax 
is  an  actual  direct  tax  (and  not  a  mere  obligation  to  collect  tax  from  someone  else) 
and the consequent greater economic burden should require a greater connection (as 
the  Supreme  Court  seems  to  have  recognized  in  National  Geographic  Society  v. 
Board  of  Equalization).29 Second,  the  risk  of  multiple  taxation  is  higher  for  income 
taxes  than  for  sales  and  use  taxes.  Sales  and  use  taxes  typically  involve  only  two 
jurisdictions  (the  state  of  origin  and  the  state  of  destination).  However,  corporate 
business activities often create contacts with many states. Finally, the complexities, 
intricacies, and inconsistencies among business activity taxes easily overshadow the 
administrative difficulties related to sales and use tax. 
Effect on State Revenues 

There  simply  is  no  basis  for  any  contention  that  BATSA-type  legislation  could 
lead  to  any  significant  loss  of  state  revenues.  The  most  recent  study,  performed  on 
a state-by-state, industry-by-industry, bill section-by-bill section basis, analyzed the 
likely  effect  of  S.  2721  and  concluded  that  the  total  effect  would  be  less  than  0.1 
percent of state and local taxes currently paid by businesses. It is essential to keep 
in  mind  that  S.  2721  and  BATSA-type  legislation  is  based  on  the  principle  that  a 
business engaged in interstate commerce should pay its fair share of tax.30 BATSA- 
type  legislation  does  not  seek  to  reduce  the  tax  burdens  borne  by  businesses,  but 
merely to ensure that tax is paid to the correct jurisdiction. 

26 See, e.g., Gibbons v. Ogden, 22 U.S. (9 Wheat.) 1, 11 (1824); Quill v. North Dakota, 504 U.S. 

298, 313 (1992). 

27 Quill Corp. v. North Dakota, 504 U.S. 298 (1992). 
28 Opponents  of  a  physical  presence  standard  cite  International  Harvester,  a  1944  U.S.  Su-
preme  Court  case,  as  support  for  their  position  that  economic  nexus  is  appropriate.  See  Inter-
national Harvester Co. v. Wisconsin Dep’t of Taxation, 322 U.S. 435 (1944). Reliance on this case 
is  simply  not  appropriate  because  to  do  so  ignores  a  full  60  years  of  subsequent  jurisprudence 
(e.g.,  Complete  Auto  Transit  Inc.  v.  Brady,  430  U.S.  274  (1977)  and  Quill).  But  even  more  fun-
damentally,  the  case  involved  a  Due  Process  analysis  and  never  considered  the  requirements 
of  the  Commerce  Clause.  In  addition,  when  read  in  the  proper  context,  it  is  clear  that  Inter-
national  Harvester  does  not  endorse  an  economic  presence  standard  for  business  activity  taxes. 
In fact, International Harvester concerned the ability of Wisconsin to require a corporation with 
a  physical  presence  in  the  state  to  withhold  tax  on  dividends  that  it  paid  to  its  shareholders. 
Further,  the  imposition  of  liability  on  the  corporation  can  be  seen  as  merely  a  delayed  income 
tax on the physically present corporation. Clearly, this case is not to be relied upon to determine 
the appropriate nexus standard for business activity taxes. 

29 National Geographic Society v. Board of Equalization, 430 U.S. 551 (1977). 
30 A  recent  study  commissioned  by  the  Council  on  State  Taxation  found  that  businesses  (not 
including pass-through entities) paid $378.9 billion in state and local taxes in 2002, an amount 
that  was  considered  to  be  at  least  business’  fair  share  of  tax.  See  Robert  Cline,  William  Fox, 
Tom Neubig, and Andrew Phillips, A Closer Examination of the Total State and Local Business 
Tax Burden, 27 State Tax Notes 295 (Jan. 27, 2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

BATSA-type  legislation  does  not  depart  to  any  significant  degree  from  what  is 
now  being  done  in  the  states.  The  operational  reason  for  this  has  been  confirmed 
by  the  former  Executive  Director  of  the  Multistate  Tax  Commission.31 Outside  the 
context  of  passive  investment  companies,32 state  revenue  departments  simply  have 
not  been  successful  in  their  attempts  to  assert  economic  nexus  to  impose  tax  on 
businesses that do not have a physical presence in the state. 

S. 2721 would not have had an effect on taxes derived from businesses that main-
tained  a  facility  in  the  jurisdiction  for  more  than  21  days  during  the  taxable  year. 
Clearly, state and local governments derive most—if not virtually all—of their busi-
ness activity tax revenue from such businesses. The amount of revenue received by 
taxing jurisdictions from those businesses that maintain no office, store, warehouse, 
or  other  facility—or  even  inventory—in  the  jurisdiction  at  all  must  truly  be  mini-
mal. 

Consider  first  states  that  impose  a  net  income  tax  to  which  Public  Law  86–272 
applies. It is difficult for tax practitioners, corporate tax managers, and several gov-
ernment  officials  that  were  queried  to  believe  that  these  states  are  actually  col-
lecting  any  material  amount  of  revenue  from  businesses  that  have  no  office  in  the 
state  and  have  non-solicitation  employees  in  the  state  for  zero  to  21  days  during 
the year. There simply cannot be many businesses paying such taxes and, thus, any 
revenue loss would be negligible. 

Consider  next  those  states,  such  as  Michigan,  New  Jersey,  Texas,  and  Wash-
ington,  that  impose  business  activity  taxes  that  are  not  solely  based  on  net  income 
and,  thus,  are  not  covered  by  Public  Law  86–272.  These  states  are  currently  able 
to  collect  revenue  from  out-of-state  businesses  that  do  not  themselves  maintain  an 
office or other facility in the state but that employ individuals in the state who per-
form solicitation in that state. Modernizing Public Law 86–272 to cover non-income 
taxes  clearly  means  that  such  states  will  no  longer  be  able  to  collect  this  revenue. 
The  amount  of  tax  paid  by  such  businesses,  however,  again  must  be  minimal  be-
cause  it  is  unlikely  that  businesses  are  paying  business  activity  tax  to  states  in 
which they only have a fleeting presence. 

It  simply  cannot  be  the  case  that  BATSA-type  legislation  would  have  more  than 
a negligible revenue impact to the states. Charges by critics that the bill would have 
a significant fiscal effect are simply masking what is really going on, i.e., that state 
revenue  departments  and  their  representatives  do  not  want  any  legislative  con-
straints  on  or  oversight  of  their  taxing  authority—even  when  the  legislative  con-
straints  are  squarely  within  Congress’  authority  to  regulate  interstate  commerce.33 

31 ‘‘It  seems  to  me  that  the  states  need  to  face  the  reality  that  most  of  them  are  generally 
incapable of enforcing the ‘doing business’ standard anyway; in almost all cases they really fall 
back  on  the  physical  presence  test  as  a  practical  matter.  To  the  extent  that  they  try  to  go  be-
yond  that  test  to  reach  out-of-state  businesses  for  income  tax  jurisdiction  purposes,  they  spend 
inordinate amounts of time and effort via bloated legal staffs that provide grounds for criticism 
of  government  in  general—and  with  mixed  success,  at  best.  In  short,  it  may  be  that  the  states 
would  be  forgoing  the  collection  of  corporate  income  taxes  that  they  do  not  and  cannot  collect 
anyway.’’  Eugene  Corrigan,  States  Should  Consider  Trade-Off  on  Remote-Sales  Problem  (letter 
to the editor), 27 State Tax Notes 523 (Feb. 10, 2003). 

32 It  is  interesting  to  note  that  the  states  have  now  moved  on  to  using  other,  more  effective 
attacks against passive investment companies, such as the economic substance and alter ego ar-
guments, combined reporting, and the denial of the relevant deductions. See Mitchell J. Tropin, 
States Moving Away From ‘Geoffrey,’ Using Sham Arguments, ‘Attribution’ Nexus, Daily Tax Re-
port, No. 27 (Feb. 10, 2003). 

33 It  is  interesting  that  critics  of  proposals  that  address  multistate  taxation  always  counter 
with  claims  that  the  proposal  will  cause  significant  revenue  loss  to  the  states.  See,  e.g.,  Cor-
porate  Tax  Sheltering  and  The  Impact  On  State  Corporate  Income  Tax  Revenue  Collections, 
Multistate  Tax  Commission  (July  25,  2003);  Dan  Bucks,  Elliott  Dubin  and  Ken  Beier,  Revenue 
Impact  on  State  and  Local  Governments  of  Permanent  Extension  of  the  Internet  Tax  Freedom 
Act,  Multistate  Tax  Commission  (Sept.  24,  2003);  Michael  Mazerov,  Making  the  Internet  Tax 
Freedom  Act  Permanent  in  the  Form  Currently  Proposed  Would  Lead  to  a  Substantial  Revenue 
Loss  for  States  and  Localities,  Center  on  Budget  and  Policy  Priorities  (October  20,  2003).  Yet 
there  is  no  reliable  empirical  evidence  that  states  have  actually  lost  revenue  when  measures 
affecting state taxation have been enacted. This certainly goes to the credibility (or lack thereof) 
of  such  claims.  As  an  example  of  the  unreliability  of  such  claims,  the  National  Conference  of 
State  Legislatures  has  expressed  its  concern  over  projections  by  some  national  organizations 
that the inclusion of telecommunications services in the Internet tax moratorium would cost the 
states $22 billion each year (an estimate representing the total revenue from all state and local 
telecommunication taxes in the 50 states from 1992); in a letter to Senator Alexander dated No-
vember  5,  2003,  the  Congressional  Budget  Office  estimated  that  the  actual  revenue  cost  would 
be between $80 million and $120 million per year starting in 2007—an estimate that is approxi-
mately 220 times smaller. Accord Congressional Budget Office Cost Estimate, H.R. 49, Internet 
Tax Nondiscrimination Act, as requested by the House Comm. on the Judiciary (July 21, 2003). 
In  a  November  4,  2003  action  alert  regarding  S.  150,  ‘‘The  Internet  Tax  Non-Discrimination 
Act,’’ the NCSL stated that ‘‘[t]he $20 billion estimation runs counter to expressed Congressional 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

Moreover,  the  statements  of  revenue  impact  made  by  certain  state  revenue  de-
partments  and  their  representatives  have  been  shown  to  be  highly  unreliable  be-
cause  the  ‘‘estimates’’  focus  on  potential  effects  from  hypothetical  restructurings  by 
businesses,  are  based  on  hypothetical  changes  in  state  law,  or  cite  to  potential  im-
pacts  on  apportionment  rules  (which  is  an  issue  of  how  much  to  tax,  not  whether 
to tax). Such considerations do not make for a reliable or accurate revenue estimate; 
proper revenue estimates are based on revenues currently collected. In reality, there 
simply  will  be  no  material  effect  on  the  amount  of  revenue  received  by  the  states 
because BATSA-type legislation seeks to maintain the status quo. 
Effect on International Taxation and American Competitiveness 

Our  country’s  own  history  and  the  Federal  Government’s  position  in  the  context 
of  international  taxation  provide  sufficient  reason  to  establish  a  physical  presence 
nexus  standard.  The  United  States  and  its  tax  treaty  partners  have,  for  decades, 
adopted and implemented a ‘‘permanent establishment’’ rule. The ‘‘permanent estab-
lishment’’ concept is a long-standing principle and has been extremely important to 
U.S. businesses and, thus, to the U.S. economy. 

The ‘‘permanent establishment’’ rule provides that neither country that is a party 
to the treaty will impose an income tax on a business from the other country unless 
that  business  maintains  a  substantial  physical  presence  in  the  taxing  country. 
Using  the  U.S.  Model  Treaty  provisions  as  an  example,  a  foreign  business  must 
have  a  ‘‘fixed  place  of  business  [in  the  United  States]  through  which  the  business 
of an enterprise is wholly or partly carried on’’ before the United States may impose 
a  tax  on  that  business.34 Under  this  standard,  neither  a  ‘‘rep  office’’  staffed  by  a 
few people, nor a facility used for storage, nor the maintenance of goods or merchan-
dise for processing by another business would rise to the level of being a ‘‘permanent 
establishment’’  in  the  United  States  sufficient  for  the  imposition  of  Federal  income 
tax on that business. 

A  physical  presence  standard  places  an  appropriate  limit  on  states  gaining  tax-
ation  powers  over  out-of-state  firms  and  conforms  to  common  sense  notions  of  fair 
play.  It  is  significant  that  the  OECD  has  recently  studied  the  issue  and  prelimi-
narily concluded that the ‘‘permanent establishment’’ rule should remain the proper 
standard for international tax treaties even with the proliferation of electronic com-
merce.35 The  policy  reasons  underlying  such  a  conclusion  are  clear.  Imagine  for  a 
moment that a foreign country tried to tax the profits of U.S. companies simply be-
cause  the  U.S.  firms  exported  goods  into  that  country.  There  is  no  doubt  that  the 
U.S.  Government  and  business  community  would  be  outraged.  However,  the  eco-
nomic nexus standard that the states would like to implement would have a similar 
effect on interstate commerce. 

Unfortunately,  it  has  been  said  that  some  smaller  countries,  citing  the  efforts  of 
U.S. state revenue departments to impose direct taxes on any business that has cus-
tomers  within  the  state’s  borders,  are  now  saying  that  they  want  to  renegotiate 
their  treaties  with  the  United  States  so  they  can  begin  taxing  every  U.S.  business 
that has a customer in their country. This would be a disaster for the U.S. economy. 
Enactment of BATSA-type legislation, which includes a nexus standard that is anal-
ogous  to  those  found  in  U.S.  tax  treaties,  is  essential  for  ensuring  that  the  current 
international system of taxation remains intact. 
Interplay With State Tax Incentives 

In recent years, states have been increasingly active (and competitive) in offering 
tax incentive packages to businesses to locate and/or expand their operations in that 
state. Such incentives are offered not only to entice businesses into a state but also 
to  ensure  that  businesses  already  located  in  the  state  do  not  relocate  to,  or  expand 
in,  other  jurisdictions.  The  in-state  company  receives  the  benefits  and  protections 
provided by the state and, absent the incentives, would therefore be properly subject 
to full taxation. 

A  less  obvious  tax  incentive  occurs  when  states  adopt  apportionment  formulas 
that  weight  the  sales  factor  more  heavily  than  the  property  and  payroll  factors.  If 
a  state  has  a  double-weighted  sales  factor  or  a  single-factor  apportionment  formula 
based  only  on  sales  (which  is  increasingly  popular  among  the  states),  in-state  busi-

intent  and  the  provisions  of  the  Manager’s  amendment  and  as  a  result  threatens  to  seriously 
harm the credibility of state governments before Congress and the Administration.’’ 

34 United States Model Income Tax Convention of September 20, 1996, Art. 5. 
35 See  Are  The  Current  Treaty  Rules  For  Taxing  Business  Profits  Appropriate  For  E-Com-
merce?, Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, Technical Advisory Group on 
Monitoring  the  Application  of  Existing  Treaty  Norms  For  Taxing  Business  Profits,  Public  Dis-
cussion Draft (Nov. 26, 2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

nesses  enjoy  a  significant  benefit  over  businesses  that  have  little  or  no  property  or 
payroll in the state but that do have sales that are apportionable to the taxing state. 
When  combined  with  the  economic  nexus  standard,  states  would  actually  be  sub-
sidizing  such  incentives  for  in-state  businesses  at  the  expense  of  out-of-state  busi-
nesses  that  do  not  receive  the  benefits  and  protections  provided  by  the  state.  Not 
only does this offend the basic principle of nondiscrimination that is required by the 
Commerce Clause of the U.S. Constitution,36 but, in addition, it surely is misguided 
tax policy to make one party that is not really ‘‘in’’ the jurisdiction bear the tax bur-
den of those persons who actually receive the benefits and protections of the govern-
ment services that the taxes are funding. 
Effect on American Job Retention and Growth 

The U.S. economy has been making gains in the overall level of growth, with low 
inflation,  home  ownership  at  record  levels,  and  household  consumption  expanding. 
These  economic  gains  have  been  due  in  large  part  to  the  ongoing  expansion  in  the 
productivity  of  U.S.  workers  and  businesses.  While  productivity  gains  are  unques-
tionably a good thing for the U.S. economy, the flip side is that U.S. businesses have 
proven  capable  of  increasing  output  without  expanding  employment  at  the  same 
rate  as  seen  in  most  past  recoveries.  Therefore,  responsible  Federal  policymakers 
need to identify and rectify potential barriers to new job creation in America to en-
sure  that  our  economic  expansion  creates  the  largest  number  of  high-quality  jobs. 
The  current  level  of  uncertainty  and  ambiguity  in  the  application  of  state-level 
taxes  on  U.S.-based  businesses  impedes  new  job  creation.  Businesses  operating  in 
the U.S. must deal with the ambiguity in the current nexus rules that govern when 
states  have  the  right  to  impose  direct  taxes  on  businesses.  Rather  than  a  clear  set 
of Federal rules regarding when a business is subject to state taxes, the current en-
vironment is governed largely by the level of aggressiveness of state tax administra-
tors  and  ongoing  litigation.  As  noted  earlier,  state  tax  officials  have  increasingly 
pushed the envelope in an effort to raise revenues from out-of-state enterprises. The 
uncertainty  will  only  increase  as  states  continue  to  assert  jurisdiction  over  out-of- 
state businesses based on ‘‘economic nexus’’ principles. 

It  is  noteworthy  that  this  uncertainty  is  borne  chiefly  by  businesses  based  in  the 
United States. Investing in the creation of new plants, equipment, and jobs in other 
countries  is  actually  encouraged  by  the  ambiguity  in  nexus  standards  and  the  ag-
gressiveness  of  state  tax  officials.  When  combined  with  the  effect  of  bilateral  tax 
treaties and the difficulty of collecting state-level taxes from foreign enterprises, the 
uncertainty  and  ambiguity  of  state  taxation  has  become  another  incentive  that  un-
necessarily promotes new investment and job creation abroad. 

Foreign  business  enterprises  are  often  shocked  to  learn  that  while  treaties  may 
insulate them from Federal taxation, state taxation may potentially still be imposed. 
This  factor,  when  combined  with  the  ambiguity  of  current  state  tax  nexus  law  and 
the aggressiveness of state tax administrators, has put a real damper on foreign in-
vestment.  Even  when  a  foreign  business  initially  considers  opening  an  active  busi-
ness in the United States and paying Federal tax and state tax where it locates its 
property and employees, the specter of having to pay tax to every jurisdiction where 
it  merely  has  customers  is  daunting.  Addressing  the  problems  of  state  tax  uncer-
tainty  and  the  risk  of  litigation  costs  clearly  has  the  potential  to  encourage  addi-
tional  foreign  investment  in  the  U.S.,  thus  creating  new  jobs  throughout  the  coun-
try. 

By  providing  a  bright  line,  quantifiable  physical  presence  standard,  BATSA-type 
legislation  addresses  the  current  level  of  uncertainty  in  the  nexus  rules  that  apply 
to  direct  business  taxes  by  lowering  litigation  expenses  for  companies  that  operate 
facilities  in  the  United  States  and  by  reducing  the  likelihood  that  they  will  be  tar-
geted  by  out-of-state  tax  authorities  bent  on  raising  revenues  from  businesses  that 
do  not  have  a  presence  in  their  state.  BATSA-type  legislation,  while  certainly  not 
an  answer  to  all  the  questions  related  to  encouraging  new  job  creation  in  America, 
will encourage businesses, whether based in America or overseas, to put new invest-
ment and create new jobs here in America rather than in another country. 
Conclusion 

The physical presence nexus standard provides a clear test that is consistent with 
the principles of current law and sound tax policy 37 and that is consistent with Pub-

36 See,  e.g.,  Northwestern  States  Portland  Cement  Co.  v.  Minnesota,  358  U.S.  450  (1959)  and 

Armco, Inc. v. Hardesty, 467 U.S. 638 (1984). 

37 Richard  Pomp,  who  testified  as  a  tax  policy  expert  on  behalf  of  the  taxpayer  in  Lanco  Inc. 
v. Director, Div. of Tax’n, N.J. Tax Ct., No. 005329–97 (Oct. 23, 2003), articulated ‘‘six principles 
of  tax  policy  . . .  as  representing  the  values  inherent  in  the  commerce  clause:  desirability  of 
a clear or ‘bright-line’ test, consistency with settled expectations, reduction of litigation and pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

lic  Law  86–272,  a  time-tested  and  valid  Congressional  policy.  Physical  presence  is 
an  accepted  standard  for  determining  nexus.38 And  a  physical  presence  test  for 
nexus  is  consistent  with  the  established  principle  that  a  tax  should  not  be  imposed 
by a state unless that state provides benefits or protections to the taxpayer. 

What  the  entire  nexus  issue  boils  down  to  is  fairness.  The  BATSA-type  legisla-
tion’s bright-line physical presence nexus standard provides the most fair and equi-
table  standard.  This  is  true  primarily  for  two  reasons.  One,  businesses  have  a  rea-
sonable expectation of taxation only when they are the recipients of the benefits and 
protections  provided  by  the  taxing  jurisdiction.  Two,  a  physical  presence  standard 
protects  in-state  businesses  from  ‘‘foreign  tax’’  imposed  by  jurisdictions  solely  be-
cause  of  the  business  having  customers  located  in  the  taxing  jurisdiction.  By  pro-
viding clarity, the physical presence standard removes an impediment to investment 
in the United States. For these reasons, the bill would benefit both U.S. businesses 
and consumers and, thus, the U.S. economy as a whole. 

These comments only scratch the surface of why a physical presence nexus stand-
ard for business activity taxes and modernization of Public Law 86–272 is the right 
answer and why BATSA-type legislation should therefore be enacted. But it is clear 
that BATSA-type legislation warrants the full and enthusiastic support of the Com-
mittee.  Its  enactment  will  ensure  that  the  U.S.  business  community,  and  thus  the 
U.S. economy, are not unduly burdened by unfair attempts at taxation without rep-
resentation.  BATSA-type  legislation  will  not  cause  any  dislocations  in  any  state’s 
revenue sources. CRAFT would be pleased to expand on any of the matters set forth 
above. 

COMBINED RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON.  DANIEL K. 
INOUYE,  HON.  BYRON L.  DORGAN,  AND HON.  FRANK R.  LAUTENBERG TO 
DR. JAMES R. WHITE 
Question  1  from  Senator  Inouye  and  Senator  Dorgan.  Definition  of  Internet  Ac-
cess.  Under  Section  1105(5)  of  Internet  Tax  Freedom  Act  (ITFA),  Internet  access 
means: 

A  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  information,  electronic  mail,  or 
other  services  offered  over  the  Internet  and  may  also  include  access  to  proprietary 
content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of  a  package  of  services  offered  to 
users.  Such  term  does  not  include  telecommunications  services  except  to  the  extent 
such services are purchased, used, or sold by a provider of Internet access to provide 
Internet access.’’ (Emphasis added) 

Under  current  law,  what  is  the  dividing  line  that  determines  what  services  fall 
within the definition of Internet access and what services fall outside the definition 
of Internet access? What should or should not be included in the definition of Inter-
net access? 

Answer.  As  shown  in  the  simplified  illustration  in  figure  1,  the  items  reasonably 
bundled  in  a  tax-exempt  Internet  access  package  may  include  e-mail,  instant  mes-
saging, and Internet access itself. Internet access, in turn, includes broadband serv-
ices, such as cable modem and digital subscriber line (DSL) services, which provide 
continuous, high-speed access without tying up wireline telephone service. As figure 
1  also  illustrates,  a  tax-exempt  bundle  does  not  include  video,  traditional  wireline 
telephone  service  referred  to  as  ‘‘plain  old  telephone  service’’  (POTS),  or  Voice  over 
Internet  Protocol  (VoIP).  These  services  are  subject  to  tax.  For  simplicity,  figure  1 
shows  a  number  of  services  transmitted  over  one  communications  line.  In  reality, 
a line to a consumer may support just one service at a time, as is typically the case 
for POTS, or it may simultaneously support a variety of services, such as television, 
Internet access, and VoIP. 

motion  of  interstate  investment,  non-discriminatory  treatment  of  the  service  sector,  avoidance 
of multiple taxation, and efficiency of administration.’’ Lanco Inc. v. Director, Div. of Tax’n, N.J. 
Tax Ct., No. 005329–97 at 15–16 (Oct. 23, 2003). Professor Pomp concluded that a physical pres-
ence  standard  better  advanced  these  principles  than  a  standard  based  on  economic  nexus  prin-
ciples. Id. at 16. 

38 See,  e.g.,  Quill  Corp.  v.  North  Dakota,  504  U.S.  298  (1992)  and  National  Bellas  Hess,  Inc. 

v. Department of Revenue, 386 U.S. 753 (1967). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

Question  2  from  Senator  Inouye  and  Question  from  Senator  Lautenberg.  Should 
the  moratorium  cover  services  provided  over  the  Internet  like  music  and  movie 
downloads or even Internet Protocol television if they are bundled with the provision 
of Internet access? The GAO found that, to be tax-exempt, services ‘‘must be reason-
ably  related  to  accessing  and  using  the  Internet,  including  electronic  services  that 
are  customarily  furnished  by  providers.’’  Under  this  interpretation,  would  services 
such  as  movie  and  music  downloads  be  taxable  even  if  they  were  bundled  with 
Internet access? 

Answer.  Our  interpretation  is  that  there  must  be  a  reasonable  nexus  between 
what  the  moratorium  protects  and  the  service  of  providing  Internet  access.  Under 
our  interpretation,  any  relationship  between,  e.g.,  Internet  sales  by  on-line  music, 
movie, and television providers and the service of providing Internet access, is sim-
ply too remote to exempt such sales from taxation. The providers are selling music, 
movies,  and  television—even  if  the  music,  movies,  and  television  are  on-line  music, 
movies, and television that can be downloaded. It is the music, movies, or television, 
not access, which is the subject matter of the business transaction. 

Question 3 from Senator Inouye. Would it be possible to craft a more transparent 
rule  that  relies  more  on  an  objective  test  and  less  on  the  discretion  of  how  a  pro-
vider bundles its services? 

Answer.  We  believe  that  concerns  regarding  the  scope  of  the  statute  could  be  ad-
dressed  legislatively  if  it  were  amended  to  clearly  define  access  in  terms  of 
connectivity  to  the  Internet  and  if  Congress  then  spelled  out  what,  if  any,  services 
it  wishes  to  allow  to  be  treated  as  tax  exempt  when  bundled  with  access.  The  con-
cerns  raised  stem  from  the  phrase  ‘‘package  of  services  offered  to  users’’  which  was 
included in the current statutory language but which suggests to some that the stat-
ute is completely open-ended. 

Question 4 from Senator Inouye and Question 2 from Senator Dorgan. Is there any 
hard  evidence,  perhaps  from  states  that  were  grandfathered  from  the  initial  1998 
Act,  linking  the  effect  of  the  moratorium  on  broadband  penetration?  For  example, 
since  adoption  of  the  initial  moratorium  in  1998,  Hawaii,  among  other  states,  has 
been allowed to apply its sales tax to Internet access services. But despite that fact, 
reports  on  broadband  penetration  show  that  Hawaii  ranks  either  first  or  second 
among  the  states  in  residential  broadband  penetration.  Is  there  any  correlation  be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
Q
O
A
G
3
2
5

81 

tween  the  moratorium  and  higher  broadband  penetration?  Is  Internet  access  really 
tax sensitive? 

Answer. In a May 2006 report, we used two econometric models to assess the fac-
tors—including  taxation—influencing  the  deployment  and  adoption  of  broadband 
service.1 In the case of deployment, we did not find that taxation of Internet access 
by  state  governments  influenced  the  deployment  of  broadband  service.  We  also  did 
not find that taxation of Internet access influenced the adoption of broadband serv-
ice,  although  this  finding  was  less  clear-cut  than  in  the  case  of  broadband  deploy-
ment.2 

Question 3 from Senator Dorgan. Two of our witnesses provided us with principles 
by which we can approach this issue of taxation. They suggested that we be flexible 
and that we do no harm. Bearing this in mind please respond to the following ques-
tions.  What  is  the  need  to  make  this  moratorium  permanent?  With  technology 
changing so rapidly, would it not be better to maintain a flexible, temporary solution 
that allows for periodic review? 

Answer.  Whether  the  moratorium  should  be  permanent  or  temporary  is  a  policy 
judgment  to  be  made  after  considering  concerns  about  affecting  the  Internet’s 
growth and electronic commerce and about the need for state and local revenue. 

Question  4  from  Senator  Dorgan.  How  would  our  states  be  harmed  were  we  to 
get  rid  of  the  Grandfather  Clause  that  protects  those  taxes  in  place  prior  to  1998? 
How would our states be harmed if we keep this clause in place? 

Answer.  The  revenue  impact  of  eliminating  grandfathering  in  states  studied  by 
the Congressional Budget Office and by us would be small. Because of state-by-state 
differences  and  uncertainties,  the  impact  of  future  changes  related  to  the  morato-
rium would vary by state. Whether the moratorium were lifted or made permanent 
and whether grandfathering were continued or eliminated, states would be affected 
differently from each other. 

Question  5  from  Senator  Dorgan.  Does  a  temporary  solution  really  affect  invest-

Answer. It is hard to know how, if at all, broadband deployment would have been 
affected if there had been no moratorium, if the moratorium had been made perma-
nent,  or  if  grandfathering  had  been  eliminated.  We  drew  this  kind  of  conclusion  in 
our  May  23,  2007,  testimony  when  we  commented  on  what  might  have  happened 
in the absence of a moratorium.3 Given that some states never taxed access services 
while  relatively  few  Internet  connections  existed,  that  some  stopped  taxing  access 
services, and that others taxed DSL service, it was unclear to us what jurisdictions 
would have done if no moratorium had existed. 

Questions  6  and  7  from  Senator  Dorgan.  Should  state  and  local  governments  be 
able  to  require  large  remote  sellers  to  collect  the  sales  tax  on  a  remote  sale  after 
state  and  local  sales  tax  systems  are  dramatically  simplified?  Have  state  and  local 
sales  tax  collection  systems  been  simplified  today  such  that  state  governments 
should be permitted to require large remote sellers to collect sales taxes? 

Answer.  Whether  state  and  local  governments  should  be  able  to  require  large  re-

mote sellers to collect sales tax on remote sales is a policy judgment. 

As we reported in June 2000, states require that out-of-state remote sellers collect 
a use tax on the sale of goods and services if the sellers have a substantial presence, 
or nexus, with the state.4 The use tax, which complements the sales tax, is imposed 
on  the  purchaser  for  the  privilege  of  use,  ownership,  or  possession  of  taxable  goods 
and  services.  If  the  out-of-state  remote  seller  does  not  collect  the  use  tax,  the  pur-
chaser is required to remit the tax. 

While  reliable  national  estimates  of  sales  tax  compliance  did  not  exist,  we  re-
ported that state officials and other observers believed that compliance was highest 
for  in-store  sales,  next  highest  for  remote  sales  with  nexus,  and  lowest  for  remote 
sales without nexus. To the extent that continued growth in the volume of Internet 

ment? 

1 GAO,  Telecommunications:  Broadband  Deployment  Is  Extensive  throughout  the  United 
States, but It Is Difficult to Assess the Extent of Deployment Gaps in Rural Areas, GAO–06–426 
(Washington, D.C.: May 5, 2006). 

2 We  did  not  find  that  taxation  of  Internet  access  influenced  adoption  of  broadband  service 
at the 5-percent level of significance. If we assume a 10-percent level of significance, we did find 
that Internet access influenced adoption of broadband service. However, given the nature of our 
model,  it  is  unclear  whether  this  finding  is  related  to  the  tax  or  other  characteristics  of  the 
states in which households resided. 

3 GAO,  Internet  Access  Tax  Moratorium:  Revenue  Impacts  Will  Vary  by  State,  GAO–07–896T 

(Washington, D.C.: May 23, 2007). 

4 GAO, Sales Taxes: Electronic Commerce Growth Presents Challenges; Revenue Losses Are Un-

certain, GAO/GGD/OCE–00–165 (Washington, D.C.: June 30, 2000). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

sales  occurred,  it  increased  remote  sales  where  compliance  was  already  most  prob-
lematic. 

We concluded that with better data about the determinants of the tax loss associ-
ated  with  Internet  sales,  policymakers  would  be  better  positioned  to  confront  the 
challenges confronted by e-commerce to sales and use tax administration. Such data 
could  provide  more  of  a  basis  for  evaluating  alternative  policy  choices.  We  also 
pointed  out,  however,  that  understanding  the  limits  of  data  in  an  environment  as 
dynamic  as  the  Internet  is  important.  Even  with  improved  data,  policymaking  re-
garding Internet sales will be done in an environment of significant uncertainty. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR TO 

DR. JAMES R. WHITE 

Question. As you mention in your testimony, the GAO recently published a report 
that  examined  issues  relating  to  the  deployment  of  broadband  services,  with  a  par-
ticular  emphasis  on  the  deployment  of  broadband  in  rural  areas.  This  is  an  issue 
that is very important to Minnesota. Can you provide more information about GAO’s 
findings  in  this  report?  What  did  you  find  were  the  factors  affecting  deployment  of 
broadband in rural areas? Did you find the moratorium affected deployment? 

Answer. A variety of market and technical factors, government efforts, and access 
to  resources  at  the  local  level  have  influenced  the  deployment  of  broadband  infra-
structure.  Areas  with  low  population  density  and  rugged  terrain,  as  well  as  areas 
removed  from  cities,  are  generally  more  costly  to  serve  than  are  densely  populated 
areas  and  areas  with  flat  terrain.  As  such,  deployment  tends  to  be  less  developed 
in more rural parts of the country. Technical factors can also affect deployment. For 
example, DSL can generally extend only 3 miles from the central office with a tele-
phone  company’s  copper  plant,  which  precludes  many  households  from  obtaining 
DSL service. GAO also found that a variety of Federal and state efforts, and access 
to  resources  at  the  local  level,  have  influenced  the  deployment  of  broadband  infra-
structure.  As  mentioned  earlier,  the  imposition  of  taxes  was  not  a  statistically  sig-
nificant factor influencing the deployment of broadband.5 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HARLEY T. DUNCAN 

Question  1.  Definition  of  Internet  Access.  Under  Section  1105(5)  of  Internet  Tax 

Freedom Act (ITFA), Internet access means: 

A  service  that  enables  users  to  access  content,  information,  electronic  mail,  or 
other  services  offered  over  the  Internet  and  may  also  include  access  to  proprietary 
content,  information,  and  other  services  as  part  of  a  package  of  services  offered  to 
users.  Such  term  does  not  include  telecommunications  services  except  to  the  extent 
such services are purchased, used, or sold by a provider of Internet access to provide 
Internet access. (Emphasis added) 

Under  current  law,  what  is  the  dividing  line  that  determines  what  services  fall 
within the definition of Internet access and what services fall outside the definition 
of Internet access? 

Answer. Under current law, the dividing line between what constitutes access and 
what does not is extremely murky. All that can be said with certainty is that certain 
telecommunications  services  that  are  not  included  in  access  are  excluded.  Other-
wise, the language is sufficiently broad, in our estimation, to allow any ‘‘content, in-
formation  [or]  service’’  that  is  delivered  over  the  Internet  to  be  considered  as  part 
of a package of Internet access. 

Question  2.  Should  the  moratorium  cover  services  provided  over  the  Internet  like 
music and movie downloads or even Internet Protocol television if they are bundled 
with the provision of Internet access? 

Answer. The moratorium should not cover services or products that are delivered 
over  the  Internet.  To  do  so  would  significantly  erode  state  revenue  bases,  discrimi-
nate  against  sellers  of  similar  or  equivalent  products  and  services  that  were  tan-
gible,  and  set  Internet  content  providers  in  a  preferred  position  outside  state  and 
local  tax  codes.  We  believe  the  moratorium  should  be  limited  to  those  services  nec-
essary to traverse and navigate the Internet (as well as services incidental thereto), 
but not include content received through the Internet. 

Question 3. Would it be possible to craft a more transparent rule that relies more 
on an objective test and less on the discretion of how a provider bundles its services? 

5 GAO–06–426. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

Answer. We believe it is. As I noted in my testimony, we have been and will con-
tinue to work with representatives of the Internet access provider community to de-
velop  such  a  definition.  We  would  plan  to  share  it  with  the  Committee  when  we 
complete that process. 

Question  4.  Is  there  any  hard  evidence,  perhaps  from  states  that  were  grand-
fathered  from  the  initial  1998  Act,  linking  the  effect  of  the  moratorium  on 
broadband  penetration?  For  example,  since  adoption  of  the  initial  moratorium  in 
1998,  Hawaii,  among  other  states,  has  been  allowed  to  apply  its  sales  tax  to  Inter-
net  access  services.  But  despite  that  fact,  reports  on  broadband  penetration  show 
that  Hawaii  ranks  either  first  or  second  among  the  states  in  residential  broadband 
penetration. Is there any correlation between the moratorium and higher broadband 
penetration? 

Answer. I am aware of no evidence that suggests that taxation of Internet access 
reduces  the  adoption  of  broadband  by  consumers  or  provision  of  broadband  by  sup-
pliers. In my testimony, I cited two studies 1 that came to this conclusion. Much the 
same  as  Hawaii,  New  Hampshire  taxes  Internet  access  (at  a  7  percent  rate),  and 
it  also  has  among  the  highest  level  of  broadband  adoption  in  the  country.  Finally, 
a  recent  study  by  the  Center  on  Budget  and  Policy  Priorities 2 finds  that  Internet 
access is subject to taxation in each of the 15 countries worldwide in which the level 
of  broadband  adoption  exceeds  that  of  the  U.S.  I  think  the  evidence  is  rather  con-
vincing  that  taxation  of  Internet  access  (under  the  range  of  taxes  imposed  by  the 
states) does not impede broadband adoption. 

Question  5.  Could  you  describe  the  current  disparity  that  exists  between  the  tax 
treatment of goods sold at ‘‘brick and mortar’’ stores and the tax treatment of goods 
sold online? 

Answer.  The  U.S.  Supreme  Court  has  held  that  a  state  may  not  require  a  seller 
that does not have a physical presence (facilities, employees, representatives) in the 
state  to  collect  sales  tax  on  goods  and  services  sold  into  the  state.  Therefore,  if  an 
online seller has no physical presence in a state, any goods or services sold into the 
state  have  no  tax  applied  to  them.  The  brick  and  mortar  seller,  on  the  other  hand, 
must apply tax which automatically creates a price disadvantage (other things being 
equal) for the brick and mortar seller. 

Question 5a. How would online companies deal with the administrative burden of 

different tax rules in different states? 

Answer.  There  is  no  doubt  that  collection  of  taxes  on  a  multistate  basis  can  be 
difficult. That is why the states have worked with the retail community through the 
Streamlined  Sales  Tax  Project  to  simplify  the  tax  collection  responsibilities.  Gen-
erally, the project has used several strategies to reduce the burden of collecting tax: 
(a) simplifying many provisions of law (e.g., adopting a uniform tax return); (b) sig-
nificantly  greater  uniformity  in  provisions  across  states  (e.g.,  uniform  definitions  of 
certain  items  like  food  or  telecommunications);  (c)  having  the  state  assume  greater 
responsibilities  to  assist  sellers  (e.g.,  requiring  states  to  maintain  databases  that 
provide the right tax rate for any address and holding the seller harmless from any 
action  of  their  use  of  the  data  provided  by  the  state;  and  (d)  promoting  greater  use 
of  technology  in  administering  sales  taxes  (e.g.,  certifying  certain  compliance  soft-
ware  providers  and  saying  if  you  use  these  providers,  you  (the  seller)  will  be  held 
harmless on audit. Finally, we believe there should be a de minimus provision that 
excludes sellers with less than some moderate level of sales from collecting in those 
states  in  which  they  do  not  have  a  physical  presence.  The  combination  of  these 
types  of  simplifications,  we  believe,  reduces  significantly  the  burden  of  tax  collec-
tion. 

Question  5b.  What  steps  are  needed  to  equalize  the  tax  treatment  of  online  and 

offline sales? 

Answer. What is required is for Congress to enact legislation that would authorize 
states to require remote sellers (those without a physical presence in a state) to col-
lect  tax  and  to  set  forth  the  conditions  under  which  this  grant  of  authority  may  be 

1 Government  Accountability  Office,  ‘‘Telecommunications—Broadband  Deployment  is  Exten-
sive  throughout  the  United  States,  but  It  Is  Difficult  to  Assess  the  Extent  of  Deployment  Gaps 
in Rural Areas’’ (GAO–06–426). In the GAO study, the term ‘‘deployment’’ refers to the offering 
of  broadband  services  by  various  types  of  providers  and  the  term  ‘‘adoption’’  refers  to  the  use 
of broadband services by consumers. See also Donald Bruce, John Deskins and William F. Fox, 
‘‘Has Internet Access Taxation Affected Internet Use,’’ State Tax Notes, May 17, 2004, pp. 519– 
526. 

2 Michael Maerov, ‘‘Making the ‘‘Internet Tax Freedom Act’’ Permanent Could Lead To A Sub-
stantial Revenue Loss for States and Localities,’’ Center on Budget and Policy Priorities, Wash-
ington, D.C., July 11, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

exercised.  We  believe  S.  34  by  Senator  Enzi  provides  an  appropriate  set  of  condi-
tions. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON DORGAN TO 

HARLEY T. DUNCAN 

Question 1. Two of our witnesses provided us with principles by which we can ap-
proach this issue of taxation. They suggested that we be flexible and that we do no 
harm.  Bearing  this  in  mind  please  respond  to  the  following  questions.  What  is  the 
need  to  make  this  moratorium  permanent?  With  technology  changing  so  rapidly, 
would it not be better to maintain a flexible, temporary solution that allows for peri-
odic review? 

Answer. FTA does not believe the moratorium should be made permanent. As you 
note,  the  pace  of  technological  change  would  seem  to  make  it  imperative  that  Con-
gress put in place a mechanism for periodic review of the impact of the moratorium. 
In  addition,  Congress  is  the  only  overseer  of  this  legislation;  there  is  no  Executive 
Branch  agency  with  responsibility  for  rulemaking  or  oversight.  Congress  needs  to 
review the impact of the moratorium periodically. 

Question  1a.  How  would  our  states  be  harmed  were  we  to  get  rid  of  the  Grand-
father Clause that protects those taxes in place prior to 1998? How would our states 
be harmed if we keep this clause in place? 

Answer. Repealing the 1998 Grandfather Clause would have two impacts: (1) The 
nine states that currently impose their sales or other receipts-based tax on charges 
for Internet access would be prohibited from doing so. We estimate the revenue im-
pact  of  the  bill  to  be  in  the  $150  million  per  year  range.  (2)  There  are  also  other 
taxes,  most  commonly  general  purpose  business  taxes  (e.g.,  the  Washington  State 
Business and Occupation Tax, unemployment taxes) that are not excluded from the 
definition  of  a  ‘‘tax  on  Internet  access,’’  but  are  protected  by  the  1998  Grandfather 
that  could  be  challenged  as  being  a  prohibited  tax  on  Internet  access.  The  current 
definition  of  a  ‘‘tax  on  Internet  access’’  says  it  includes  a  tax  on  the  service  itself 
as  well  as  a  tax  on  Internet  service  providers  unless  it  is  a  net  income,  net  worth, 
property, or franchise tax. 

Question  1b.  What  should  or  should  not  be  included  in  the  definition  of  Internet 

access? 

Answer.  We  believe  that  Internet  access  should  be  defined  to  include  those  serv-
ices  necessary  to  connect  to  and  to  traverse  and  navigate  the  Internet  (as  well  as 
services  incidental  thereto),  but  not  include  content  received  through  the  Internet. 
The  moratorium  should  not  cover  services  or  products  that  are  delivered  over  the 
Internet.  To  do  so  would  significantly  erode  state  revenue  bases,  discriminate 
against sellers of similar or equivalent products and services that were tangible, and 
set  Internet  content  providers  in  a  preferred  position  outside  state  and  local  tax 
codes. 

Question 1c. Does a temporary solution really affect investment? 
Answer. In my testimony, I cited two studies (see answer elsewhere) showing that 
taxation of Internet access has no statistically significant impact on whether compa-
nies  invest  in  providers  of  broadband  services.  It  is,  therefore,  difficult  to  believe 
that  a  temporary  moratorium  will  affect  investment.  The  demand  for  broadband 
services is going to be driven by the types of services, products and content available 
and  other  communication  requirements,  and  not  whether  Congress  has  only  a  tem-
porary moratorium in place. 

Question 1d. Is Internet access really tax sensitive? 
Answer. I am aware of no evidence that suggests that taxation of Internet access 
reduces  the  adoption  of  broadband  by  consumers  or  provision  of  broadband  by  sup-
pliers. In my testimony, I cited two studies 3 that came to this conclusion. Much the 
same  as  Hawaii,  New  Hampshire  taxes  Internet  access  (at  a  7  percent  rate),  and 
it  also  has  among  the  highest  level  of  broadband  adoption  in  the  country.  Finally, 

3 Government  Accountability  Office,  ‘‘Telecommunications—Broadband  Deployment  is  Exten-
sive  throughout  the  United  States,  but  It  Is  Difficult  to  Assess  the  Extent  of  Deployment  Gaps 
in Rural Areas’’ (GAO–06–426). In the GAO study, the term ‘‘deployment’’ refers to the offering 
of  broadband  services  by  various  types  of  providers  and  the  term  ‘‘adoption’’  refers  to  the  use 
of broadband services by consumers. See also Donald Bruce, John Deskins and William F. Fox, 
‘‘Has Internet Access Taxation Affected Internet Use,’’ State Tax Notes, May 17, 2004, pp. 519– 
526. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

a  recent  study  by  the  Center  on  Budget  and  Policy  Priorities 4 finds  that  Internet 
access is subject to taxation in each of the 15 countries worldwide in which the level 
of  broadband  adoption  exceeds  that  of  the  U.S.  I  think  the  evidence  is  rather  con-
vincing  that  taxation  of  Internet  access  (under  the  range  of  taxes  imposed  by  the 
states) does not impeded broadband adoption. 

Question  1e.  Should  state  and  local  governments  be  able  to  require  large  remote 
sellers  to  collect  the  sales  tax  on  a  remote  sale  after  state  and  local  sales  tax  sys-
tems are dramatically simplified? 

Answer.  FTA  supports  the  adoption  of  Federal  legislation  that  would  authorize 
those  states  that  have  simplified  their  sales  to  require  remote  sellers  to  collect  tax 
on  goods  and  services  sold  into  the  state.  If  such  legislation  is  not  passed,  states 
sales  tax  bases  will  continue  to  suffer  erosion  from  untaxed  remote  sales.  In  addi-
tion, those sellers that are required to collect tax will continue to face a unfair com-
petitive  disadvantage.  It  would  be  appropriate  in  any  such  legislation  to  have  a  de 
minimus  threshold  that  would  provide  that  sellers  with  national  sales  below  some 
level  would  not  be  required  to  collect  tax  in  states  in  which  they  have  no  physical 
presence. 

Question 1f. Have state and local sale tax collection systems been simplified today 
such  that  state  governments  should  be  permitted  to  require  large  remote  sellers  to 
collect sales taxes? 

Answer.  FTA  believes  the  simplifications  that  are  contained  in  the  Streamlined 
Sales  and  Use  Tax  Agreement  contain  sufficient  simplifications  such  that  states 
should  be  authorized  to  require  certain  remote  sellers  to  collect  tax  on  goods  and 
services sold into a state. The project has used several strategies to reduce the bur-
den of collecting tax: (a) simplifying many provisions of law (e.g., adopting a uniform 
tax return); (b) significantly greater uniformity in provisions across states (e.g., uni-
form  definitions  of  certain  items  like  food  or  telecommunications);  (c)  having  the 
state assume greater responsibilities to assist sellers (e.g., requiring states to main-
tain databases that provide the right tax rate for any address and holding the seller 
harmless from any action of their use of the data provided by the state; and (d) pro-
moting greater use of technology in administering sales taxes (e.g., certifying certain 
compliance software providers and saying if you use these providers, you (the seller) 
will  be  held  harmless  on  audit.  Finally,  we  believe  there  should  be  a  de  minimus 
provision that excludes sellers with less than some moderate level of sales from col-
lecting in those states in which they do not have a physical presence. The combina-
tion  of  these  types  of  simplifications,  we  believe,  reduces  significantly  the  burden 
of tax collection. 

Question 2. How would you assess the impact of the grandfather clause of the cur-
rent  Moratorium?  Is  it  true  that  all  states  get  some  type  of  protection  from  the 
grandfather clause? 

Answer.  The  current  grandfather  clause  serves  two  purposes:  (1)  It  allows  nine 
states  that  imposed  a  tax  on  charges  to  consumers  for  Internet  access  in  1998  to 
continue  to  impose  and  collect  those  taxes.  (2)  It  also  allows  states  to  continue  to 
impose  certain  general  business  taxes  that  would  qualify  as  a  ‘‘tax  on  Internet  ac-
cess’’  under  the  definition  in  the  Act.  Such  taxes  would  include  unemployment  in-
surance taxes, the Washington State Business and Occupation Tax, as well as some 
local general purpose business taxes that are based on gross receipts. 

Question  2a.  Please  describe  the  range  of  taxes  that  may  be  protected  by  the 
clause? Can you give us a state-by-state revenue impact? If not for all states, which 
states can you give us a revenue figure for? 

Answer. As described above, the taxes covered by the Grandfather Clause include 
sales taxes on charges for Internet access in eight states—Hawaii, Texas, Wisconsin, 
Ohio,  New  Mexico,  South  Dakota,  New  Hampshire  and  North  Dakota.  It  also  pro-
tects imposition of the Washington Business and Occupation Tax on Internet service 
providers. We are in the process of gathering information on the revenues protected 
by the Grandfather Clause. 

Question 3. What is the scope of the Streamlining Project? We hear different num-
bers on state participation in the Project. Can you tell me how many states partici-
pate  and  in  what  capacity  they  are  active?  Please  tell  us  what  you  expect  in  the 
future too. 

Answer.  The  Streamlined  Sales  Tax  Project  is  a  multi-year  effort  of  state  and 
local governments working with the retail industry to simplify administration of the 

4 Michael Maerov, ‘‘Making the ‘Internet Tax Freedom Act’ Permanent Could Lead To A Sub-
stantial Revenue Loss for States and Localities,’’ Center on Budget and Policy Priorities, Wash-
ington, D.C., July 11, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

sales  tax,  particularly  for  multistate  sellers.  In  terms  of  participation,  nearly  every 
state  with  a  sales  tax  has  actively  participated  in  the  process  of  formulating  the 
simplification requirements contained in the Streamlined Agreement. As to member-
ship, there are currently 15 ‘‘full Member States’’ meaning that the state has made 
changes to its sales tax law, rules and policies so as to incorporate each of the provi-
sions  of  the  Agreement.  There  are  also  7  ‘‘Associate  Member  States,’’  meaning  that 
the state has incorporated all the provisions of the Agreement into its laws and poli-
cies  but  the  effective  date  of  one  or  more  provision  has  been  delayed  beyond  July 
1,  2007  or  that  the  state  has  incorporated  most  of  the  provisions  of  the  Agreement 
into  its  laws  and  policies  and  is  expected  to  incorporate  the  remaining  ones  by  a 
particular  date.  By  January  1,  2008,  two  of  the  Associate  Member  States  are  ex-
pected  to  be  accepted  as  full  Member  States.  By  July  1,  2008,  two  additional  Asso-
ciate Members should become full Member States. 

Question  4.  Two  of  the  witness  testifying  before  the  Committee  suggested  that 
states  could  collect  use  taxes  directly  from  individual  consumers.  What  steps  are 
being taken now by states to collect use taxes owed by individual consumers? What 
would  be  required  for  states  to  effectively  collect  the  use  tax  from  individual  con-
sumers that owe the tax? 

Answer.  It  is  not  reasonable  to  suggest  that  states  can  collect  the  use  tax  from 
individual  consumers  in  any  cost-effective  or  even-handed  manner.  About  20  states 
have  included  a  line  on  the  state  individual  income  tax  return  that  taxpayers  can 
use  to  report  use  tax  on  purchases  made  over  the  course  of  the  year.  To  effectively 
collect  use  tax  from  individual  consumers  would  require  all  sellers  to  report  all 
untaxed  sales  to  the  state  to  which  the  sale  is  delivered  along  with  the  name  and 
address  of  the  purchaser,  the  identification  of  the  items  being  purchased  and  the 
sale  price  of  the  items.  In  this  manner,  each  state  would  have  the  data  necessary 
to  compute  the  tax  due  and  bill  the  individual  purchaser.  Obviously,  this  approach 
if more costly than collection of the tax at the time of sale. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HARLEY T. DUNCAN 

Question  1.  Do  you  agree  with  the  GAO’s  narrow  interpretation  of  how  ‘‘Internet 

access’’ is defined under current law? 

Answer. We do not agree with the GAO interpretation of the definition of Internet 
access. We believe a court would look to the plain meaning of the words in the stat-
ute.  For  that  reason,  we  do  not  believe  a  court  would  reach  a  determination  that 
only  services  ‘‘reasonably  bundled’’  with  Internet  access  would  be  considered  ex-
empt. 

Question  2.  Are  you  aware  of  any  ‘‘bundling’’  of  services  that  is  avoiding  taxation 
because  of  a  broad  interpretation  of  how  ‘‘Internet  access’’  is  defined  under  current 
law? 

Answer.  We  are  not  aware  of  instances  where  there  has  been  unreasonable  bun-
dling under the current law. We believe this is in part due to the fact that the mora-
torium  is  temporary,  and  Congress  must  periodically  revisit  the  issue  and  the  pro-
priety of the definition. 

Question 3. Is there any empirical evidence of the effects that a permanent mora-

torium would have on state revenues? 

Answer.  If  the  moratorium  is  made  permanent  and  there  is  no  Grandfather 
Clause  protection  for  the  pre–1998  taxes,  state  revenues  would  be  reduced  by  an 
estimated  $150–$200  million  per  year  in  the  eight  states  that  currently  impose  the 
state  sales  tax  on  charges  for  Internet  access  and  Washington  State  with  its  busi-
ness and occupation tax. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR TO 

HARLEY T. DUNCAN 

Question. With respect to the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement, it is my 
understanding  that  business  representatives  from  39  states  worked  with  state  gov-
ernments to achieve the Agreement, yet the level of adoption of this agreement var-
ies  among  states,  with  15  states  acting  as  full  members.  Can  you  provide  more  in-
formation about the varying level of participation among states? What is the impact 
on businesses in states that are fully participating versus businesses in those states 
that are not? 

Answer. In terms of participation, nearly every state with a sales tax has actively 
participated in the process of formulating the simplification requirements contained 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

in the Streamlined Agreement. As to membership, there are currently 15 ‘‘full Mem-
ber States’’ meaning that the state has made changes to its sales tax law, rules and 
policies so as to incorporate each of the provisions of the Agreement. There are also 
7 ‘‘Associate Member States,’’ meaning that the state has incorporated all the provi-
sions  of  the  Agreement  into  its  laws  and  policies  but  the  effective  date  of  one  or 
more  provision  has  been  delayed  beyond  July  1,  2007  or  that  the  state  has  incor-
porated  most  of  the  provisions  of  the  Agreement  into  its  laws  and  policies  and  is 
expected  to  incorporate  the  remaining  ones  by  a  particular  date.  By  January  1, 
2008,  two  of  the  Associate  Member  States  are  expected  to  become  full  Member 
States. By July 1, 2008, two additional Associate Members should become full Mem-
ber States. 

In my estimation, the primary reason more states have not become full Members 
is twofold: (1) Some of the simplifications required for membership have significant 
impacts on a state’s tax policy and structure; and (2) Without Congressional author-
ization  that  would  allow  states  to  require  remote  sellers  to  collect  tax  on  sales  into 
the  state,  some  of  these  states  are  unlikely  to  take  the  steps  necessary  to  become 
Member  States.  In  other  words,  without  the  additional  revenue  that  would  result 
from  requiring  remote  sellers  to  collect,  there  is  little  motivation  for  some  states  to 
undertake the difficult simplifications. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

ANNABELLE CANNING, ESQ. 

Question  1.  Under  current  law,  what  is  the  dividing  line  that  determines  what 
services  fall  within  the  definition  of  Internet  access  and  what  services  fall  outside 
the definition of Internet access? 

Answer.  The  dividing  line  between  what  is  and  is  not  covered  by  this  definition 
is the concept of access. Internet access is, fundamentally, a special type of access— 
nothing more and nothing less. As defined by section 1105(5), Internet access service 
enables  users  to  access  content,  information,  e-mail,  or  other  services  offered  over 
the  Internet.  Even  when  the  content,  information,  or  other  service  being  accessed 
is proprietary, if that service is being accessed over the Internet, section 1105(5) es-
tablishes that the access to such service is Internet access. 

However, while access to content, information, e-mail and other services—whether 
proprietary  or  not—is  within  the  definition  of  Internet  access,  what  is  accessed  is 
not  covered.  Thus,  for  example,  in  the  case  of  a  service  that  permits  a  user  to 
download  music,  the  service  that  permits  the  user  to  establish  a  link  between  the 
user’s computer and the music provider’s computer—that is, to access the provider’s 
computer—is  Internet  access.  But  the  music  file  that  the  user  downloads  from  the 
music  provider’s  computer  to  the  user’s  computer  is  not  ‘‘access’’;  instead,  this  file 
is what is being accessed. 

Some  services  offered  over  the  Internet  consist  of  nothing  more  than  access,  and 
thus  are  completely  covered  by  the  definition  of  Internet  access.  E-mail  is  the  best 
example  of  such  a  service.  However,  even  here,  the  music-file  example  described 
above can be applied to illustrate the distinction between what is and is not covered 
by  the  definition  of  Internet  access:  If  a  service  permits  a  user  to  request  that  a 
music file be transmitted by e-mail, then the e-mail service by which the user trans-
mits an e-mail message to the music provider, and by which the music provider re-
plies,  is  within  the  definition  of  Internet  access.  But  if  the  music  provider  sends  a 
music file back to the requesting user as an e-mail attachment, then that file itself 
is  not  within  the  definition  of  Internet  access;  instead,  the  file  is  what  is  being 
accessed. 

Question  2.  Should  the  moratorium  cover  services  provided  over  the  Internet  like 
music and movie downloads or even Internet Protocol television if they are bundled 
with the provision of Internet access? 

Answer.  Expanding  the  moratorium  to  treat  bundled  services,  such  as  music  and 
movie downloads and Internet Protocol television, as Internet access would be a sub-
stantial  change  from  current  law.  As  described  in  my  answer  to  the  first  question, 
above,  these  bundled  services  are  not  covered  under  the  current  definition  of  Inter-
net  access  because  they  are  not  access  but,  instead,  are  what  is  being  accessed.  In-
deed, under the ‘‘bundling rule’’ of section 1106 that was added in 2004, if a charge 
for  one  of  these  services  is  taxable  under  state  or  local  law,  then  bundling  that 
charge  with  a  charge  for  Internet  access  risks  subjecting  the  entire  bundled  charge 
to tax. 

The moratorium should not be expanded to prohibit states and local governments 
from imposing nondiscriminatory taxes on those services. That is, a state that taxes 
the  purchase  of  a  music  CD  on  Main  Street  should  be  able  to  impose  the  same  tax 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

on music delivered on-line, either as a sales tax if the seller has nexus or, otherwise, 
as a use tax. However, the moratorium currently prohibits—and should continue to 
prohibit—a state from discriminating against electronic commerce by taxing on-line 
music purchases and not taxing a purchase of the same music on a CD. 

Question 3. Would it be possible to craft a more transparent rule that relies more 
on an objective test and less on the discretion of how a provider bundles its services? 
Answer.  While  it  might  be  possible  to  craft  such  a  rule,  there  is  no  need  to  do 
so. I am unaware of any examples of a provider of Internet access using the Internet 
access  definition  to  attempt  to  market  and  sell  otherwise  taxable  services  as  part 
of a bundle that includes Internet access. As stated above, because of the accounting 
rule  provided  by  section  1106,  an  Internet  access  provider  that  attempted  to  do  so 
would put the entire ‘‘bundle’’ at risk of being subject to taxation. Furthermore, be-
cause  a  provider  would  have  failed  to  collect  and  remit  sales  tax  from  its  customer 
on  the  taxable  pieces  of  the  bundle,  it  would  face  the  prospect  of  paying  the  entire 
tax liability as its own cost without the ability to recoup the tax from its customers. 
Given  the  risk  of  creating  additional,  unreimbursed  transaction  tax  costs,  it  is  not 
surprising that I am unaware of any instance of a provider bundling Internet access 
with other taxable services in order to avoid taxation. 

In  addition  to  being  unnecessary,  any  attempt  to  create  a  more  transparent  rule 
may  also  create  additional  problems.  Notwithstanding  Congress’s  clear  intent  that 
the  moratorium  cover  telecommunications  purchased,  used,  or  sold  by  a  provider  of 
Internet access to provide Internet access, some state and local tax authorities have 
moved  aggressively  to  assert  that  such  telecommunications  are  not  covered. 
Changes  intended  to  effect  transparency  could  give  states  additional  opportunities 
to  pursue  these  erroneous  assertions.  Thus,  if  a  more  ‘‘objective’’  test  is  to  be  cre-
ated,  it  should  be  carefully  crafted  to  ensure  that  the  level  playing  field  that  Con-
gress  created  between  ISPs  that  own  their  own  Internet  backbone  and  those  that 
must  purchase  telecommunications  service  from  a  backbone  provider  is  explicitly 
preserved  so  that  states  cannot  impose  hidden  taxes  that  disadvantage  certain 
Internet access providers. 

Question  4.  Is  there  any  hard  evidence,  perhaps  from  states  that  were  grand-
fathered  from  the  initial  1998  Act,  linking  the  effect  of  the  moratorium  on 
broadband  penetration?  For  example,  since  adoption  of  the  initial  moratorium  in 
1998,  Hawaii,  among  other  states,  has  been  allowed  to  apply  its  sales  tax  to  Inter-
net  access  services.  But  despite  that  fact,  reports  on  broadband  penetration  show 
that  Hawaii  ranks  either  first  or  second  among  the  states  in  residential  broadband 
penetration. Is there any correlation between the moratorium and higher broadband 
penetration? 

Answer.  Many  factors  influence  the  rate  of  broadband  penetration  in  the  states, 
including  household  income,  a  state’s  geography,  and  the  presence  or  absence  of 
competing  providers.  For  this  reason,  it  is  very  difficult  to  find  statistically  signifi-
cant  studies  that  can  isolate  the  impact  of  the  moratorium  on  broadband  penetra-
tion. 

Having  said  that,  however,  there  certainly  is  evidence  that  the  presence  or  ab-
sence  of  competition  among  broadband  providers  influences  broadband  penetration 
rates.  This  is  because  competition  results  in  lower  prices  to  consumers,  which  in 
turn  increases  broadband  penetration  as  more  households  decide  that  they  can  af-
ford to purchase broadband Internet access. 

Given  the  evidence  in  elasticity  studies  that  price  is  a  significant  factor  in 
broadband  purchasing  decisions,  I  have  to  believe  that  the  moratorium  plays  a  sig-
nificant  role  in  expanding  broadband  penetration.  Without  the  moratorium,  it  is 
likely  that  many  states  would  conclude  that  broadband  Internet  access  falls  under 
the expansive definition of ‘‘telecommunications service’’ contained in most state tax 
statutes and would commence taxing such services at excessive rates. 

Recent  studies  from  the  Heartland  Institute  and  the  Council  On  State  Taxation 
have  documented  that  telecommunications  services  are,  on  average,  taxed  at  rates 
nearly twice as high as general sales and use taxes. The Heartland study of 51 large 
cities found that the average rate is 13.5 percent, while the COST study tagged the 
rate at 14.2 percent. At current broadband prices, such taxes could add as much as 
$8.00  to  the  monthly  cost  of  broadband  Internet  access.  These  taxes  would  have  a 
measurable  impact  on  broadband  penetration  and  would  hit  low  and  moderate  in-
come households the hardest. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

ANNABELLE CANNING, ESQ. 

89 

Question 1. Two of our witnesses provided us with principles by which we can ap-
proach this issue of taxation. They suggested that we be flexible and that we do no 
harm.  Bearing  this  in  mind  please  respond  to  the  following  questions.  What  is  the 
need  to  make  this  moratorium  permanent?  With  technology  changing  so  rapidly, 
would it not be better to maintain a flexible, temporary solution that allows for peri-
odic review? 

Answer.  One  of  the  most  important  benefits  of  the  moratorium  is  to  expand  the 
availability  and  affordability  of  broadband  Internet  access,  so  that  all  American 
households will have access to the educational and economic benefits of the Internet. 
In  addition  to  keeping  the  cost  of  Internet  access  down  for  American  households, 
the  moratorium  is  also  critical  to  providing  a  stable  investment  climate  for  busi-
nesses that not only provide access to the Internet but also create the applications, 
products, and services that are accessible through the Internet. 

A permanent moratorium will send a very favorable, pro-investment signal to the 
firms that are driving innovation in our economy that states are not going to impose 
excessive and discriminatory taxes on Internet access. In terms of ‘‘doing no harm,’’ 
a  permanent  moratorium  will  do  no  harm  to  consumers  by  preventing  states  and 
localities  from  imposing  taxes  at  excessive  rates  that  slow  the  growth  of  the  Inter-
net. 

A  permanent  moratorium  would  not  prevent  a  future  Congress  from  revisiting 
this issue should it decide that changes need to be made to definitions or other pro-
visions of the moratorium. Therefore, a permanent moratorium preserves Congress’s 
flexibility  to  address  changing  market  conditions,  and  Congressional  oversight  au-
thority provides for periodic review and study of these issues. 

Question  1a.  How  would  our  states  be  harmed  were  we  to  get  rid  of  the  grand-
father cause that protects those taxes in place prior to 1998? How would our states 
be harmed if we keep this clause in place? 

Answer.  The  states  that  continue  to  tax  Internet  access  under  the  1998  Grand-
father Clause have had almost 10 years to prepare for the elimination of the grand-
father  clause.  States  have  enjoyed  large  budget  surpluses  due  to  strong  economic 
growth  over  the  last  5  years—much  of  that  economic  growth  generated  by  strong 
productivity  gains  driven  by  the  communications  and  information  technology  sec-
tors. A recent study by Ovum and Indepen found that almost 80 percent of the pro-
ductivity  growth  in  2004  was  attributable  to  the  communications  and  information 
technology industries. 

The National Conference of State Legislatures reported in February the following 
data about surplus revenues held in FY 2007 by the nine states covered by the 1998 
Grandfather Clause: 

State 

Surplus as % of Gen. fund $ 

Hawaii 
New Hampshire 
New Mexico 
Ohio 
South Dakota 
Texas 
Washington 
Wisconsin 

13.9 
3.8 
8.9 
11.1 
13.5 
17.8 
3.4 
0.1 

The GAO reported that the total revenues in question for the grandfathered states 
are under $120 million, representing a small fraction of each state’s total tax collec-
tions.  Given  the  surpluses  available  in  these  states,  elimination  of  the  grandfather 
clause would not harm the budgets of the grandfathered states. 

access? 

Question  1b.  What  should  or  should  not  be  included  in  the  definition  of  Internet 

Answer. Internet access is, fundamentally, a special type of access—nothing more 
and  nothing  less.  As  defined  by  section  1105(5),  Internet  access  service  enables 
users to access content, information, e-mail, or other services offered over the Inter-
net.  Even  when  the  content,  information,  or  other  service  being  accessed  is  propri-
etary, if that service is being accessed over the Internet, section 1105(5) establishes 
that the access to such service is Internet access. However, while access to content, 
information,  e-mail  and  other  services—whether  proprietary  or  not—is  within  the 
definition of Internet access, what is accessed is not covered. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

There  is  no  apparent  reason  to  change  the  scope  of  the  current  definition.  How-
ever, Congress should ensure that states comply with the intent of the 2004 amend-
ments  that  telecommunications  services  purchased,  used,  or  sold  by  a  provider  of 
Internet  access  to  provide  Internet  access  are  covered  by  the  moratorium.  Notwith-
standing  the  2004  amendments,  some  states  have  aggressively  moved  to  tax  tele-
communications  services  that  are  covered  by  the  definition  of  Internet  access.  If 
Congress  does  not  confirm  the  original  intention  of  the  2004  amendments,  these 
states  will  continue  their  efforts  and  may  be  joined  by  others,  resulting  in  taxes  at 
the wholesale level that would ultimately be borne by consumers through higher ac-
cess prices. 

Question 1c. Does a temporary solution really affect investment? 
Answer. As I said earlier, a permanent moratorium is critical to providing a stable 
investment  climate  for  businesses  that  not  only  provide  access  to  the  Internet  but 
also  create  the  applications,  products,  and  services  that  are  accessible  through  the 
Internet. 

A permanent moratorium will send a very favorable, pro-investment signal to the 
firms that are driving innovation in our economy that states are not going to impose 
excessive and discriminatory taxes on Internet access. In terms of ‘‘doing no harm,’’ 
a permanent moratorium will prevent states and localities from imposing taxes that 
slow growth of the Internet. 

A  permanent  moratorium  would  not  prevent  a  future  Congress  from  revisiting 
this issue should it decide that changes need to be made to definitions or other pro-
visions  of  the  moratorium.  Therefore,  a  permanent  moratorium  does  preserve 
Congress’s  flexibility  to  address  changing  market  conditions,  and  Congressional 
oversight authority provides for periodic review and study of these issues. 

Question 1d. Is Internet access really tax sensitive? 
Answer.  Many  factors  influence  the  rate  of  broadband  penetration  in  the  states, 
including  household  income,  a  state’s  geography,  and  the  presence  or  absence  of 
competing  providers.  For  this  reason,  it  is  very  difficult  to  find  statistically  signifi-
cant  studies  that  can  isolate  the  impact  of  the  moratorium  on  broadband  penetra-
tion. 

Having said that, however, there is evidence that the presence or absence of com-
petition among broadband providers influences broadband penetration rates. This is 
because  competition  results  in  lower  prices  to  consumers,  which  in  turn  increases 
broadband  penetration  as  more  households  decide  that  they  can  afford  to  purchase 
broadband Internet access. 

Given  the  evidence  in  elasticity  studies  that  price  is  a  significant  factor  in 
broadband  purchasing  decisions,  I  have  to  believe  that  the  moratorium  plays  a  sig-
nificant  role  in  expanding  broadband  penetration.  Without  the  moratorium,  it  is 
likely  that  many  states  would  conclude  that  broadband  Internet  access  falls  under 
the expansive definition of ‘‘telecommunications service’’ contained in most state tax 
statutes and would commence taxing such services at excessive rates. 

Recent  studies  from  the  Heartland  Institute  and  the  Council  On  State  Taxation 
have  documented  that  telecommunications  services  are,  on  average,  taxed  at  rates 
nearly twice as high as general sales and use taxes. The Heartland study of 51 large 
cities found that the average rate is 13.5 percent, while the COST study tagged the 
rate at 14.2 percent. At current broadband prices, such taxes could add as much as 
$8.00  to  the  monthly  cost  of  broadband  Internet  access.  These  taxes  would  have  a 
measurable  impact  on  broadband  penetration  and  would  hit  low  and  moderate  in-
come households the hardest. 

Question  1e.  Should  state  and  local  governments  be  able  to  require  large  remote 
sellers  to  collect  the  sales  tax  on  a  remote  sale  after  state  and  local  sales  tax  sys-
tems are dramatically simplified? 

Answer. The so-called Streamlined Sales Tax issue is really a separate issue from 
the extension of the Internet access tax moratorium. I do not believe that the issue 
should be addressed as part of the moratorium debate. With operations and physical 
presence throughout the country, this is not an issue for my company. 

Question 1f. Have state and local sale tax collection systems been simplified today 
such  that  state  governments  should  be  permitted  to  require  large  remote  sellers  to 
collect sales taxes? 

Answer. States and localities have a lot more work to do when it comes to simpli-
fying state and local taxes on telecommunications services. Since the original study 
was  published  in  1999  by  the  (then)  Committee  on  State  Taxation,  a  handful  of 
states (Florida, Illinois, Utah, Virginia) have drastically reduced the administrative 
burden  of  collection  of  telecommunications  taxes  by  centralizing  collection  of  local 
taxes  at  the  state  level.  The  industry  has  sought  to  work  with  states  to  simplify 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

state  and  local  taxes  on  telecommunications  services  in  a  number  of  other  states, 
unfortunately without much success. 

Even  with  those  simplifications,  however,  a  telecommunications  carrier  selling 
service  nationwide  is  still  required  to  file  some  47,921  tax  returns  annually—about 
seven times as many as the 7,501 required for general businesses. 

In  fact,  one  of  the  reasons  why  it  is  critical  to  extend  the  Internet  moratorium 
is  the  very  real  concern  that  without  the  moratorium,  states  would  interpret  their 
statutes  as  imposing  many  of  these  telecommunications  taxes  on  Internet  access. 
This would not only impose a huge new burden on Internet providers, but it would 
also  expose  consumers  to  the  same  types  of  excessive  taxes  that  currently  apply  to 
telecommunications  services.  Currently,  only  17  states  have  specific  statutory  ex-
emptions  for  Internet  access  in  their  statutes,  which  leaves  the  door  open  for  new 
telecommunications taxes in two-thirds of the states. 

Question  2.  I  am  deeply  interested  in  broader  Internet  penetration  across  the 
country.  As  I  said  in  the  hearing,  I  believe  the  Internet  is  crucial  to  our  lives  and 
if  we  work  at  this,  we  can  find  a  reasonable  solution  here.  I  am  concerned  about 
what  would  happen  were  we  to  abolish  the  existing  grandfather  clause.  We  must 
have a clear understanding of the consequences of a permanent moratorium. 

Answer. As I noted above, elimination of the Grandfather Clause would mean that 
the  eight  states  that  continue  to  tax  Internet  access  would  no  longer  be  able  to  do 
so.  These  states  have  had  almost  10  years  to  prepare  for  the  elimination  of  the 
Grandfather  Clause.  My  prior  answer  also  describes  the  budget  surpluses  that  are 
currently available in each of these states, and the relatively minor impact of losing 
taxes on Internet access. Given these factors, elimination of the Grandfather Clause 
would not harm the budgets of the grandfathered states. 

Question  3.  In  your  opinion,  what  taxes  are  covered  by  the  Grandfather  Clause 
for Pre-1998 taxes? If the Grandfather Clause were eliminated under S. 156, which 
state  and  local  taxes  would  be  subject  to  the  moratorium  and  which  would  be  ex-
empt? 

Answer.  The  pre-1998  grandfather  permits  states  that  taxed  Internet  access  at 
the  time  the  law  first  passed  to  continue  imposing  those  taxes.  This  includes  the 
taxation of Internet access under broad gross receipts taxes in Hawaii, New Mexico, 
and  South  Dakota;  taxation  of  certain  types  of  Internet  access  under  New  Hamp-
shire’s communications services tax; sales taxes in Ohio (business only), Texas (first 
$25 exempt; remainder taxable), and Wisconsin; and under the Business and Occu-
pation Tax in Washington. 

If  the  grandfather  clause  were  eliminated,  none  of  the  taxes  identified  above 

would continue to apply to Internet access. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

ANNABELLE CANNING, ESQ. 

Question  1.  Is  there  any  evidence  that  broadband  penetration  is  higher  in  those 

states that exempt Internet access from taxation? 

Answer.  Many  factors  influence  the  rate  of  broadband  penetration  in  the  states, 
including  household  income,  a  state’s  geography,  and  the  presence  or  absence  of 
competing  providers.  For  this  reason,  it  is  very  difficult  to  find  statistically  signifi-
cant  studies  that  can  isolate  the  impact  of  the  moratorium  on  broadband  penetra-
tion. 

Having  said  that,  however,  there  certainly  is  evidence  that  the  presence  or  ab-
sence  of  competition  among  broadband  providers  influences  broadband  penetration 
rates.  This  is  because  competition  results  in  lower  prices  to  consumers,  which  in 
turn  increases  broadband  penetration  as  more  households  decide  that  they  can  af-
ford to purchase broadband Internet access. 

Given  the  evidence  in  elasticity  studies  that  price  is  a  significant  factor  in 
broadband  purchasing  decisions,  I  have  to  believe  that  the  moratorium  plays  a  sig-
nificant  role  in  expanding  broadband  penetration.  Without  the  moratorium,  it  is 
likely  that  many  states  would  conclude  that  broadband  Internet  access  falls  under 
the expansive definition of ‘‘telecommunications service’’ contained in most state tax 
statutes and would commence taxing such services at excessive rates. 

Recent  studies  from  the  Heartland  Institute  and  the  Council  on  State  Taxation 
have  documented  that  telecommunications  services  are,  on  average,  taxed  at  rates 
nearly twice as high as general sales and use taxes. The Heartland study of 51 large 
cities found that the average rate is 13.5 percent, while the COST study tagged the 
rate at 14.2 percent. At current broadband prices, such taxes could add as much as 
$8.00  to  the  monthly  cost  of  broadband  Internet  access.  These  taxes  would  have  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

measurable  impact  on  broadband  penetration  and  would  hit  low  and  moderate  in-
come households the hardest. 

92 

Question  2.  Do  you  believe  that  the  current  definition  of  ‘‘Internet  access’’  allows 
movie  downloads  and  music  downloads  to  be  bundled  with  Internet  access  services 
tax-free? Are you aware of efforts in the industry to move in that direction? 

Answer. No, I do not believe that the current definition of ‘‘Internet access’’ allows 
movie  downloads  and  music  downloads  to  be  bundled  with  Internet  access  services 
tax-free.  While  the  definition  of  Internet  access  covers  the  service  that  permits  a 
user  to  access  movie  and  music  downloads,  it  does  not  cover  music  or  movies  that 
are downloaded. 

I  am  unaware  of  any  provider  trying  to  bundle  movie  or  music  downloads  into  a 
tax-free Internet access package. This may be attributable to the accounting rule in 
section  1106,  which  was  added  as  part  of  the  2004  changes  to  the  moratorium. 
Under this rule, if charges for Internet access are ‘‘bundled’’ with other charges that 
are  subject  to  taxation—such  as  charges  for  movie  or  music  downloads—then  the 
charges  for  Internet  access  may  be  subject  to  taxation  unless  the  Internet  access 
provider  can  reasonably  identify  the  charges  for  Internet  access  from  its  books  and 
records. Therefore, an Internet access provider has a strong incentive to ‘‘unbundle’’ 
for  tax  purposes  those  taxable  services  in  order  to  ensure  that  the  entire  package 
of  services  that  includes  Internet  access  is  not  subject  to  tax.  This  accounting  rule 
that was modeled on a similar provision in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing 
Act  and  has  since  been  used  as  a  model  for  language  that  was  included  in  the 
Streamlined Sales Tax Act. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:27 May 02, 2012 Jkt 074011 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74011.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

